At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague réctifia its losses.
Transactions with the actions CˇEZ rose almost half the usual daily exchanges.
Tuesday, at the beginning of trade, the stock exchange of Prague renoua with his downfall of the day before, when it lost almost six percent.
This time, the decline is due to the fall of the Wall Street.
The reaction of the market with the outcome of the vote in the US House of Representatives, who refused to adopt the stabilization of the US financial sector, is also noticeable home.
Fall of actions in Asia
Asian stock exchanges lived on Tuesday a dramatic fall, even if the evidence did during the day, to erase some of the losses.
The Hang Seng index in Hong Kong stock exchange lost four percent during the exchange, but later, he effaça part of losses and reduced the drop in nearly 2.5 percent.
The Hang Seng index China Enterprises following the movement of Chinese actions of the Hong Kong stock exchange lost 3.8 percent, markets are closed to Shanghai.
The actions of the stock exchange of Sydney lost more than five percent, but ultimately it manages to reduce losses to 4.3 percent.
According to its index, the Taiwan lost 3.6 percent.
"The hesitation about action to rescue the US affect the financial markets around the world," observed Joseph Yam, the head of the Hong Kong Monetary Institute.
While Hong Kong is part of China, it establishes its monetary policy itself, that is, regardless of the Chinese central bank.
Interest rates have to Hong Kong the same level as the US.
According to Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd, the American legislators should soon resume negotiations and adopt the proposed supports the financial system.
Otherwise, we risk that other countries are suffering the effects.
The bloodshed US stocks
Monday, the US House of Representatives rejected the draft supports the financial system, which it would have had to spend up to $700 billion (nearly 12 bilions of Kcˇ).
Renièrent legislators and supports the call to the project of President George Bush.
According to Bush, the project should solve the main causes of the financial crisis and to help stabilize the economy as a whole.
American actions lived, on Monday, a bloodbath and the main indices of actions got the biggest fall of the last 20 years.
The Dow Jones index lost nearly seven percent, following a fall of such a scale for the last time in 1987.
The index lost during the vote, but when it became apparent that the proposal was not adopted, it was in free fall.
Congress gave way: The government of the United States can inject $700 billion into banks
The leaders of the US Congress and the government of President George W. Bush agreed on a form of the agreement of financial assistance to the US financial system.
It will be put to the vote early next week.
American legislators effectuèrent a turning point in the talks on the adoption of a rescue plan in the form of financial aid of EUR 700 billion dollars (about 12 billion kroner), given the US financial system.
Success is not so sure.
Indeed, to publish the final version of the law and submit it to the vote, the Congressmans must conclude a number of details of the agreement.
Terms of supports the financial system will be examined on Monday to the House of Representatives.
Said Sunday to Reuters Barney Frank, the chairman of the committee of the banking and financial regulation of the House.
According to the sources, on Wednesday at the earliest, the a priori should be put to the vote in the Senate.
According to economists, the announcement of the fact that the rescue plan will be adopted should be a first major psychological factor to revive the financial markets.
However, given the complexity of the mechanism by which the aid to the markets can be effective, will follow a "disappointment".
Paulson: The plan must be effective
"We have made great progress.
We have done our views on the form that should have the package of measures to stabilise the market, "confia the Agency Bloomberg the democrat Nancy Pelosi.
, the final vote could be done by Sunday.
Of Saturday evening, representatives of legislators rencontrèrent the US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, in order to give the bottom of the government a final form.
It should buy, with the financial companies, the housing unsaleable which lead to financial firms in huge losses and threaten the stability of the entire system.
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and must be, too, effective on the market.
It still need to continue this recovery plan of markets, but I think we have, "Paulson said.
A signal to the Asian trade
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the markets of actions that are falling.
According to Senator Harry Reid, Democrat évadiez legislators are so that Congress will lead to a final agreement by Sunday.
They want and calm investors before the start of trade on the Asian financial markets, which are located in the first time zone, where the decision of Congress could affect trade on Monday.
For now, however, it is impossible to say with certainty when the two chambers of Congress comes out the vote, or if the negotiations are not likely to remain blocked, at the last moment, for this or that problem.
Lawmakers hope that it will be adopted during the coming days.
However, the law will still many changes.
The total amount to the aid of the system should be divided into two parts.
The first $350 billion, as was the wish of President George Bush, must be available as soon as possible.
But, if Congress will have the impression that the programme does not fulfil its function, it has the opportunity to block the granting of the remaining amount, following two stages: Firstly additional $100 billion, then, finally, 350 billion dollars.
Mr Bush salua progress in the negotiations
Although the President can be vetoed by this decision, Congress has the opportunity to put it in a minority.
Despite these changes, the main idea of the programme, which was to obtain finance to buy bad mortgage securities, whose value chuta, because hundreds of thousands of Americans are unable to pay their mortgages, was maintained.
"All the work is done.
The House of Representatives should be able to proceed on Sunday to the vote of the law, and the Senate on Monday, made it "Republican Senator Judd Gregg.
US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
His spokesman Tony Fratto said that Mr Bush was pleased the progress made on Saturday and appreciated "the bipartisan effort to stabilize our financial markets and protect our economy".
Limitation of golden parachutes
The Senate Banking Committee Chairman Christopher Dodd, chief negotiator, said that lawmakers agreed on the responsibility of the financial programme, the protection of helping against losses, the agreement of relief, the conduct of the plan on the axis of time.
The new law also provides to limit the so-called golden parachutes for the managers of companies participating in the programme and it establishes a committee, which will ensure the supervision of the funds.
It should be managed by the Ministry of Finance.
"We have worked very hard on the issue and have made significant progress towards an agreement that will work and will be effective in the market and for all Americans," said Paulson.
The plan also includes aid for property owners, who have problems to pay.
The government should negotiate new advance in the case of mortgages that it will buy, while reducing payments of debtors and allowing them to keep their homes.
Marek: A psychological help
According to the chief economist of Patria Finance David Marek, the plan is a good idea, but its implementation will be very difficult.
"And this is because we do not know what will the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
This will be crucial to decide on the sharing of losses in the financial sector and the government, "said Marek, this week, the server iHNed.cz.
If the plan will be adopted now, or early next week, is, according to Marek, not as important as that.
"It is much more important than the congressmans agree, as early as this week, they support the plan and they will devote as soon as possible.
This psychological importance of the agreement, providing for the adoption of the plan, the most important thing at the moment, "stressed Marek.
A fight taken to extremes: MP3 players against the mobile.
Conseillera, how you choose
While virtually all mobile can read the MP3 files, no MP3 player knows telephone.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a telephone.
Does not mean that there are plenty of reasons to buy a reader independent.
The choice of mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
It would be absurd to buy expensive gramophone for the house a high-end to put the new album of Maxim Turbulenc.
On the one hand, such products music does not go on record, and vinyl, from the point of view of quality, there is no objective reason for that to happen.
But if there is in your shelves of records vinyles crowded, with the art rock, jazz and blues music, some hope at least likely to such a gramophone.
The same music for travel, namely music high-pressure, to put it in a simplified, MP3 music.
Here, too, there are groups on the basis of price and quality.
For one, it can be unacceptable to spend eight thousand kroner for a reader, in the same way as a fan of Pink Floyd would be hard to sustain the headphones bought for twenty kronor in the market.
Two extremes, between which there is enough room for everyone.
The choice is wide.
Battery life is also crucial
Some music players upmarket are capable of much more than just a reading of music, but it is unknown functions, of course, most of the mobile.
Current system is also no universal that the phone.
Has side of the primary functions, the telephone calls and sending SMS, it is able to read music and films, to register them, it has a camera of varied quality and can, for example, to serve to shipping.
And taking into account the Smartphones and communicators, you have in your pocket a small computer.
Given that no shelve knows burn meat and that no television will take photographs, we are almost a miracle.
The universal nature of the mobile is not without problems.
The more functions you use it, the more the interval between two rechargements will be reduced.
And reading of music is one of the most important energy goinfres.
Are rare the mobile who are able to read music for ten to twelve hours, in most cases, this figure is much lower.
In this respect, the music players (especially the most rudimentary) are much more efficient.
In the case of mobile cheap, do they will play music for a few hours.
If you call from time to time, procurez you, to be sure, a second charge for the work - that being the case for appliances more expensive.
Is should be no problem for MP3 players, who are able, following a recharging, a continuing operation of at least 9 p.m., including the least productive.
Another problem occurs during the recording of music in the mobile.
Unfortunately, that a limited part of aircraft has a universal USB connector, because not all can be directly connected to the computer, without a special software.
We can, of course, make music directly on the map memory, but little card readers know go without reduction, given the dimensions tiny memory cards used in mobile.
As regards readers, you do need, without exception (iPod), no software.
It is enough to fill, through the USB connector, the apparatus of music from the computer.
Most mobile and readers will create themselves a library media classified according to the name of the interpreter, the title of the album, style, or according to the judgment of the user.
Some aircraft are having a structure that an index of tree, in the manner of the Explorer offer of Windows, others are capable of the two (iriver, Samsung, Sony, Cowon, the smart phones with operating system).
Readers are easier to manipulate, the mobile have more expertise
In the choice of a concrete, do you especially for life accumulateur, the ability of memory, quality and sort out its and, of course, the ease of the contract.
If the music is for you, essentially, a background noise and if in the day you will listen to that for a limited time, for example by taking the tram, you only need any mobile reading the MP3.
Almost all mobile are now able.
You are not even have to do too much attention to the music formats that the mobile or the reader is able to read.
All come to read the MP3 and the vast majority of music that will arrive until you will precisely this format.
It is one of the most widespread formats and to hand him, the vast majority of aircraft comes to read the music of format WMA.
The PCA (format used by the company and its Apple iPods taken from them), meanwhile, is less course.
The high-end mobile also allow, for example, the purchase online music.
It is enough to visit, since the mobile phone, web pages of the operator (or those of another supplier corresponding) and buy the song or the album in question.
This service alone should be a compelling reason to buy a musical mobile.
The supply of operators is unfortunately miserable and it is limited, in most cases, the radio tubes quickly facts.
Prices are not the lowest.
However, it is generally believed that this way to buy music (either by GSM, Internet, even by wireless Internet) will dominate the music industry in the future.
Most people are always their mobile on itself.
Has every time you want to hear something, you just have to get out of your pocket the mobile, when you have forgotten your MP3 player in the home.
But it is also important if you have always on you of headphones or a handsfree with connection.
If not, you can use the integrated bodies that have virtually all mobile, but a minimum of MP3 players.
For many, the main advantage of mobile music is their prices.
The cheapest normally cost less than three thousand.
For a price of three four thousand kronor, we can have a very decent walkman.
But in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of exit for ordinary headphones.
The price of the best telephones and better equipped, filled also an entry for headphones, no more than 15 000.
Readers, however, have the advantage of having an order easy.
Really anybody is to ensure the command readers the most rudimentary - who do not necessarily correspond to the cheapest (see our choice).
A minimum of functions; and the resemblance to the command post with a cassette, commonly used in the past, or gramophone, is obvious.
There is no risk of collision in the form of a mobile Internet trendy by chance, followed by a bill of transmission of data immense.
What device choose
Even the mobile the cheapest (by former. The Vodafone 527) have generally a memory card slot in tradable (the type M2, microSD, and so on).
Even taking into account the additional purchase of such a card, you will not exceed two thousand kronor.
But be careful.
The basic models do not support in principle that maps with a maximum capacity of 2 UK.
Only the most ladies are doing the same with maps memory of 8 UK.
If you have already a mobile and want to buy an MP3 player cheap, take a Cowon, a Creative, a Sony, a Samsung, a Emgeton, or a iriver.
According to the capacity (Max. 2 UK), you should not spend more than 1 100 kronor.
If you are part of the auditors more demanding, choose the mobile-walkman (Sony Ericsson, some Nokia and Samsung).
These devices are filled test of independent order to MP3, and that is how the ease of the order is closer to that of an MP3 player independent.
Sony Ericsson, whose mobile of the series walkman have the same menu that the user MP3 players sold separately, is the one who went as far in this area.
The same service, in the same category of price, but with a capacity of memory (up to 16 UK) and a life of the accumulateur (normally 3 p.m., up to 35 p.m.), is guaranteed by an MP3 player produced by one of the trademarks mentioned above.
A virtual operator win the Czech Republic this year.
Perhaps
The mobile market in the Czech Republic is relatively advanced, our operators proposing virtually the same services that their partners in western Europe.
Despite this, there is still something - a virtual operator, which would force the traditional operators to lower prices.
It may be that it will not for long.
We have already raised repeatedly on Mobil.cz the fact that the Czech operators are part of the most expensive in Europe.
The CˇTÚ (The Czech Office telecommunications), which pointed out that the price of a home SMS was higher than in the rest of the Union, has confirmed.
So, following the latest step of the European Commission in the field of the regulation of roaming charges, a paradoxical situation may happen - the text-messaging from abroad will be for some customers mobile operators Czech cheaper than the country.
How is it possible that prices in the Czech Republic to maintain so high, compared with Europe?
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
It may sound paradoxical, given that we have still three networks and a mobile penetration that far exceeds the 100%.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely concurrenciez.
In this, Pavel Dvorˇák, the President of the Council of the Czech Office of telecommunications (CˇTÚ), who has repeatedly said that in the Czech Republic there was no room for another operator, is join operators.
It is probably true that a classic operator with its own network has apparently not much chance (incidentally, now, it would be difficult to of frequencies).
But there is still a possibility - a virtual operator.
It is precisely the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market that has led to a considerable reduction in prices, which were subsequently react to the traditional operators.
Yet, even before the entry of the parties such as Tesco Mobile or Virgin Mobile on the market, similar to those that we mean we wouldn't be heard in Britain.
However, it became clear that there was room for such operators and that they could have a real success.
We do not have to go look too far to find examples.
In February we had informed of the launch, Poland, the virtual operator Mobilking.
In six months, the operator has managed to win more than 100 000 customers and become the fifth operator of the country.
Add that behind the Mobilking, there is the financial group penta, which has, among other things, the U: Fon in Czech Association Council.
Virtual operators the advantage of being able to focus on a target group much more concrete.
For their operation to be effective, indeed they need far fewer customers that a classic operator.
They are, indeed, free of the costs of construction, operation and maintains the mobile network, relatively high.
That is how in the world, the virtual operators are emerging as operators at low cost - they propose calls and text messages cheap, which is often balanced by a limited supply of services.
Such as Tesco Mobile proposes, in Britain, SMS at least two times cheaper than its competitors.
However, as shown by the example of Mobilking in Poland, invest in a target group unusual can also be a good shot advertising.
Indeed, the operator is specifically men.
"The real men choose Mobilking - an operator who they want, and that they can trust," said David Seibert, the CEO of Mobile Entertainment Company, exploiting this virtual operator.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´, the spokesman for Vodafone, in doubt: "The Czech market is relatively small to an approach segmentaire, which is based most of the virtual operators.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
In the Czech Republic, no chance, say the mobile operators
But it seems pretty sure whether there will be a virtual operator in the Czech Republic, it will not be Mobilking.
"We are discussing the expansion of this project to success, but in the Czech Republic the negotiations are not very promotrices.
The launch of Mobilking will not take place in other countries in the region, "said in a telephone maintains for Mobil.cz Jana Studnicˇková, spokesman for the financial group penta.
It has thus indirectly confirmed that operators in the Czech Republic were, in any case, not support the idea.
On the contrary, they are trying to do everything possible to a potential competitor to appear.
GTS Novera the group, which would take a step back and to become a real Telefonika competitor in the field of customers company, does not hide, long enough, its intention to launch a virtual mobile operator.
"We are very keen to be able to propose to our clients not only telecommunications services fixed, but also mobile.
And the sooner the better.
We have already led the negotiations about that possibility several times with all the Czech mobile operators.
With some, we have managed to make progress in the negotiations, "said the spokesman of the Pavel Kaidl.
The future is perhaps promising.
According to information non-official, it seems that perhaps we could receive the first virtual operator already by the end of the year.
But for the moment, it is accompanied by a total silence.
"At the moment, we do not believe that there is room on the Czech market for a virtual operator as such.
The Czech market is in comparison with other very specific.
For the moment, no issue with a complex project and serious in this area has contacted, "mentioned Vlastimil Department Srsˇenˇ press Telefonika O2, in its statement for Mobil.cz.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
The spokesman for T-Mobile Martina Kemrová says in a rare agreement with the declaration of O2: "We have not seen for the moment of project viable and bilaterally advantageous, which could serve as a basis."
And it adds: "It is almost impossible for a virtual operator appears in the network T-Mobile by the end of the year.
To operate in a limited period of time, we should have now an agreement. "
Vodafone heads rather its attention on the performance of the requests for its own 3G licences.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ said about this: "We are open to talks with potential virtual operators, and especially in the field of infrastructure costs and shared.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
The main strategy of Vodafone in this area is the discovery of a partner to put in place a common network for a rapid mobile Internet. "
The authorities responsible: In line with operators
The mobile operators is easily understandable, the entry of another operator would mean an increase of competition, would have led to lower prices and thus reducing their benefit.
What good to facilitate the advent of such a competitor?
When it comes to their interests, operators can be as. The chicane accompanying the creation of the U: Fon witness.
The greater pressure on the apparent CˇTÚ, the creation of the U: Fon, has been exerted by society T-Mobile.
Witness information available to the public learned from CˇTÚ websites.
Today, however, the U: Fon is ready to serve as an argument for not accept a virtual operator.
Martina Kemrová said about this: "Competition on the mobile market was, moreover, recently increased by market entry of a fourth mobile operator.
Given the nature of the mobile market in RT, it is clear that the entry of a player would submit further, and especially its services, high demands. "
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
It is not just about the attitude of CˇTÚ, which, unlike Britain and other developed countries, has unfortunately not, in the Czech Republic, the power to intervene in the economic competition.
It is exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
However, he adopted, faced with this problem, its position in point.
"The entry of a virtual operator on the mobile market would be possible following the conclusion of an agreement between a mobile operator and the virtual operator in question about renting the necessary infrastructure.
No such agreement has been reached at the moment, because the supply of potential interest has presented a priori not enough interest in the traditional operators, "said in response to our question Kristián Chalupa of the External Relations Department of ÚOHS.
A statement would surprise and do not on the part of representatives of the operators.
But from an office, which must represent the interests of consumers and other also take care to ensure that no one takes its position on the market, such a statement is confusing.
As Kristián Chalupa adds: 'Abroad, where the virtual operators are normally present, we can see that they enter the market has contributed to a fall in the prices of mobile telephone services. "
But pressure in the direction of a functioning market honest and lower prices is apparently not part of the interests of ÚOHS.
Which is shocking is concord almost touching the three mobile operators, which stems from their reactions.
The question, if it is really a chance, is naturally.
Similarly, a price of petrol strictly identical to all the service stations is deciding by chance and hard struggle of competition.
"The office has not met, on this subject, signs of behaviour anticompétitif, it has no reason to intervene in one way or another.
Has none of the operators of a dominant position, none has therefore a corresponding responsibility increased its behaviour on the market.
The necessary tools to the opening of the mobile market virtual operators are probably even the telecommunications regulator, "said in its statement Chaloupa.
The interpretation of the dominant market position is one of the many points of contention.
Of course, there is an analysis of relevant markets drawn up by the CˇTÚ that telecommunications are, from the point of view of economic competition, a single market.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
However, some experts the right propose a different view of things: For the creation of a virtual operator is possible, we must obtain, each time, the consent of the operator of network.
And the mobile operator has quite logically the monopoly on its network.
That is how it plays necessarily a dominant role in a certain segment of the business.
But even without admit this argument, it should at least be worrying for the ÚOHS that three mobile operators are clearly in a similar way.
But the complaints many interested parties (including the company GTS Novera, already mentioned) show that they are in negotiations with all operators, similar constraints.
To place the blame on the CˇTÚ is a fairly common in communications, through which the ÚOHS is washing his hands of the matter.
We have already seen this kind of attitude in several similar cases.
It has not managed to get in the novélisation of the law on telecommunications, recently adopted, an extension of the powers of the CˇTÚ on the field of economic competition in the telecommunications, although many specialists promised an improvement in the situation.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently the other.
When nobody is watching, it can walk
That said, the operation of a kind of virtual pseudo operators, several mobile networks in the Czech Republic, remains unnoticed.
It is companies publishing their own list price of mobile telephone services, but these are only public in part.
In most cases, it is a question of firms in charge of multi-level marketing.
Particularisés mobile telephone services are offered for example by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and others.
The lists of price of these firms tend to get elected.
The magic wand consists in the fact that the company made before the operator is a customer classic company, which commands a large quantity of SIM cards.
As a client important, it gets of price (and other special).
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
"If there is what you suggest, it could be a violation of contractual conditions that we would examine and could reach a judgment of cooperation with the company in question," responded to our question on this issue Martina Kemrová.
However, it is quite unlikely that an echo of such activity was not able to the leaders of the mobile operators.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned it can act of thousands of customers.
No one with operator, however, is against such a procedure.
Indeed, the activities of these firms their profits are non-negligible, and, at the same time, as opposed to the virtual operators real, they do not threaten them with their own marketing official.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ indicates the problems: "The law allows such speculation, however, the services of these companies are used as a percentage of customers negligible.
In addition, they are forced to admit that the SIM card in their phones is not recorded in their behalf, so they cannot have them fully, in the manner of ordinary customers' mobile operators.
But that is precisely that would seem strange the CˇTÚ.
Moreover, there is another question to the ÚOHS.
If the mobile operators a blind eye to such a procedure, why blocking the creation of a virtual operator?
It should be added that the ÚOHS has relatively broad powers to disclose such activity, and if he does not want to settle the explanations of operators, who said they had no idea that this would happen, their contractual conditions the banning.
When we will not be the most expensive
As we have already mentioned several times, the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market has made a significant drop in the price of services.
But almost all countries where appeared of virtual operators, the traditional operators were an attempt, sometimes more or less, to prevent their creation.
The arguments used by they were virtually the same - a market too small and too much saturated, problems with the quality of services, etc.
But precisely that have spoken, in developed countries, regulators, who defended not the interests of the mobile operators, but those of their clients.
Both by measures formal and informal pressure, they ended up getting the creation of a virtual operator, followed by others.
Unfortunately, the Czech regulators deal with this issue in the way of a hot potato disposed of in the passing of a target.
Following the experience, we cannot shake off the impression that the confusion in the competences their is in these cases more than good.
But we must not give up so easily.
If the information to tell behind a real and virtual operator will soon be home, the Czech mobile market will perhaps be movement.
If one of the operators accepted the creation of a virtual mobile operator, the ÚOHS will hardly remain impassive the rejection (discrimination) other interested.
And perhaps we continue to call more expensive than in the rest of Europe.
The new Czech anthem four new versions.
Choose the best
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
Sunday, on the occasion of the Day of nationality, the Czech Prime Minister Mirek Topolánek formally presented the new recordings of the national anthem Kde domov mu˚j (Where is my homeland?).
The anthem has again been recorded by the orchestra of the theatre national under the direction of Jirˇí Beˇlohlávek.
We have four versions - with a song solo male or female, an interpretation with choir and an instrumental version.
The song is ensured by Katerˇina Kneˇzˇínková and Adam Plachetka.
Otakar Jeremiásˇ and Jaroslav Krcˇek arrangements are the authors of the anthem.
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
Beˇlohlávek consider the Czech national anthem as one of the finest anthems.
As he had already left before the Cˇesky´ rozhlas (the Czech public radio), he has chosen to the interpretation of solo versions of the singers with the young and representative, which are marked and appreciated.
"From the beginning, I was trying to take care that the two singers, and the choir, have a good walking, so that it is well understood the words, they sing simultaneous way," he said.
The Czech national anthem will, next year, its 175è anniversary.
The song Kde domov mu˚j assails our ears for the first time in 1834 on the planks of Stavovské divadlo (the theatre of the Member) in Fidlovacˇka (school speech-day of savetiers), Czech original piece of Josef Kajetán Tyl, accompanied by music of Frantisˇek Sˇkroup.
It has become popular and people have spontaneously appropriate.
After the creation of the Tchécoslaovaquie in 1918, the first breath became a natural part of the national anthem.
It demeura one of seven national symbols even after the creation of the Czech Republic independent.
How sounds the 'new' anthem
The transport (MHD) pragois will introduce, on Wednesday, the chip in their ticketing system
On Wednesday 1 October 2008 will be included in the history of Prazˇsky´ Dopravní podnik (the Agency pragoise transport) as the date on which will rise in the metro, the trams and buses the first passenger, who, instead of having a ticket on paper, will have in their pocket a coupon electronic.
At the moment, it is accessible for nearly a hundred thousand people, owners of the smart card Opencard.
Passengers can buy a coupon 30 days or 90 days (this will be valid from 1 January 2009) and both the register on their smart card information points and the offices of Dopravní podnik Agency (the transport), located in the underground stations Muzeum, Mu˚stek, Nádrazˇí Holesˇovice, Andeˇl, Roztyly, Letnˇany, Kobylisy, Rajská zahrada, Kacˇerov and Luka.
From yesterday, there is also the possibility of buying the voucher by Internet on the web pages of Dopravní podnik: Www.dpp.cz.
More than four hundred people profitèrent of service during the morning.
Those who will begin to use the shop online can forget definitively the counters in the underground stations, where they were so far trampling of impatience in long lines in order to obtain tickets in paper.
Indeed, they will buy their coupon by Internet and will be on the cards Opencard in one of the thirteen Meˇstská knihovna (municipal libraries).
"In these points contact, there are available to the passengers with a one-stop trained staff, which will help those involved with the purchase by Internet and, moreover, will the coupon they have bought on the map," said the spokesman of the project Martin Opatrny´.
Has side of libraries, it will also be possible to register the electronic voucher on the Opencard in vending machines installed in the vestibule of several underground stations.
What are these machines?
They are red recall the machines to compost the tickets and passengers have perhaps already noted in the underground stations Roztyly, Budeˇjovická, I. P. Pavlova, Florenc and Vltavská.
"Today, the city has five, but by the end of the year, there should be four-20," he Opatrny´.
An automaton will monitor the coupon instead of the driver
Vending machines which will operate from tomorrow, are easy to use.
It is enough to introduce the smart card Opencard and the coupon bought earlier will make himself on the map.
The electronic vouchers are valid from tomorrow not only in the capital, but also in the surrounding area of the city.
Has in suburban trains and buses 300-499, essentially use the inhabitants of Commons of Bohemia central to gain access to the capital.
"In the trains integrated into Prazˇská integrovaná doprava (transport integrated Prague), supervisors are equipped with card readers, in which they establish the validity of temporary and zoning vouchers," said the control of tickets Filip Drápal of the organisation Ropid, which sees the time of transport pragois.
Suburban buses are equipped with card readers included in the till the driver.
At boarding it is therefore necessary not only to show the smart card the driver, but we must also put the Opencard to the right place on the side of the box.
The driver control the validity of the voucher registered.
"If the passenger would need to check the validity of the voucher registered, there is nothing more simple as to call this information to the driver," compléta Drápal.
Passengers who do not take the bus suburban and does not recall the date when expires the validity of their coupon, can join to new machines, originally used to record the voucher on the map.
That is, on the screen of the apparatus, that will show the information about the validity of their document.
The Sudeten called for a referendum in the US
The Sudeten Germans were in 1945 that Sˇumava National Park is included in the US.
It stems from a letter filed in the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna (The scientific Library of Bohemia south).
If we cannot be part of The Germany or Austria, at least we want to live under the management of the United States of America.
In 1945, some groups of Sudeten Germans were addressed allegedly the President of the United States with such a desire.
It is between different a letter preserved in a private archive, who is now lodged in the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna.
Germans of Cˇesky´ Krumlov pray in the letter, the US president not to allow "sˇumavská zˇupa" (region of forest in Southern Bohemia) - annexed by Hitler under the Munich Agreement - to be made in Czechoslovakia.
"We understand the situation and want to be really sure that the words proclaiming that American troops come on the territory German not oppressors and enemies, but as liberators," is written in the letter, signed "Persons, which the fate of the Sˇumava National Park is close to my heart."
Since the rallying to Czechoslovakia is allegedly promising - by knowing the Czech national character - that of brutality, of attitude without ways of incomprehension, oppression and servitude, the authors of the letter urge the American president to take in its hands the protectorate of the Sˇumava National Park for now and forever.
"We cannot believe, that you would give the territory to a foreign government, which oppresses and destroyed the minorities and has done nothing to victory of the Allies without taking into account the quarter of a million people," is written in the letter.
The reason so-called for which the authors cannot sign the letter is the fear of the desire for revenge "Czech oppressors.
If the US president doubted the opinion of Germans of Sˇumava National Park, it would have to organise, according to the authors of the letter, a referendum in the region to establish whether its people wanted to be part of the US, or live under the management of the US.
Although the text content in the letter, given the current knowledge of history of the post-war, seem somewhat naive, according to some survivors, it illustrates the expectations of the Sudeten Germans of the time.
When the Germans Czech should at least see that the issue of their expulsion of the Republic will arise, very few of them are avouaient such a possibility.
Some expected that the US and Britain were going to get to the Sudeten a certain type of autonomy.
Other believed that they would simply in Czechoslovakia.
Austrian the famous journalist Gustav Chalupa, born in 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, confirms.
During the war, it was, as a German of 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, engaged in the Navy in the Baltic countries.
When at the end of the war, he was captured by the British and placed in the court to capture of the region Holstein, dozens of Germans were the Czech consult to their learns Czech.
"They believed that a return home, Czech their would be beneficial," said Chalupa.
None of the Germans caught who lived in Czechoslovakia before the war, he believed that, following the Benesˇ decrees, it would be expelled from the Republic.
You do not consider - you pay for.
An emotional campaign will drivers
Action road safety the most expensive in history.
A way to characterise the media campaign emotional the intention of launching, on Wednesday, the Ministry of Transport.
Minister's office Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek think it will discourage drivers a dangerous driving.
This campaign costing 150 million will appear on television, radio, cinema, on the Internet, but also on leaflets.
It should discourage the drivers of driving fast and drink-driving.
But also remind them to take the belt before start.
It is primarily affect the conscience of young drivers, the motorcycle, pedestrians, without forgetting professional drivers.
Which will appear in the spots?
Especially personal stories that will attack the emotions.
Witness also the slogan 'bloody "throughout the campaign.
You do not consider - you pay for.
The phrase 'You do not consider "is enshrined in majuscules on the registration plate.
Then, in a puddle of blood, the phrase 'You "paieras.
What should be a symbol that we can pay for life for a moment of insufficient attention.
The spots will "haunt" the spectators until 2010.
The Ministry has inspired similar campaigns in the Anglo-Saxon countries, where we can see commonly images with drastic images of the victims of accidents.
He believes that this will lead to a reduction in the rate of accidents and the number of deaths on the roads the Czech Republic.
The spots were prepared by the agency Euro RSCG.
The strategy of sugar and hard against drivers
"What works with drivers is the system of sugar and the whip.
For them, sugar is represented by, for example, to save time when they grillent a red light.
The whip is the threat of fines or an accident.
The risks should be recalled to drivers, "said Martin Korˇán, the psychologist Transport the hospital Na Homolce.
That is how we need information campaigns in the press and above all negative advertisements, believes the psychologist.
Signs pointing out the danger to drivers are, according to him, already less effective.
"When a static panel which warns against a danger is installed, it will probably quickly merge with the environment and the drivers will see more," signala Korˇán.
Olmert would make in exchange for peace almost all the occupied territories
Ehud Olmert, the chairman of the interim government of Israel, ruled in favour of the return of almost all the territories occupied in 1967, including the West Bank and East Jerusalem and the Golan Heights, in exchange for peace with the Palestinians and Syria.
He made that statement in an interview published Monday by the Yedioth Ahronoth newspaper.
"We need to reach an agreement with the Palestinians, which means that it will be necessary to make almost all the territories (occupied), if not all," said Olmert on a daily basis.
"We will keep a certain percentage of the territory, but we must give the Palestinians a similar percentage (Israel), since otherwise, peace will not happen," he added.
It ing understand that the return possible East Jerusalem.
"Anyone who wants to safety in Jerusalem, and especially does not want that tractors and bulldozers to crush the feet, as has happened to one of my best friends, must renounce parts of Jerusalem," noted Olmert referring to the two attacks in the city, in July, where several people were killed and dozens of people injured.
According to the prime minister, it will be necessary to find a solution to the Temple Mount, the sacred sites and historical 'located within the old city.
"Anyone who wants to maintain Israeli sovereignty on the whole city will be forced to integrate 270 000 Arabs.
It will not work, "he stressed.
Retirement from the Golan Heights
Olmert is also ruled in favour of retirement of Israel from the Golan Heights, which is, according to him, a prerequisite for the conclusion of a peace agreement with Syria.
But that would require also some efforts from Damascus.
"I do not propose to make peace with Syria solely on the basis of a pension Heights," signala it.
"The Syrians know very well what they will have to give up to get the Golan Heights.
They will have to give up their current relations with Iran; they will have to give up their relationship with Hezbollah (Shiite movement); they will have to abandon the constant supports they attach to terrorism of Hamas (Shiite movement), Al-Kaïda (terrorist network), as well as that of Jihad (holy war) in Iraq, "précisa the Prime Minister.
Issues that arise after the accident: The stewards in the because they are illegal immigrants?
The law is ignoring them; walk in a long-distance is prohibited.
In the context of the tragic accident at the coach of society Student Agency almost Padua, Italy, arises the question whether the stewards and passengers can during the journey move within the coach.
"If we wanted to respect the law strictly formal and the activity of a steward is against the law on the road," said the spokesman for the Ministry of Transport Karel Hanzelka.
The accident in question, during which has died a hôtesse aged 22 years, has apparently been caused by a lorry driver who cross the road to coach.
The girl was at the moment, unfortunately, sitting next to the driver, on the seat the most dangerous of the vehicle, although it has at its disposal other two seats.
But the coach can have an accident or slow down a steep, also at a time when the steward serves coffee or distributes the newspapers.
What matters is whether the coach is under its technical sheet equipped places standing or not.
If this equipment for places standing is not approved, passengers must remain seated.
Coaches long distance Student Agency have no standing markets, which has been confirmed in Aktuálneˇ.cz by the director of the company Radim Jancˇura.
"It is a question that we have dealt with the Ministry and, at the beginning, it prohibits any movement of passengers.
Then they have cancelled and we have achieved that passengers can go to the toilet during the journey on condition that they have their own seat, "he unveiled its position.
The law ignores the steward
"There is no clear legal interpretation of the role of steward - no legal prescription is dealing with this role.
On the other hand, no legal prescription does not prohibit not the carrier services.
The law on the road transport is only the term recipient of vehicle; it does not define its rights and duties, "adds more ambiguity the spokesman Hanzelka.
Josef Pokorny´, the director of the Department of the movement of road vehicles, believes that the law is sufficiently the problem.
"Everything depends on the fact that the coach has in its approval permission to propose places standing.
All lies with it, "he says.
Coaches are divided into urban, where there are places standing and a maximum speed limited, urban with places standing and a higher speed limit and coaches long distances without place standing with the maximum speed the higher and seats equipped with seat belts.
As in the plane, said an expert
Jaroslav Horˇín, an expert on BESIP (safety of road traffic) in safety in transport, does not see the displacement of the stewards on board as a major problem.
"During a movement, there is no risk. The situation can be compared to that of service in aircraft.
But it is not clear when will be turbulence and hôtesse of the air can beat your head. "
"In cases where the coach would have slowed down a steep, the laws of physics would obviously be valid.
In the same way that in a city bus or in a tram.
The carrier must manage the safety of the stewards by internal regulations, "he says, and also think that from the point of view of the law, the problem is not resolved.
Jancˇura is prepared to remove these services
Student Agency is the only carrier coach services to propose the stewards.
It in recruitment two hundred.
Even after the accident, the director do not consider their job as a job at risk.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
Passengers can receive their coffee and their newspaper to boarding.
It would reduce the costs, "he says.
The concern of security is the reason that gives the absence of stewards in its vehicles the director of the Asiana Litvine Alexei, which ensures, compared with SA, a very small number of lines.
"We have not escort. We object from the beginning.
Sooner or later it will eventually a fatal accident, "he said, there is a years, Ty´den.cz.
A great tragedy arrived
A young hôtesse in the region of Plzenˇ, who worked for the company for two years, has died in the accident on the line of Naples.
Slovenian a lorry was probably quité the hard shoulder without using clignotant and it has blocked the road to coach.
The driver of the last to try to avoid it through a sudden move, but he fell short by his right side.
Jancˇura denies that the two seats reserved for the rest of the stewards have been sold.
"In the case of long-distance routes, it is not possible to treat these places, they are blocked."
The company account complaint against the driver of the lorry.
For compensation of the girl's family, the agency will not wait the judgment of the Court, but as far as the financial compensation, it is also on the culprit.
A change in the law?
Step towards
A change in the law, which is being drafted, for more than a year ago by a group of 30 experts on Transport Ministry, could provide clarification on the movement of stewards on board the bus.
"However, it has not led to any conclusion on this point.
In fact, it is not interested too the bus, but rather the points system, the maximum speed on the motorway and the use of mobile at the wheel, "said the expert Horˇín.
"The Ministry of Transport do not consider the activity of the stewards as something that would fundamentally endanger the safety of passengers," concludes the spokesman Hanzelka, by saying that the control of security coaches is under the power of the police and the office for safety at work.
The hopes of Düsseldorfois are based on Frankfurt.
The big words were not lacking in the letter from the steering committee of WestLB to employees of the house.
By a union of the bodies of the financial institution Düsseldorf with the Deka Bank in Frankfurt, "the central institution of the financial markets of the financial group of the Sparkasse" could be, according to the letter made public Monday.
WestLB bloc would be a "responsibility" doubled to a sustainable productivity in such a case.
After all, such a relationship could be the decisive impetus to other concentrations in the Länder banks.
That is what it is like when a committee board wants to demonstrate its ability to act in difficult times.
Because WestLB, injured, is still strong pressure.
It is not just the European Commission, but also the Federal Services Authority Surveillance of which has decided that only recently, made it clear to the government of the Land of Rhenanie North-Westphalia that the time was running out in the search for a solution future.
It is, however, question for some time now, also from Frankfurt - a relationship of any Deka between the bank, which is customers of the Sparkasse of their investment funds, and WestLB.
The head of the Deta-Bank Franz Waas said during the presentation of the figures of the six months ended August that he had no sense in the merger of the house of the Mainzer Landstrasse with a bank of Land, the Helaba or WestLB.
However the board of the Deka, which each half is borne and by the banks of the Länder and by groups of coffers of savings, instructed the steering committee to drive talks with WestLB for common commercial activities.
It could be the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
The talks come, however, only to begin, said in the financial centre.
This is not the first time that the Deta-Bank, which, with its 3,000 employees, account for one of the largest employers on the financial centre of Frankfurt, comes into play when it comes to consolidation in the sector of the coffers of savings.
In 2003 we thought for a moment that the Deta-Bank could merge with the bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate and Halbab.
Nothing is yet come out of this display ternaire.
Barely the plans had they been made public that the government of the Hessen said any participation of the Hellaba in them.
Later, the other two houses no longer does not rejoignèrent.
The bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate was attached to the way to the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg in Stuttgart.
But there was always new negotiations on the reunification of the Deka-Bank with the Länder banks.
Finally, Günther Merl, chairman of the committee director of the Hellaba, however, was voted against any business strategy of merger with his bank.
Regardless of this, the feeling is spread that the combination of the various institutions of the public sector is especially urgent.
Now that the election in Parliament of the Land of Bavaria fell, a union of BayernLB with the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg could be taken first.
For the Helaba, this is not particularly good news.
If the pressure which requires new mergers should increase, the potential partners are gradually him.
In the South, it is now a junior partner, although it has so far resisted the crisis better than the banks of Munich and Stuttgart.
The savings and transfers of Hesse-Thuringia, which has 85 percent of the capital of the Helaba however, has drawn a lock at the beginning of the year on any union with WestLB.
Would remain in the rigour the NordLB.
Such thoughts geo-strategic does, however, that one of the sides.
Another facet raises the question of how the various business models of each of these banks can match.
In June, Merl said that the decisive question, namely through what business model the viability of the Länder banks should be guaranteed, had not previously determined by the German grouping of the coffers of savings and transfers.
Has run a carving up WestLB which could take place, carving up here is obviously not liked.
It is also the point at issue in the letter of the Committee executive board in place: In any case, would be covered a global solution for the establishment.
How this will all be lumped together with the union of certain entities with the Deta-Bank remains to be seen.
The second weekend of the party of beer is also known as the weekend of Italy.
To Elena, this is the first time, Luca already the third or fourth time.
But this time, Elena accompanied it as a sweetheart, and therefore there is nothing like this, he says.
Behind them, almost a lines of five litres of beer brand of the Kaiser, is a barbu well built which shows to approximately 200 guests of the party of beer what sounds profound his gosier can produce.
Elena attack by Luca, then the embraces.
Of Bologna, they came up in Verona.
From here, the road station near the station Puorta Nueva, four bus take this evening the start at 11.45 p.m., destinazione Monaco, Festa della birra, arrived in 6h30.
Three buses are reserved for the Italian, in one of the bus travel of brésilens exclusively.
In a corner of the car park, the Latin American sing already alongside their flag, they have already celebrated last night.
And noisy, explains Marco Guarda, it is not for the Italian.
Buses belong to Marco, which is a long, doubled to fake fur coat and glasses for the broader silver eels pairs.
For five years, they go to the party of beer, already three virées this year alone.
They go at night, remain the day of the festival at 10.30 p.m., and fall.
Night would involve unnecessary costs, explains Marco.
The journey is 75 euros, including the pot of welcome with a beer brewed Kaiser, according to the law of Bavarian purity, insurance and a responsible for the group speaking German - Marco has done a language courses in Frankfurt.
And already buses drive into the night on the 'Autostrada Brennero direction.
There is no beer, not yet.
Quickly, everything becomes calm in the bus passengers sleep.
It is better for example, they will still need forces.
Of breaks will be made to Bressanone, and Holzkirchen, while many other bus with Italian registrations plates are once again a pause shortly before Munich, on the motorway 8.
When the morning, the group of Marco is finally coming to six hours 30 as planned on the parking lot near the place Thérèse, almost 50 other bus across Europe are already here.
Elena, Luca and other come together, Marco takes a last speech, explains the plan of attack.
Firstly: Crown of small yellow hat.
Be writing to the left is Festival of beer, in Gothic, and alongside the Internet of the travel agency Marco conoscersiviaggiando.it '".
Secondly: 'When the doors of the tent beer open, there is, squealing Marco in the morning.
Run! 'S run and reserve the seats at the bottom of the attempts.
Not before, otherwise it blocks, and not all the yellow caps on the same benches, we must distribute them in the Chamber! '
The chope, squealing Marco at 8.25 euros.
And do not forget the deposit.
Would show the security agents that we behave well!
As soon as you leave your seats, they are parties! '
Thirdly: 'This evening, be back here has ten and a half hours battery is understood?!
And it is, it is party to the party of beer.
On the road, someone firm hats yellow the trees to return to the path, the signs and even an election poster of a large Bavarian People's Party.
Is to be ready for the return.
This is the second weekend of the party of beer, known as the 'weekend of Italy.
There is no precise figures; we talk about 50 000 who are under way through the Alps and collapse in the newsstand to beer, 10 percent of visitors would express come to Italy this weekend.
The police munichoise is reinforced by seven policemen of the South Tyrol Transit Forum, by of the rescue services Italian volunteers who support the Bavarian Red Cross making a statistic on the countries where the Italian occupy the first place before the British intervention (60) and the Austrian (approximately 80) with nearly 200 medical interventions.
Which is particularly appreciated by Italian, that is trying to the brewery Hofbräu.
Nights of sleep for shareholders of Hypo Real Estate
The German banking system is relatively stable, insisted the Federal Finance Minister it was only a few weeks ago.
What chance that the politician relatively is used the word 'and glissait that the German banker would not be saved by the movements of crisis.
It is indeed that took place this weekend.
Real estate financial the Bavarian Hypo Real Estate (HRE), the DAX side, gets a consortium of German bank credit a billion to protect themselves from the turbulence.
A person in the confidence of the situation said to Reuters on Monday that the aid commitments are issued up to EUR 35 billion.
The Hypo Real Estate should now pay interest on the fraction to what it would have law.
The money comes as many private banks that banks.
In the background, it is the daughter society Depfa bears the losses.
Financial the state was, according to a newspaper article, refinanced in the very short term for projects in the long term for which he had borrowed money - which is no longer possible for the fact of distrust of the markets.
In the first half of 2008, the reserve of liquidity of the bank had been reduced to 95 percent to 2.37 million, the rate of capital also had declined slightly to 1,45 of 1.6 percent.
The benefits and those net from financial transactions were, compared to the same period last year, fell to zero, the profits from the allocation of debt securities and determined and the termination of provisions in the operations of credit had fallen by more than 70 percent to 5 million.
And it is only thanks to the important benefits of the reimbursement of costs of accounting downstream from the restructuring of the former group Depfa, as well as the interest payments, according to the book tax procedures and commercial procurement for companies to Konzern that the deficit of the gains of about 16 percent has proven to be moderate.
After its privatisation in 1990, the former financial state had first of all evil speculated on industrial real estate loans, which then had been filialisés the bank Aareal.
Because what the financing of classic state was not sufficiently profitable, the Depfa then committed more closely in the infrastructure projects and in the funding of projects in common among private investors and State (Privat-Public-Partnership, PPP) and diverse internationally.
On the value of society-daughter, the Hypo Real Estate must proceed with amortization which should have on the calculation of the gains and losses of the a vital equipment which is still unclear.
The fact is that dividends have been cut.
Already for 2007, they had been spoiled the two thirds.
The Hypo Real Estate, since the takeover of the Depfa, an investor of state and infrastructure highly important.
It is more robust than other institutes refinancing dependent on the inter-bank market since it has no customers received.
With the collapse of the investment bank Lehman Brothers two weeks ago, the allocation of appropriations between banks has again expressed constant significantly, the banks that have accumulated their liquidity.
The Hypo Real Estate needs annually for about 50 billion - of the global appropriations for the Depfa a means to refinancing short term.
According to a statement from the Hypo Real Estate, the need to finance the group is covered with the medium-term credit and the company protected influence of international financial markets largely outside running at present.
Other sources say that the refinancing would be provided through the funds until the end of 2009.
The chairman of the committee Executive Board of HRE Mr Funke explained that the group Hypo Real Estate should not have to resort to financial markets in the medium term.
The Federal Reserve and the Federal Institution for the Surveillance of the Services decided (Bafin) assume that the ability of the Hypo Real on the market is now guaranteed.
Shareholders and creditors of the bank did more than hoped.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
It is not unthinkable that we do not have to resort to the financing in full.
But the opposite will not be ruled out.
After the fact that the bank is, according to the latest reports, even at the gates of the insolvency Sunday at the end of the evening, this rescue at least temporarily will not be able to reassure people either.
Share price fell from 75 percent to EUR 3.30 goes.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
While the debts to have barely budged, the background flagging loans.
Most affected are especially investment funds from the old daughter society Württemberg Hypo and those of course that have a life beyond 2009.
The obligations of the bank Hypo Real Estate appeared before be an alternative investment of speculation, now their value should be seen as dependent on the stability of the international banker system after the tightening of the banking crisis and the crisis in the same institution that has brought the crisis in the establishment by the takeover of the bank Depfa.
As long as the issuing bodies, governments and commercial banks less affected are still prepared to support the system, we can assume a reduction of arrears on time.
Or will ensure that no one would hope at the moment - that the financial crisis can be overcome in 15 months.
But with the noise renouvellés a partial nationalisation, the likelihood that approached the sureté has now become a mere hope based.
This should reserve of the night of sleep before all creditors in the long term on the decision of whether they should secede from their commitments.
Short-term investors can still use what they have drawn a line to be a postponement of losses for the next few years on the next income tax capital stock market gains automatically taken.
Sylvana and the secrets of the Pandora to Bento
When Sylvana Hiltrop, 16 years, must be present for the first day of the Highschool Tachibana, girls are beginning to giggle laugh: The German is so "kawaii '!
What is it that it means?
Sylvana already know that word with Mangas - in his new Log exchanges, it speaks of Japan.
"The first day of course in Japan.
What is it that I was excitée.
Already the way to go to school I was afraid.
I live on the outskirts of Tokyo towards Kawasaki and I take the train 40 minutes until the Highschool of Tachibana.
I find the path alone, fortunately I have not lost.
The beginning of course does not seem to be set as strict as home in Lower Saxony.
Pupils are one after the other from eight hours, until to nine hours least 20, a round table begins with Professor, the 'home' room.
But before the course begins, it was for me to appear.
I am not at all of its kind to love speak to people, particularly in a class of 40 pupils.
As I had not yet the uniform of school, I have put an old skirt of my mother, as well as a host of rising socks shirt, blue and black leather shoes.
In this place so, I have presented to the rostrum, and tried to speak properly: 'Sayonara Wo She Sylvana...' - I called Sylvana, I come from Germany and my birthday is in a week.
At the time, I was very pleased to have begun to learn the language of two years ago.
The 31 girls of the class have all done whispering, pouffé laugh and signs, and I have always heard the word 'Kawaii ".
I already knew thanks to my mangas.
It is up to the vocabulary crucial to the survival of Japanese ados and means "beautiful, cabbage".
Then I quickly crept in my place.
The girl next to me was a big smile ironic, it found that it was an honour that the corresponding should sit next to it.
The rest of the time has been relatively quiet, but when the gong was music, I have been beset by the rules.
Everyone spoke at, pouffait laugh and I had a lot of questions - in this case, it is quite difficult to understand the Japanese English.
During the break, they then all out their Bento.
Host my mother had also made this kind of Lunchbox - this is really something other than the miserable by-case Germany.
I had rice the aromatic herbs, small sausages, a salad of cucumber and algae, fruit and a kind of meat surrounded by tofu.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
Things have a bizarre appearance and a completely new taste.
What is certain is that everything is really good.
Good, except perhaps the plums salt confites, brrrr!
The Bentos are not only school lunches Japanese.
Sometimes that a girl offers a boy a Bento she has prepared itself, and who is prepared very carefully, in the hope of being able to do a little better knowledge of the boy during the break.
I read it in my mangas.
I am curious to know if I could see also here.
"Why Japan in particular?" Asked me my friends when I was told that I wanted to spend a year to school in Tokyo.
I always responded:
"Because it fascinates me,"
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
And to better understand the mangas and culture, at a time, I have also begun to learn the Japanese.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
Because I have also a weak to the traditions, customs and habits.
And here, it gives them a lot of importance.
On the one hand, Japan is the country of technology and the latest trends, on the other hand, it is tough, disciplined and traditional.
And as everything is so well organised I never felt lost here, even if Tokyo is the largest city that I have ever seen. "
Rats also have the sensations
A rat or cafard fled before the danger, is it that it means that it is also fear?
The neurophysicien Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals have also of the sensations.
But how can we ensure that it has the same thing when it behaves in the same way that we?
In the online magazine 'Edge, "contributions are published for several years by famous scientists.
Spiegel Online present in a series of articles answers to the question "What do you think be true without power in evidence?"
I believe that the animals have of the sensations and other states of conscience without me or anyone else has until now been able to prove just as we cannot prove that the other human beings have a conscience.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same situation.
As soon as we turn to other species and that we address the issues of felt or in general of the conscience, we are moving into the difficult terrain because the hardware is not.
When a rat is a danger, it is the same as many other animals: It is the death, fled or attack.
People behave similarly, which is why some scientists deduce a subjective comparable.
However, I do not think so.
Two aspects of the structure of the brain make the transposition of our lived subjective to that of animals difficult.
One aspect is that the circuits associated with almost always to human consciousness include the cortex latéral préfrontal (of its participation in the short-term memory and in senior management and implementation).
This vast region is much more developed in humans and other primates and appears to be entirely absent among other people.
Least for these aspects of our conscience who depend on the prefrontal cortex, including the conscience of who we are, and the ability to predict and decide, it is reasonable to assume that human beings differentiates even other primates.
Another significant feature may lie in the linguistic nature of Man: A large part of its existence is related to the language, this means that his conscience often depends on it.
In this case, we could exclude animals.
But even if the conscience should not depend on the language, it surely the influence, so that the animal conscience, whatever the way it is produced, différencierait probably a lot of most of our Member of conscience.
That is why it is also difficult to determine what may be the awareness among other animals.
If that, internally and subjective, does not measure and, because of the hardware particular, analyse based on our own experience, then his comment raises serious problems.
Most of my developments refer to the content of the experienced aware, but there are also another aspect of the awareness that should be more easily accessible scientifically.
We could examine the process of conscience of animals without taking account of their content, and that is exactly what happened at of studies on the short-term memory of primates, particularly with the example of view.
But in this approach that followed Christof Koch and Francis Crick, it focuses more on the nerve correlations of the aware that on the mechanisms causals: The two can be identical or not.
Curiously, this approach also highlights the weight of the prefrontal cortex in the achievement of view.
But that means and for the emotions?
I conclude that an emotional system such as the fear is activated in a brain aware of its own business.
What we call as "afraid" is therefore the mental state in which we find ourselves when the activity of the localised defence system in the brain (or its aftermath, as the reactions of the body) absorbs of memory live.
Observed, and emotions are closely linked to the regions of the cortex that characterise the primates and especially Man.
Of subtle degrees of felt, associated with our nature volubile, emerge, because we can, with the help of words and grammar, differentiation and categorising of the Member for the blame to others.
The opposite, Antonio Damasio for example believe that the sensations from primitive activities are born in the areas of the body feeling of the cortex and core of the brain, like Jaak Pankseep however, which focuses more on the brain syllabus.
As the network has not changed much over the human evolution, it could quite part of horizontal sensations of all kinds.
On a purely theoretical, I cannot contradict him, but I believe that prove.
Pankseep argues that what is as fear among the Hommes and rats is probably also felt as such in both cases: How could anyone yet check whether rats and Hommes feel the same thing when they behave in a similar?
A cafard fled before the danger, but if it feels of fear?
In my view, similar are not enough to prove the experienced the same.
Of course, the comparison nervous help: Rats and Hommes have similar, the brain troncs cafards by against do not have a brain.
But is it that the waistline brain is at the root of the sensations?
And even if we could prove that for Man: How could anyone the show in rats?
I believe that rats and other mammals, perhaps even the cafards (who knows?) of the sensations.
But I do not know how the show.
And because their sensations probably differ from all of us (as human consciousness is based on special circuits, and on the language), I prefer to explore the emotional attitude that the sensations emotional rats.
In all cases, progress poignent on the plan nervous as they weigh the same thing in rats and Man.
As I do not explores the language and awareness among rats, or the sensations, I do not know if they exist.
We could see this as the short term, but I prefer to move forward rather than constantly beaten me against a wall.
I am a pragmatic émotionel.
Platini, the UEFA president: A grace period for Poland and Ukraine
Iwan Wasjunik Deputy Prime Minister said that the preparations would soon be placed under the direct responsibility of the President and the Prime Minister.
"The government considers UEFA's decision to Bordeaux as a sign of confidence in Ukraine and its ability to hold, in collaboration with Poland, the European Championship," announced Wasjunik.
"But this is not an amnesty for our country.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
In the timing of the construction or the destruction of stadiums, the streets, hotels and airports, the two guests run after the deadline.
The number of stages for the European Championship could possibly be reduced from eight to six.
"We can no longer time to lose.
We must work to the maximum speed, "said President of the Ukrainian League Grigorij Surkis.
"UEFA has constantly on the eye '.
Even tougher action was decided in Poland.
The direction of the Polish football league PZPN has been suspended by the National Olympic Committee after many scandals and replaced by Robert Zawlocki, administrator independent.
The Committee met on the request of the Minister for Sport Miroslaw Drzewiecki.
"There is a real danger that the PZPN not be able to act within the rules," said Drzewiecki of the Polish news agency pap.
"We have ensured in a letter to the President of UEFA that the preparations for the 2012 European Championships do not suffer."
Several members of the League of First Division were already in the previous season, convicted of manipulation of relegation compulsory; in the end, the beginning of the League has even be unrealistic at the last minute.
Dennis Quaid outraged counter-attack
It wanted to make the promotion for a new film, spoke of his privacy in an interview, and has now into trouble with his former: The Hollywood star Meg Ryan uncovered his former adultérin Dennis Quaid.
It foam - and counter-attack.
A war of late Rose for the former couple Meg Ryan and Dennis Quaid: Seven years after their divorce, the two Hollywood actors are engaged in a battle disgracieuse - in full view of the world.
Last week, Meg Ryan had expressed in an interview for the American newspaper InStyle on the causes of the failure of marriage, "Dennis has long been unfaithful, and it was very painful."
It would have taken note of the extent of deception only after the divorce.
The reason for this striptease of thought is the press relations Ryan for his new film "The Women '- is told the story of a adultery.
The reaction of Dennis Quaid on their qualification of unfaithful husband region fell clear: It would be "monstrous", said it the "New York Daily News', 54 years, that" Meg remâche again the history of our relationship and manipulated ".
It would be more "regrettable", that "the trouble and the changes that contain a divorce for every child are again rekindled in public" for their son of 16 years Jack. "
While Ryan lives only for divorce, Quaid has remarié and will soon be the father of twins.
And was shot in its response to the proposal: "In any case, my life continues.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family who will at best ".
The fares and hotels are falling
In the first half of 2008, the night flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
In Germany, according to a current study, flights would be even cut up 50 percent.
The night flights and hotel would again become profitable - it is the result of a study of the service provider of financial services and travel American Express.
The company has analysed data reservations the first half of 2008 and has established, after a price increase in the first quarter, a sharp fall in profits in the second quarter.
After the market price hotels have risen for years, the nights hotels have already cut in many places.
From January to March, prices rose in 41 of 48 European cities examined still 6.9 percent, on average, compared with 2007 in 41 of 48 European cities examined.
Of April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than the previous year.
The trend has been marked especially in Paris and Rome, where passengers were paid to 30 to 37 percent less than a year earlier.
The causes of this résideraient for American Express in the weak dollar, which has led to a 'desire to travel in decline of American tourists'.
Financial markets such as Frankfurt or London would be even more affected by the decline in the price of hotels that industrial sites as Hanover, Cologne or Stavanger.
In the Swedish town, prices hotels are with an increase of EUR 26.3 percent, the highest in Europe.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
Due to the increase in the price of kerosene, passengers in economy class have to pay an average of 7.1 percent more than in 2007, the long-haul flights, very consumers of fuel, have even increased until 29.2 percent.
Of April to June, the economy class ticket prices have fallen by an average of 12.5 percent compared with the previous quarter, business-class and first class however, the evolution of prices have been far less pronounced.
In Germany, prices have been falling even more important than in other European countries.
From January to March, prices had risen by 11.9 percent in the second quarter, they have fallen by 23.6 percent.
German domestic flights have even been divided by two according to the study.
The reasons for this fall in prices would be a slowing economic growth, explains the firm.
Demand will acquire ground in many market segment of travel by air.
On the other hand, there is a growing pressure of competition in the Treaty "open skies" liberalising air traffic between the United States and Europe.
Sign of the tense situation is the removal by the airlines of non-profitable routes, and the high number of airlines have tabled stock during the first half of 2008 - they were 24 companies in Europe alone.
HSV fighting Gladbach 1: 0
With a goal and simple methods, the SV Hamburg becomes first of the league.
In the Borussia, Luhukay has not yet managed to find a functional 11.
Of Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Hard landing for international player Marko Marin.
The player rentra Gladbach do that late in the game and his firing lifted fail against the framework of the goal.
His message was made, it was out of his lips so persuasive.
He knew that he was right.
"We need this second goal," siffla Hermann Rieger in the corridor of changing rooms of the ring of Hamburg.
There was not much in the changing room, half-time was over, and most were stale in their place.
Rieger has been for nearly three decades of the physiothérapeute HSV, it has a great reputation as a former players.
And that is why its application has been received the strategic markets.
The assistant entraineur Cornelius Jol has acquiesé and lifted the inch to approve.
Cornelius is the brother of the entraineur in-chief of Hamburg Martin Jol.
Whose orders seem to have been similar: And that it is with this second goal!
The implementation has missed.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed later Marcel Jansen.
Bastian Reinhard would also be more relaxed "wanted".
This 1: 0 (1: 0 at half-time), the team of Hamburg the needs to a successful in the head by Mladen Petric (at the eleventh hour); and the fact that the very low Gladbach players could not do any harm to the weak players of Hamburg.
"It has been a dirty victory", summed up Marin Jol.
The Hamburg SV of will on Monday its 121 years.
Already on Saturday afternoon, the fans are hailed themselves, the blue sky above the fray and the provisional league tables on the giant screen that showed their club as the first of the class.
Will it be a birthday party without genuine.
"We know take back," said Marcell Jansen.
It is clear that the interim result of the picture longer reflects the unpredictability of the first League that the domination of his HSV.
The team with its arrivals late committed - the Brazilian Neves and Silva, the guardian of purpose Petric like Jansen débauché of FC Bayern - is certainly slowly, but it is not yet.
"We need more charm and more dribbles", demanded Jol.
After the failure of the vote
On Wall Street, fear travels.
The first new of the failure of the rescue plan have driven the Dow Jones temporarily 700 points.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
Later, the Dow Jones was a little overtaken.
To 8.30 p.m., the most important stock index côtait 10.579 the world with a fall of five percent.
The Nasdaq stock market index of technology was 1548 points with a fall of more than seven points.
The more losers of the Dow Jones were on this date American Express who lost nearly 14 percent and Bank of America with a loss of about 12 percent.
No title could no longer make profits.
The actions of the Bank Goldman Sachs accusèrent a drop of almost 10%.
Only a few days ago, the big investor Warren Buffett was involved in society.
In the framework of the rescue plan, the resources must be mobilised to the purchase of spoiled mortgage documents.
The sum, however, must not be paid at once, but gradually.
In return, the state should recover options on the actions of the financial company that can be exchanged reason to changes in the way to reduce the burden on the Treasury Public.
Share prices being sucked into the eddy in Europe and the United States
The billions in aid for banks in Europe and the United States does not mask the concerns of investors.
The course of action of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and the Dax into the abyss.
American the Dow Jones index collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
Dramatic reductions of Hypo Real Estate and Commerzbank led the German index (Dax) to a profound deficit.
Financial the action of the Bavarian house has lost by time three-quarters of its value in spite of the rescue operation of the federal government and private banks, Commerzbank has reduced by more than 20 percent.
The Dax has clearly slipped below the important psychological barrier of 6,000 points and côtait to 5.839 points with a deficit of 3.7 percent.
In the world, the stock markets fell to his knees.
In New York, Wall Street opened with losses sensitive.
Investors feared that the rescue plan high of $700 billion of the United States Government may not be sufficient to restart the financial markets.
The Dow Jones points to 10.809,25 has lost in the first hour of openness 334 points, or 3.3 percent.
The House of Representatives of the United States intends to vote on the rescue plan, the vote in the Senate should follow on 1 October.
Other European stock markets also have known that a direction: In London, the FTSE 100 index has seen a decline for the moment of 3.2 percent, the CAC 40 in Paris has lost 2.9 percent.
In Asia, Japan's Nikkei the main index fell to 11.743,61 points after an increase from 1.26 percent.
In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng index-has gone awry 2.1 percent to 18.286,90 points.
In India, the main Sensex index has lost 506,43 points, or 3.9 percent, and closed to 12.595,75 points.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
The private bank Sal Oppenheim, has signed up to 23 million new shares.
The multinational trade and tourism has also indicated that the actions will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Of the dark influence on the flight of space probes
For years, a mysterious phenomenon leaves researchers in the concern: The dark influence on the speed of space probes during the games gravitationnel support.
Experts fear that the general theory of relativity is not entirely correct.
For nearly 18 years, the space borehole "Ulysses" steals in the area.
Of fuel conductions soon be frozen, death cryogène the threat.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon is because of confusion among researchers - the anomaly of the support gravitationnel.
The support gravitationnel is a manoeuvre of space probes, for which they get an extra boost in the field gravitationnel a heavenly bodies, the Earth for example.
Thus, the probes can save a lot of fuel.
The research borehole américo-European Casini-Huygens used this device physical, just as the solar borehole Ulysses.
That is what surprised the researchers also for years: Objects kites are not always 100 percent of the way in which it expects to the venerable institution laws of gravity.
Much more irregularities occur in the speed.
The probes become so unexpected faster or slower.
Until now, physicists could not explain this.
They as the anomaly of the support gravitationnel.
Some experts fear that the theory of general relativity Albert Einstein, which describes the power of attraction of the area because of the curvature of the area, may not be entirely correct.
The American physicist Stephen Adler of the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton still believes unshaken that Einstein do not was wrong and is trying to explain the anomaly of the support gravitationnel with the help of the so-called black matters that astronomers have identified in the universe.
"This black might be responsible for this anomaly, who is also in the vicinity of the Earth," he writes.
Researchers of space know about the only black for about ten years.
It is apparently it a force of attraction whose effect is visible on other bodies.
It is entirely invisible, i.e. that it sends nor does not reflect electromagnetic radiation, especially no visible light.
According to the calculations of scientists, the black matters would be a good fifth of the mass of the universe.
Tourists kidnapped in Egypt are free
After 10 days in the hands of their captors, tourists kidnapped in Egypt should be released and the Italian Foreign Minister the confirmed.
Sudanese the kidnappers had demanded a ransom of several million.
During the shooting before the release, six hostage takers would have been killed.
In southern Egypt, five Germans have been abducted.
Negotiations to ransom are already underway.
The Germans are constantly in the sights of kidnappers.
Welt Online depicts the most important cases.
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are visibly free.
This is what have communicated together the Egyptian state television, the Arab television channel Al Arabija and the Italian media.
Italian Foreign Minister Franco Frattini confirmed the release after the votes of the Italian television channel Sky TG 24: "Our citizens and the other hostages were released.
We are checking their state of health, "said Frattini.
The five German, the five Italian and the Romanian and their eight Egyptian companions are doing well and are safe, announced the Egyptian national television.
The 19 participants of the excursion in the desert should already be on the way to the Cairo.
The circumstances around a shooting before the release of the hostages are still unclear: Well, the kidnappers were close to put an end to the kidnapping, in the words of an Egyptian security official, before the Sudanese army killed six of the kidnappers without shout station.
"The issue was resolved.
They agreed with a ransom, "said the official.
There is nothing left to collect the hostages', when suddenly, "this surprise" occurred.
Sudanese soldiers had done this Sunday six of the kidnappers in the border area between Sudan, Chad and Egypt, and had arrested two of them.
The hostage takers Germany had demanded a ransom of a total of six million; the money should be called by the German woman one of the hostages.
The newspaper 'El Masri El Jom "said that, in the words of a German mediator, the release of the hostages was delayed because the kidnappers feared for their safety.
According to Rule, the kidnappers wanted to release the hostages women after paying the price.
Men were to be held until the kidnappers have found a road sure to flee.
The German Embassy in Cairo refused to make any comment on this story.
Abuse of a father-" which led to suicide "
A court has been told that years of abuse inflicted by his father-led a woman to commit suicide.
Michael Trerise, 57ans, Stithians, in Cornwall, has been jailed for six years after he admitted eight counts of indecent for facts.
The high court of Truro has referred he linked regularly its beautiful daughter, Stéphanie Randle, during his childhood, 5 to 7 years.
Trerise wrote in a letter to confession: "I feel responsible for his death".
The court was told that Ms Randle, aged 34 years, has suicidée home to Mutley, Plymouth, on 1 April 2007.
Child when she lived in Coventry, Trerise had committed and bandée before the force of sexual acts, while his mother worked at the pub.
Trerise and his wife have divorced in the 1980s, and it retourna live in Cornwall.
Its beautiful daughter out Plymouth.
But the court was told that Ms Randle, assiduous volunteer of National Trust, was haunted abuses that it had been inflicted twice a week.
The Attorney General, Ramsey Quaife said in court that friends had told that Ms Randle, who was a good surfeuse and cyclist, seemed since 2006 "emotionally dead," and "had lost all hope to life."
In April 2007, its true father, Terrance Randle, was found dead in his apartment in Plymouth.
We think she has suicidée by suffoquant with a plastic bag.
Mr Randle affronta the father of her daughter, who had also written a letter to confession that not as well: "I consider the bandais and regularly".
"I have not abused her sexually.
"I feel responsible for his death."
The judge Christopher Elwen Trerise said: "You are truly bizarre as abnormally attached, your victim was certainly terrorised, especially at the age of 7 years.
"This saga unpleasant ended with the suicide of the victim.
And even more surprising is that if it had committed this gesture, its history would certainly never finished in court.
It he: "I stress in particular, as describe his father and his mother, the effects of your crime had made for years on Stéphanie.
"Without them, she would probably now a young woman happy, promising, and success."
Condemnation for loss of official data.
The ministerial officer of the Cabinet Office, which had forgotten the top secret documents, in June on a train, will be condemned by the Official secret Act, has managed to the BBC.
Man of the Ministry of Defence was in travel documents when he oublia two highly classified, on a train in the direction of Waterloo.
The documents are in the hands of the BBC before being handed over to the police.
That is condemning the least of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
The BBC correspondent Frank Gardner said that this episode had many people from Whitehall.
"They have thought that this would have remained between the walls of the Ministry of Defence and the Cabinet Office," he said.
The employee who cannot be named, is accused of violating the section 8.1 of the act, i.e. of the clause which deals with the preservation of information.
The Crown Prosecution Service has suggested that the ministerial officer is placed under the tutelage of the Metropolitan Police, given the sensitive nature of his work related to the Committee associated with the secret services
The documents that he has lost contained assessments on Al-Qaeda and the resources of the security forces in Iraq.
It has been informed of the decision, on Monday morning and was then transported to home to a secret location.
Building societies in the bill B & B.
The British companies the building may have to pay a bill of more than £80 million to cover the rescue of the bank Bradford & Bingley.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million savers of Bradford & Bingleys.
The interests of the loan will be paid by all companies that collect the money of savers, including 59 societies of the building.
The Director-General of Building Societies Association (BSA), Adrian Coles said he is "irritating" to know that companies and their members will have to pay the bill...
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when mortgages of Bradford & Bingleys are released.
But the interests that are at the same time increase, will subsequently charged, each year, the 700 financial companies that collect deposits.
The Financial Services compensation Scheme confirmed to the BBC, that the 59 building societies are included in the list.
It is annoying to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior … must now pay some of the bills institutions that were much less cautious.
Adrian Coles, BSA
It proclaims that every society must pay a sum proportional to the deposits that it holds, and that companies intermediaries must pay about 18% of the cost.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will in 2009, to £450millions.
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to settle the interests of the first year.
Adrian Coles, Director-General of the committee commercial building societies, told the BBC that this decision was unfair.
It is "irritating" to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior during the resumption of the housing market, must now pay for the institutions much less cautious.
According to the BSA, no society has failed since 1945, the date of the first history.
"We must examine all aspects of the case for the coming weeks, to assess the options to avoid the building societies and their members pay a hefty bill" said Mr Cole.
The interests of 2009 cover seven months to the end of September this year until the end of March.
In 2010, it will pay the interests of the whole year, which could also double.
Given that the building societies are organisations without shareholder, their Member end up paying the bill or by higher costs, or lower interest rates on savings accounts.
Milk is growing up to five penny per litre
People of Jersey have to pay more for their milk
Jersey Dairy has announced that it will increase the price in bulk of its milk, five penny per litre, from Monday.
It is the second increase in the price which follows an increase of two penny in February, and comes following a research carried out by a society of consultation.
Sellers in detail must decide whether they will in turn increase the cost to consumers.
. Before the increase in February, the wholesale price of milk of Jersey had been changed for the last time, in 2002.
A former PM of Bangladesh has denied the bail
A court in Bangladesh has rejected a request from backing to the former PM Sheikh Hasina, which is likely to be arrested at his return.
His lawyers have said that the court refused to give its backing because of his indictment to be extracted a businessman, 50 million ($Taka 729.000,00) when she was PM.
This case is one of the many accusations that her.
Khaleda Zia, the rival always of Sheikh Hasina, has been set free on bail earlier this month.
Sheikh Hasina should return to the Bangladesh in a few weeks, but his party, the League Awani, has demanded that the military government temporarily give him the country's first full freedom.
Correspondents have pointed out that the terms of his release are contradictory because if we allow him to leave the country for medical reasons, they do not see why it could not remain free on his return in Bangladesh.
His lawyers have announced that it will now appeal to the Supreme Court against the order of the Supreme Court.
"The Supreme Court has rejected the request of Sheikh Hasina saying that it does not require bail because it had been allowed to go abroad for medical reasons," said his lawyer Rafique-ul Huq.
"We will present an appeal against the order of the Supreme Court"
His lawyers have argued that it needed this bail to return to the country in order to prepare elections in December
Sheikh Hasina should return after 17 October, said a former leader of the Awami Party.
It was detained last year after the military interim government has assumed power, but was released in June for care abroad.
Sheikh Hasina as Zhaleda Zia, deny the accusations that they get.
Concerns for the Afghan campaign antipolio.
In Afghanistan, almost 200,000 children have missed the recent immunization campaign against polio, for reasons of violence linked to the Taliban, said the UN.
The UN has done last week, a vaccination campaign in the six provinces.
But it says it has not been able to contact the children of dangerous areas of Helmand and Kandahar, located in the south.
A UN spokesman said that happened despite the promises of the Taliban not to address nor inhibit the thousands nurses in vaccinations.
BSkyB loses the legal battle to ITV
BSkyB has lost his trial following the verdict of the Competition Commission, which would have to reduce its participation in its rival ITV provider.
The Court of Appeal Competition ordered to BSkyB to reduce its share of ITV 17.9% less than 7.5%.
The Committee said that, in the past, the participation of MSkyB had prevented competition and had allowed to influence unfairly ITV.
BSkyB has bought its share in 2006 following an agreement to prevent NTL, now called Virgin Media, buys ITV.
In April 2007, the Office of Fair Trading has told that the purchase by BSkyB, shares in ITV sowed doubt on the effective independence of ITV, encouraging by a result, the Competition Commission to investigate
The boss of Virgin, Richard Branson, a group of consumers and the regulator Ofcom were all contrary to the purchase.
BSkyB said that the force to reduce its share of ITV would not be sensible and instead was excessive – especially given that BSkyB has just give up its voting rights.
New investigate the case of the US prosecutors.
The lawyer US general has appointed a special accusing to check the question of the dismissal of nine American prosecutors in 2006.
The everything is born of the account of the case of the inspector general of the Department of Justice, who criticized the actions of some cabinet officers.
The report was critical of officers of the White House, legislators and former Prosecutor General, Alberto Gonzales.
The investigation is based on the theory of lawyers who argue that their dismissal of political causes.
The accuser Advisor, Nora Dannehy now will be whether the officers asked during the investigation, lied to investigators, obstruant and justice.
"Serious accusations of conduct potentially criminal, unfounded, have not been fully confirmed or resolved," said the inspector General, Glenn Fine, in his report.
The appointment of a special accusing able to force of witnesses to table, was one of its most important recommendations.
The dispute began by radiation in December 2006 to nine American prosecutors made by the US Department of Justice.
At the time, the department said that prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
But it emerged then, that prosecutors dismissed were not more criticism that their colleagues, which incita some observers to give these redundancies a political undertones.
Some prosecutors have been accused of being close to the Republicans in Congress, while others have refused to investigate the allegations of vote fraud against the Democrats.
American prosecutors investigate and continuing the courts for the government.
It is certain that they can be made redundant at any time, but cannot be for political reasons.
The head of the Department of Justice, the Prosecutor General Alberto Gonzales, is accused of being involved in this case of dismissal, and in the end, he resigned.
A number of cabinet officers Department of Justice have also given their resignation.
The report by the inspector General was very critical of the role of Mr González in this case, saying that he considered 'first responsible "of the redundancies, and ultimately" abdicate ’ its leading role, "managing remarkably not involved in the case.
Other cabinet officers, including the former employee of Bush, Karl Rove, have been criticised for not having managed to cooperate in the investigation.
The saga of Meat loaf will be honoured.
The Rock star Meat loaf, must be honoured at Q Awards for his epic singing Bat Out of hell.
The singer, who will receive an Oscar at the ceremony in London next week, said to be "honoured" to get this recognition.
The song of nine minutes 50 seconds, was the title of the hit of the album of Meat loaf of 1977.
The evening of the prizes is presented by Coldplay, with this year, a selection restricted to four categories.
Paul Rees, editor of Q magazine, said: "There are songs that transcend things like the time and gender, and Bat Out of hell is party
The song, written by Jim Steinman, has required a great voice like Meat loaf.
It begins with a section instrumental that has lasted almost two minutes.
The song was put in trade in the UK, as single in 1979, according to the 15th place.
In addition, his album Bat Out of hell was nine years in the rankings English, and was sold to more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Meat Loaf- or Lee Marvin Aday, its true nom- has suffered from health problem in recent years, suffering even an operation to cure his a gap of heart become illegally, having collapsed on stage, in 2003.
In 2007, a strong laryngite has forced to cancel concerts.
Then he found a kyste in the vocal cords.
A dark street in the City, Souvent forgotten, and Peut Be soon for sale.
New York has hundreds of Avenue, boulevards, streets and other roads in parallel, some famous, other only functional.
Taxis and even some veterans and local residents of long standing cannot give advice to extra Place, because they have never heard.
The street is in the East Village and driving north of First Street- not to be confused with Second Street- between Bowery and Second America.
About 30 feet wide for 120 long, it looks like a gone poussiéreuse rather than a busy active.
. People signs indicate the street.
It is virtually impossible to find on a standard atlas.
The street, however, has fans.
For example, Avalon Bay, the manufacturer of recent buildings of luxury on First Street.
It would repaver extra Place, and create a smooth transition to the shops and shops, which should open in the new buildings.
Other admirers including neighbours long ago, said be happy with this shortened simply because there is one of the last and oldest pâté streets of the houses.
But the Department of Preservation and Development 2008 of the city that manages the street, has no interest in the bear.
This month, at a meeting of the committees of owners of neighbourhood, representatives of city agency and Avalon Bay have outlined a proposal to allow the manufacturer estate to buy the street.
But the committee would prefer that the street rest in the hands of the city, and asked to submit a new proposal next month, said Susan Stetzer, the local manager of the Committee No 3.
"There are few areas belonging to the city, and we hope that the city has extra Place" she said.
"They could propose to restore and the deal, which also Avalon could do, but we want to maintain public."
Avalon Bay announced several months ago she wanted to repaver the back streets and install of seats, some are also used by a coffee that the manufacturer phases space.
The proposal of this potential acquisition was made public in the meeting of this month.
Michele of Milly, the spokesman of Avalon Bay, said that although the company wants to exploit the street, this does not necessarily mean that it wants to be the owner.
"The main interest of Avalon Bay is relooker this been abandoned, and make public" she said, pointing out that this was the city to suggest the sale ".
Seth Donlin, a spokesman for the Preservation of 2008, confirmed that the city wanted to sell the street, stressing that the agency's mission was to develop the property rather than the deal.
Compared to its neighbour more colourful, Bowery, extra Place has left a slight historic footprint.
Some believe that extra Place bears the name since 1802, when the legacy of the great firm of the many children of Philip Minthorne was divided, leaving aside the small, which remained since abandoned.
After the entry of CBGB, a monument punk rock closed in 2006, has re open to extra Place; the street is certainly more famous thanks to the photo in coverage of the album of Ramones come to Russia '"
"This place was magnificent" said Danny makes, the manager of the Ramones, who took the photo in November 1976.
It was full of scrap yard, haillons, barrels, posters, leaves and strings. "
Some residents, including the bloggeurs which had already talked about the move towards the luxury of the East Village, have opposed the idea of selling extra Place, saying that this humble small property should remain public.
Others have proclaimed extra Place as a real rareté- a fragment virtually identical to the city that should be treating in peace.
Jeremiah Moss, who led a blog called Jeremiah' Vanishing if New York (subtitled "The Book of disputes: A look bitterly nostalgic on A City in the issue of extinction") described in the history of the City and extra Place, published in 1952 in The New Yorker.
The author, Brendan Gill, wrote: "Extra Place is a small cul-de-sac narrow, dark day and night, and defined by the doors of a warehouse in iron rouillé and persiennes, full of newspapers last week that soars along the gouttières."
Has few exceptions, the street has always the same pace.
A rat short agilement at the bottom of the alleyway near a door that was once the CBGB, and which has now become the seat of a clothing store are.
Of graffiti on the walls, a bottle of beer of 22 onces vacuum, is based on side of newspapers that have just been thrown.
Passers-by some said they did not think that rarely to extra Place, and suggested its development.
Mr field, for his part, said think that some under felt the attractiveness of the street in its current state.
"The best years of my life," he said, 'took place in places dark, wetlands and repugnant ".
Debate: Bilingue left in the English language
In this part of the programme of supervision of Education, Bruce Fuller and Lance T. Izumi discuss the position of the candidates on the bilingual education.
Launches T. Izumi, a former member of the studies in California, and former director of the department of education in the Pacific Research Institute for Public Policy, is the co-author of the book "not as Well that you would think. Why the middle class must be able to choose their school."
The favour of Hispanic voters is a complicated business.
Barack Obama's proposals on education is an interesting example.
The campaign by Mr Obama stresses that 'students African-American and Latin have less chance of diplômer white students. "This is true.
To combat these differences, the education programme of Mr Obama supports especially among many issues, "transitional bilingual education" for those who learn English.
However, the question for Obama is whether his desire to achieve a bilingual education that defends the investigation in class of languages other than English, goes beyond its interest to eliminate the differences.
Take, for example, sixth Street Prep, an elementary school in eastern Conté of Los Angeles.
Of this school students are largely Hispanic, and low incomes.
More than a third of students, been many newcomers, is studying English.
Among students of CM1, 100% have passed the examination of state of maths of 2008, expert level.
Similarly, almost 93% of students have passed the examination of English-language-arts
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient that put forward by Mr Obama.
Sixth Street on analyses, in practice, a constant assessment of capacity and an exemplary attitude.
In addition, and this is an example that Mr Obama could copy, reported Linda Mikels, chief of the sixth Street, the school has created the investigation of the English language full "waterboarding".
The dumping total in English focusing on the use almost constant of English in the investigation.
Ms Mikels, contrary to the bilingual education, has affirmed "we had a great success with a student who had just arrived from Mexico, 12 months after, if you go without his class, you would have had no chance to identify."
"It works, observed," it worked for us "
Mr Obama should it not take example of the sixth Street Prep and the reply in other schools made up mostly of Hispanic students learning English.
The excellent results achieved by the school speak for themselves, but the policies on education within his party (the Associations support for the National Education long bilingual education) and its huge support for the bilingual education, obscure the predicts the response to Mr Obama.
Although it is in favour immigrants learn English, Mr Obama has recently seen this issue as insignificant, when he proclaimed that we all need to stop disagree about the wording of the laws in English.
"On the contrary, he said," you must assure you that your child speaks Spanish ".
If Mr Obama really wants to eliminate the differences, it should then consider carefully, the models of education that work, rather than the dismiss or view them as insignificant.
Net falling oil following the concerns of the world of the New Economy
Oil prices fell sharply on Monday, because people fear that the rescue plan for the financial markets, will be able to revive the economy.
The futures of crude oil, fell by 7 percent to $99.80 a barrel. The New York Mercantile Exchange, in sales of this morning.
Prices have fallen by more than $20 a barrel since last Monday.
The past two weeks, the markets of raw materials have been buffeted by the financial turmoil on Wall Street, as well as by two powerful hurricanes in the Gulf of Mexico.
Having experienced in July, an increase of up to $145.29 the barrel, prices have dropped to nearly $90 a barrel this month, before pick up again at the sight of the deep uncertainty of the financial markets.
On Monday, investors are worried again despite the agreement on the rescue plan, the largest in history, reached over this weekend by the leaders of Congress.
The new has been watered down by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
In the latest episode of this financial catastrophe, "Citygroup buys banking operations of the Wachovia Corporation, said the government on Monday.
At the same time, the Belgian, Dutch and Luxembourg governments have party nationalised the European financial conglomerate, Fortis.
Analysts at Barclays Capital said that the negotiations frenzied at the weekend, concluded with the agreement of rescue 'do not seem to have managed to revive the market. "
While the economic situation is détériorasse, the demand for raw materials, including oil, should be slow.
Prospective "the global equity, interest rates and exchange markets, has become uncertain" wrote analysts at Deutsche Bank in a letter to investors. "
"We believe that the raw materials will not escape this infection.
"As far as raw materials, our most pressing concerns is to understand how far the virus American diffuserait it globally and in particular, China."
Analysts of the bank reduced their expectations for next year, given the fall in consumption of oil due to the slowdown in economic growth, were therefore obliged to reduce of 20pour cent, forecasts of oil and gas prices for 2009.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of Record of the Equipe.
After spending during the last eight seasons, more time than anyone in uniform of the jets Shaun Ellis, the defender was thought to have all seen.
It took the second time, when the jets transformèrent a 0-0 in an explosion.
"I have never seen anything like this," said Ellis.
The second time began after the jets and the Arizona Cardinals have salement played under obscure clouds.
Then the quarter back Brett Favre has managed to make a happening in Laveranues Coles from 12 yards for a touchdown, sign of an afternoon when their relationship has taken a step forward.
Favre has found Coles for yet another two touchdowns, the first when a corner back fell and the second, to 10 seconds of half-time.
"I am not out of my area" Favre said about all its fishways to Coles.
"It is a player 'poor
"We report extremely well, despite what do the people."
When Favre and Coles to play catch, the defence was at the back of the Cardinals quarter, Kurt Warner.
Darrelle Revis, corner back, has intercepted a fire lost 32 yards and the touchdown.
Eric Smith made another happening and was intercepted.
Linebacker, David Bowens left escape the ball because of Warner.
The last change, the loss of the ball to Bowens, may well be the most charming
The Cardinals have taken control of the possession for the last 10 seconds, and then the jets have recovered the ball, Jay Feely made a goal from 20 yards taking advantage of a 34-0.
It was the best that could mark the jets at a time.
The jets, "the coach Eric Mangini, who were asked to describe this madness, said" the second time or the third? "
When he said the deux- the jets have missed 21 points in the third temps- unquestionable Mangini said: "I can tell you that I have more appreciated the second time that the third.
. "Many points have been marked by little time."
Gebrselassie based, goes beyond his world record.
Haile Gebrselassie, Ethiopia, has once again proved to be worthy of his title of best athlete of substance of the century, having beaten his own world record in the marathon in Berlin on Sunday, becoming the first to run 26,2 miles in less than 2heures and 4minutes.
With a victory in 2: 03: 59 of a race accommodating on the plate, Gebrselassie has beaten of 27 seconds his record of 2: 04: 26, contested last year in Berlin.
Has 35 years, Gebrselassie won the 26ème world record of its successful career in which he won the World Cup or the world record for any distance, the 1600mètres of the marathon.
Last month, Gebrselassie had missed the Beijing Olympic marathon, craignant- can be under the eyes of today - that air pollution is increasing its problems of asthma.
On the contrary, he promised to run in Berlin.
In conditions almost parfaites- sunny time, 48, 55 degrees from the arrivée- Gebrselassie won Sunday, now an impressive average of a thousand in 4 minutes 43 seconds
The runners of runway as Gebrselassie and Paul Tergat, both runners, converted into Kenya, contributed to the loss of the marathon record of more than two minutes in the last ten years, since 1998, when the Brazilian Ronaldo da Costa became in Berlin in 2: 06: 05.
After the victory on Sunday, Gebrselassie said to reporters have suffered the Mollet-two weeks before, and have missed training for a week.
It is clear that the rest him has been brilliant, but not rouillé.
"I am so happy," he said to reporters.
"Everything was perfect.
I have called last week, and today I had doubts, but in the end it all went for the better. '"
He was reproché- especially in Kenya, the rival is Africa Ethiopie- to have too orchestrate its shopping, avoiding the global star of the marathon, relying on the hares as if they were in a competition of runway, and the more world records that the direction of the competition.
But it does not reduce the greatness of Gebrselassie capacity as a runner.
Gebrselassie Sunday, preceded by four Kenyans, recorded a time of 1: 02: 04. half way.
Two Kenyan elite runners, James Kwambai and Charles Kamathi, continued to defy Gebrselassie after the head of the queue have disappeared.
A little more than three miles of the arrival, Gebrselassie has made his final push to diversify away from Kwambai, which ends second in 2: 05: 36, improving its best record staff of five minutes.
Kamathis is is third in 2: 07: 48.
Women in the race, Irina Mikitenko, born in Kazakhstan, now German citizen, has completed a remarkable year with the seventh time of 2: 19: 19.
English Paula Radcliffe holds the world record of 2: 15: 25.
The spring, Mikitenko aged 36 years, has surprised everyone winning the London an in 2: 24: 14.
It could participate in the Beijing games because of a hypothetical poorly on the back, but he promised to win in Berlin, improving its third marathon, his personal record of nearly five minutes.
It courut making use of a clever strategy, leaving the group of runners in Ethiopia and Kenya take a clear advantage, then going around 18miles 1⁄2 after.
Askale Tafa Margasa of Ethiopia came second in 2: 21: 31, while Helena Kiprop, Kenyan draft third in 2: 25: 01.
In a City in Part, pride and the plight of the Black Life
Hidden in the development of its huge park, a few miles of the sunshine, the brilliant and the giant Orlando, is a quiet town where are born pride and the complications of the African-American experience.
"Eatonville, first black to integrate fully city, home of childhood of Zora Neale Hurston, this description that it did in 1935, is not so easy to make these days." The city in five lakes, three short of croquet, 300 skins foncées, 300 good swimmers, full of goyaves, two schools and not in prison.
It is now become a city of pilgrimage
Alice Walker, Tony Morrison and ruby Dee came to the Zora Festival every year to Eatonville, to pay tribute to Hurston, the writer the most famous of the Harlem Renaissance.
And various ways, the city that it has become a tourist décrit- thanks to its inclusion in the tourist guide to the Florida published by The Depression- era Federal Writers Project- 'remains a place at hand.
It is also worthy, and private independent than it was in the 1930s, when Hurston said that the rural population in Florida was often reluctant to share its true thoughts with the white man, who "we with so little, do not know what he loses".
Even if it is the year of the election of a black president, Senator Barack Obama, who has also cited an open dialogue on the issue of race, many here remain cautious the view from abroad.
"We are very careful about how to tell the story" said Hortense Jones, 59, resident for always and the oldest paroissienne of the city.
"It must be in line with reality.
Eatonville has long been defined as a paradox of triumph and fighting.
It represents both a historical model of a takeover of blacks and a community of nearly 2,400 people where the poverty rate is twice the national average.
It is a central point but also an example of rural culture black sudiste- a few times scorned, other times acclamée- reminiscent of the birth of slavery.
Which explains why the residents are both proud and protectors.
The interest in the image of Eatonville born with Zora, that everyone here is Hurston.
It presented his hometown the world through books sincere, full of dialect, such as "mules and Men" (1935) and "" their Eyes were watching God "(1937).
Five paragraphs in the guide to the Florida transformèrent this city, located just outside of Route 17, a road that runs through the centre of Florida, often forgotten, which in black and chapter in the history of the human drama.
Such a bold drum in life as in literature, Hurston led readers the shop of ownership of the first mayor of Eatonville, Mr Joe Clarke, who was then divided into several private parties.
Last "the road on the left," writing it, "you will find the modern public school brown and white, with its gardens and these areas of game well maintained that Howard Miller has always taken care, although he knows just read and write.
It did in addition to mention of the new husband of Widow Dash and wrote that Lee Glenn "sells drinks of any kind and everything that can serve the people of way.
So, in just 100 words, Hurston to a combined Eatonville self government but also analphabétisation, on remariage, and sex.
Of course, Fodor was not the case.
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciates.
Zora has described the reality "said it Dinkins, 90 years ago a young girls of Johnson that Hurston was immortalised, citing the songs without colour, interpreted by men who have recognised their beauty."
It he: "Some people have not enjoyed".
We remember always Hurston as a person and eccentric, which was frequently after his family has moved to Jacksonville, Fla.
Augustus Franklin, 77, rappela that Hurston was usual in the city without warning, on board a large Chevrolet, a cigarette in the mouth and was wearing trousers here, where even today, we are proud of traditional clothes.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin told, while many are moquaient of it.
"People were always happy to see Zora" he said.
But he adds moreover, in his chair of the patio romance post that gives on Lake Sabelia, where Hurston was certainly entitled, that "it was never too long".
Has the death of Hurston in 1960, it was poor and his books were out of production.
Eatonville and the world seemed to have forgotten.
Although it was once a star of literature, a contemporary Langston Hughes and the only black woman at Barnard College of the 1920s, it was buried in a fall in Fort Pearce from any, Fla, where she lived.
Has Eatonville, no great commemoration, or mark for the general public.
I do not believe that they have understood the contribution or the legacy that it's in the world "said Valérie Boyd, author of" Wrapped in Rainbows ", a biography of Hurston published in 2003.
A crucial moment came in the 1980s.
Public officials of Orange County wanted to build a motorway to five ways to the town to replace the Boulevard Kennedy, main street in two ways of the community.
The development of Orlando has already prompted Interstate 4 up to the west of the city.
The proposal was made while Eatonville was just a difficult time in its history.
Forced integration, among other things, put an end to the isolation relatively idyllic of the community.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred the gates of the community.
"Then, a gang of young whites were launch oranges or objects against people sitting on the side" said Mr Franklin.
"A woman is dead."
They launched a watermelons of their car '.
In a letter from 1955 to The Orlando Sentinel, Hurston questions the request of the Supreme Court to a forced integration, defining its decision in Brown v. Board of Education "insulting rather than glorifieuse of my race '.
Residents proclaim now that the elimination of racial segregation in schools, although in some positive aspects, has weakened the cohesion of Eatonville and weakens the confidence of the young.
"Black children had used to be embrassés- I remember bien- we embrace our master the morning and evening as" said Nathiri N.Y., daughter of it Dinkins and head in-chief of the protection of the Community of Eatonville, a non-profit group.
It lasted, he added, until teachers and students came only more of the same place.
"You do not embrasses tone white teacher because it is blanc- I want to say that there is now a line of demarcation cultural" said Ms Nathiri.
Civil rights, moreover, have helped to create space for many other Zora Neale Hurston- black writers, actors and artists who went in addition to the damage, as it, army of a cheerful confidence own and guidelines such as: "How can they be depriving the pleasure of my company!"
It is beyond me. "
In 1975, the writer Alice Walker went on the grave anonymous Hurston and began to fight to revive its reputation.
Five years after, a biography lauded on Hurston carried out by Robert E. Hemenway, a true bestseller, the réintroduisit and American cannons.
The project of the motorway happened just when the girl the most famous of Eatonville had recovered its appeal.
And this time the old neighbours of Hurston see it as a sauveuse.
The community has begun to hold a festival Hurston to demonstrate the catastrophic consequences that would create the motorway.
Hundreds of fans came to the inauguration of the festival two years after, and many back in January, to commemorate.
After many years, the contée has rejected the proposal of the motorway.
"The fiasco of the motorway to five ways, very fast, a genuine civic pride" said Ms. Nathiri.
Ms Boyd summed up the very saying that "Zora saved Eatonville".
The victory against the project of the motorway enabled it to change its own image.
People non-resident, as Rachelle Munson, a lawyer who frequent our church depuis1993, began to come in large numbers, and residents were beginning to reconsider the past.
Eatonville is classified historic city since 1998.
A library single-issue (of course) ouvra Hurston in 2006, on a wonderful Kennedy Boulevard, repavé.
Today, Eatonville is an anomaly in Florida: To six miles of Orlando, it can at any time see themselves as a back street after a summer rainy day, small as it was when it was founded by 27 black families in the 1880's.
(Today there are 90 percent of blacks)
Foreigners who come to discover the history of Eatonville, its raison d'être, are still treated with caution.
We must ask for permission for most of the interviews, and some choses- as the walls of the old church of Eatonville, painted by the white man, illustrating of black men in the champs- should not be photographed.
Much to Eatonville, as Ms Jones, a teacher courageous and which has a low for the red lively, have always fear that their insular community is understood.
However, given the expansion of the festival Hurston, a certain level of local pride has emerged.
Young people in particular, tend to be regarded as Hurston Eatonville its entire race: Beautiful, problematic and all, or better or worse, but also proud, creative, bosseuse, crazy and mixed that other racial and ethnic groups in America.
That is sincere civic affection that is meant in the voice of the nephew of Mr Franklin, Edwin Harvey, 18, who plans to return to Eatonville after the college to work for the local government or for the forces of Police, who need additional forces.
And even the youngest as Alondra and Alexia Kenon of 11ans, twins of Winter Park, seem to have learned properly the description Eatonville.
"Most people, who are in this area, will think, 'Oh, this city has nothing compared to other" Alondra Kenon said after the mass Sunday.
But if you stop and take the time to look at the history, it is a very beautiful city ".
Here in New York, all speak fluent finance.
Despite everything, nothing has changed.
If tourists in Manhattan was far from the newsstand and giant TV screens of Times Square, they do not make that they are in the eye of the storm.
Never they might think that in the offices in glass and nest of bee above their tète, bankers and hedge fund managers who monopolize New York, are the worst "working day at the office" since the fall of 1929.
The men continue to squeeze on the pavements, with their trolleys and their shelves of muffins for meetings matinières.
The Latin are always between the residential buildings, as 50 shirts mules, a glossy hung a yoke prepared on his shoulders.
The collar workers continue to queue to buy their sandwich matinier merchants to happen, and it is impossible to find a taxi between 16h and 19h in the week.
I had not felt the crisis despite the stories completely pessimistic until this afternoon when I décidai to open a new savings bank.
Fortunately that I had planned to work at the end of the afternoon, because I découvrais to my local subsidiary of JP Morgan Chase, two dozen people queuing.
Not before throwing the cashier, or to withdraw of the species or make a payment, but before the counter of customer service, where the usual customers where their checkbooks, tourists were the direction for the shop Macy, and the new customers were of Auditors.
Most of those in front of me, I apprendrais Starr later, my 'personal banker allowed', were all the queue for the same reason that me.
Not in the same way, because they had already withdrawn their economies of smaller banks, such as those of New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Staten Island.
They have withdrawn their money on savings accounts of so-called thrifts (such a society of the building), associations of credit, and the type of savings banks and their local subsidiaries which do that in a state, and who say treat customers as their families.
In a recent past, 15 of these banks have failed.
In recent days, Washington Mutual, a bank in the capital of $327 has made use of the syndic of bankruptcy, and while the New Yorkers covered in the home for the weekend at this Friday evening, another bank, Wachovia, the savings accounts of a value of $440 million, sought désespéramment a buyer for the save.
The office and employees of shops which are in front of me, frightened of another potential debacle, have transferred money to a bank that their reliable, seems to be the most rescue on Wall Street.
Of New Yorkers any have become very familiar to the world of finance in recent weeks.
"I heard a woman to my local supermarket Chinese, talk on the phone of Lehman Brothers, the bank that has failed, and his thin CEO Dick Fuld, with the same familiarity she may have to criticise a colleague.
And Lyn, the uniformed doorman of my building, has changed the subject of our usual conversation about Brad and Angelina or shipments of my commercial of fruit and vegetables.
She said to me, following my visit to the bank. "I put my savings in the market for Monetary Fund.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
Graves Muslim desecrated when Austria fluctuates to the right.
Heinz-Christian Strache, which has abandoned the right of the Austrian Freedom Party, and Filip Dewinter of the Belgian right Vlaams Belang, take part in a demonstration to present the organisation 'cities against the Islamisation "in Antwerp, on Thursday 17 January 2008.
They wear road signs of mosques removed in red.
The Police accuses the right-wing extremists had desecrated an Austrian Muslim cemetery, at the end of the victory of political parties of the extreme right wing the general election of the country.
More than 90 graves were severely damaged the graveyard of Traun, near Linz, between the night on Friday morning, according to the police, a campaign.
Criminals have painted on several graves, such as the Jewish symbols Etoile of David; the detectives believe, however, that it could have been done to disguise the feeling of hatred of extremists to the Muslim immigrants.
This accident could be somehow related to the elections.
A spokesman of the Community Islamic local said to be "deeply shocked" to the announcement of this desecration, which comes just for religious month of Ramadan, which is coming to an end.
Austria think seriously about regain his courage, following his oscillation to the right in the parliamentary elections yesterday.
The two right-wing parties that have raflé almost 30 percent of the votes, the Freedom Party and the Alliance for the Future of Austria, led a campaign against immigration. Some of their slogans were even considered, according to the criticism, as xenophobic.
Heinz-Christian Strache, the head of the Freedom Party who won more than 18 percent of the votes, conducted its campaign against wearing headscarves and burkas, and has even expressed its opposition to the food alaha.
During his final race in Vienna, he spoke of "a European brotherhood" to avoid the rise of Islam.
The two parties are trying to prevent the building of mosques and minarets, saying that they would be a political symbol of the Islamisation of Austria and Europe.
The polls and analyses made just after the elections, have defined the extreme right as the political bloc the height of the country, which is demonstrated by the majority of young voters who has made a difference, because concerned about their future in the European Union.
Gary Glitter forbidden to travel abroad.
The courts have banned the rock star glamour, Gary Glitter, accused of sexual abuse of children, expatriation in France and Spain.
The sexes have imposed a ban on Glitter six months after he had spoken to the authorities who have under control, its intention to go to Spain from France.
In Kent Police had given the travel ban last Thursday after having demonstrated the sexes the guilt of Glitter for sexual abuse on child.
Glitter, or his real name Paul Gadd, was not present at the hearing the court of jurisdiction limited of Ashford, but was represented by his lawyer Corker Binning.
A court spokesman said 'Thursday, 25 September in court of Ashford, Kent Police has asked for an application to prevent Paul Gadd to travel in France and Spain until 25 March.
"Paul Gadd was not present when".
Glitter, 64ans, has informed the authorities that he wanted to go abroad, leaving to be recorded in the lists of accused of sexual abuse.
It is bound to inform the authorities if it wants to go abroad for more than three days.
It must also inform the police, 7 days before his starting date scheduled.
If he does not have its movements to the authorities, he could face a sentence of up to five years in prison.
The police in Kent has said that it would not discuss specific cases or travel in the potential Glitter contée.
A spokesman for the Kent Police said "The police in Kent will do everything necessary to protect our children as those from abroad.
"We believe that it is easier to monitor someone who remains in the United Kingdom because we have devices able to manage any potential risks, much more effective.
"Protect the people of Kent is the intention the most expensive to the Police of Kent, and we are closely monitoring the behaviour of those who are accused of sexual abuse in the region, in order to minimise the risks to the public."
. Glitter returned to the UK last month, having served 27 months in a Vietnamese prison for abused two girls, respectively, of 10 and 11 years.
When he was released, Glitter took the plane to Bangkok where it would have the board for a flight to London.
But he said they do not feel good, and refused to go to London.
The authorities Thaï the bloquèrent the passport control, and in the end, it out Hong Kong.
The Chinese authorities have refused entry on their territory, and has therefore been forced to leave in Bangkok, the police Thaï and immigration officers have insisted that he is back in England.
Finally arrived at Terminal 3 of Heathrow Airport on 22 August and has remained while his lawyer, David Corker, went to the court of jurisdiction limited to Uxbridge, West London, for the recorded in the list of people accused of sexual abuse, as required by Scotland Yard.
In the past, Glitter was already served a sentence of four months in the UK, for detention of images of child abuse.
A source of the Ministry of Interior said that Jacqui Smith, the Home Affairs Minister has been reassured and happy to know that Glitter was banned from travelling in France and Spain.
"I photograph the master outside the scene to capture of the elements of his character" Günther Bauer - photographer
Or heels of transgressing or clothes.
The essence of the great masters of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, released all tensions to get the relaxed aspect of the man or woman.
On the one hand the artist.
On the other, the person.
Inseparable except in the unknown intimacy, in these times of the public, where we discover to intimate and gestures of sight stolen of artists who do not care about up on stage.
German Günther Bauer mixture in "intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people 'the théâtralité of a few stage with singers, dancers and guitaristes with this side least-known artists.
In this project, the photographer takes up the special iconography of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco from different angles.
Included in the programming of the Month of the photograph Flanders, the exhibition "reflects the international importance of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, more every day," explains the creator, which clarifies that "intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people '" can be anyone but, having seen the pictures, the observer realise that they are not typical images of artists on stage.
These people photographiées "in the street artists' are able to pass on stage of the passion, the sadness, the joy... in exciting the public.
To capture the moment of personality of these artists we should not make photos on stage.
They have a personality and a unique character.
I am interested it was to create an intimate atmosphere to be able to capture with the camera of moments of personality of the stars of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco ".
With the popular song festival "of Mines," Bauer began in 1997 a long journey to photographed the singers, dancers guitaristes or with a camera to mark.
Portraits of which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, given the photograph classic.
The implementation of various means stylistic breaks with the classic side of the image, with a touch of modernity, this reflects the perception of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco in Bauer: "A very traditional music with roots that is changing and surprises us every day."
It is not the dancing and singing itself, but of personality and the nature of the artist who ogre the public with his art.
The search for the essential and the magic has been the constant of this work that is presented these days to the gallery El Fotómata.
The stars of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco as Diego El Cigala, Chano Lobato, Cristina Hoyos, Enrique Morente, El Lebrijano, Antonio Canales, Vicente Amigo, among others, are part of the selection made from around seventy artists photographed.
The project has turned into a anthologie the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, which will soon be published in a book of collecting portraits exposed to the gallery.
Passion for the portraits of Bauer has led to repeat the idea two years ago with the "portraits of old athletes' ('SportARTproject").
Although the concepts are different in "intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people ', the photographer admits that he loves photographed the portrait of people know them, and to enter their lives for a moment more or less long.
I believe that in the photograph the portrait is the kind of the most difficult.
You trouves in front of people, of characters that sometimes you do not know or are you just a few minutes to make them a photograph.
Despite these circumstances, as photographer, I always try that my ideas reality ".
This collection of portraits of the current intoxicating spirit of flamenco entitled 'intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people', is exposed to the gallery El Fotómata, located at No. 20 of the streets of the Mata (street parallel to the Peupleraie of Hercules), which will be open until 16 October.
Vargas Llosa confess that the novel that he says is "real courage"
The novel is taking place in places that nobody knows and addresses issues unknown, but once again, Mario Vargas Llosa is determined to move the new draft that it works, a novel that Roger Casemant main character, an Irish nationalist who lived 20 years in Congo, which happened in the Amazon.
The favourite to win the Nobel Prize for Literature has said yesterday at the Hay festival Segovia that the novel, which currently holds "is a real courage" and that "all shows that it should not write".
"If I was reasonable, I would not, but I will do so and I hope the end," – t he concluded in his speech at the festival of exchange of ideas and thoughts which saw for four days in the town of the aqueduct a hundred writers, historians and journalists and thousands of people.
The author of "The city and the dogs' was the man most expected the third edition of the festival and has fulfilled his contract.
Vargas Llosa, who won the price of the Hay Festival to the majority of the participants, was packed auditorium at the scene Juan Bravo.
The host of the Festival, Felix Romeo, was confronted by public fascinated who has not seen the last time during which the Peruvian, with a staggering memory and with a great deal of humour, has described the birth of his literary vocation, which is due to "its thirst to read" and "to live new experiences"; how he wrote a "very methodical" thanks to the hard work of documentation, correcting and in redrafting part of the text to face a "lack of inspiration"; how Faulkner, Victor Hugo and Alexandre Dumas have influenced his vocation and how his memories inspire his novels.
The Spanish-American novelist acknowledged that "there is no way" to measure and whether the books are changing life. "But I refuse to believe that literature is a pure amusement, a short-lived experience," said Vargas Llosa, who said that it "has the effects" and "makes people less similar", because it has asked the writers' not give in to the frivolity "and to assume their vocation.
The wrong time to spoil the rat of Pozoblanco
The party of racing banderilles which concluded the bulls of the rat of Pozoblanco has been suspended yesterday morning, after the horse toréadors to have established that the ring was unworkable.
In this way, the organizing committee, in accordance with Fermín Bohórquez, Pablo Hermoso of Mendoza and Leonard Hernández, has decided to suspend the celebration of the race bulls.
The wrong time has hit the fair, because ultimately two parties on three could not take place.
Saturday that is the rain that prevented the celebration of the second race bulls planned.
Has the poster, there were José Luis Moreno, Curro Díaz to Juan Bautista, which would have had to face in the arena of Castilblanco
And only the party took place Friday
Friday, the winner was Daniel Luque which has cut three ears and has been brought in triumph, having made the movement of arms against the bull with taste and aesthetic.
The afternoon Alejandro Talavante concluded on two banderilles planted on the back of the bull and listen cut that the terraces discovered applauded more than his fight in itself with the bull.
Worse for El text, which entered the arenas of Los Llanos without penalty or glory.
In his fight with the second bull, after a fight much better, it was done to make by most of the public.
Police control of a van in the province of taken: Two thousand kilos of hashish found
Least ten five hours of the morning.
Traffic control of the police in Euskadi (the Ertzaintza) on the border of the policy of Armiñón (taken).
Police officers stopped two occupants of a van and the last two undertake the brain.
Its cargo, more than two tonnes of hashish, what stop them.
The police have pursued and have arrested two occupants, a man of 28 years, identified as A. A. J., according to the information disclosed by the Department of the Interior of the Basque Government.
The individual arrested was accused of drug trafficking and falsification of documents.
The incident took place when various officials of the Unit of the illicit traffic taken control of the realization of vehicles on the N-1, on the border of the policy of Armiñón.
They were about to stop a van to inspect when the driver has broken the orders, suddenly accelerated and control has begun.
The police began their continued until the vehicle stops two miles up the low-hand, where the two occupants took to flee in a forested area.
The Basque police have finally arrested one of the two occupants and seized the 2.178 kilograms of hashish that they were carrying and they have found after inspected the van, a Iveco Daily.
The subsequent part of the vehicle was charged with ballots of hashish, and then they have made his transfer to a police station for a thorough inspection and to weigh drugs.
More, officials have noted that the registration plate was "forgery" because it did not correspond to that in writing on the grey card of the van, this is also why they have blamed the detainee a crime of falsification of documents.
The Ertzaintza continues its investigation to stop the other suspect, who has managed to escape and to determine the origin of drugs seizure.
The detainee, A. A. J. of 28 years, has been in custody for achieving the various steps and will be judged in the next few hours.
The actress Heather Locklear arrested for having conducted under the effect of a drug
The actress Heather Locklear, the famous Amanda of the series TV Melrose Place, was arrested this weekend in Santa Bárbara (California) for having conducted under the effect of a drug.
A witness has a view to make strange games in trying to break his garage in Montecito, according to a spokesman for the police patrol of California unveiled to People magazine.
The witness said that at 4.30 p.m., Locklear "based on substance on the accelerator, doing a lot of noise, trying to get out of the car garage, and going backwards several times, she roula on his sunglasses".
Shortly after, the witness, who initially had not recognised the actress has given that Locklear has been arrested in the middle of the motorway and is out of his vehicle.
This person, at that time, called the emergency services because "it was concerned about the life of Locklear".
When the Police patrol came it has found the actress sitting inside his vehicle, which is blocking partially the road.
"She had the air disoriented," that is why the agents have led to the center for drugs and alcohol to achieve a test.
According to a spokesman for the police, the actress has been cooperative and alcohol abuse has been removed from the beginning, "according to the observation police officers at first sight, we thought that Locklear was under the influence of a medicine".
Locklear has been arrested is suspected of having led by the effect of a substance that has not been specified and has been imprisoned at 19.00 hours and released a few hours later.
Two months ago, Locklear has emerged from the clinic in Arizona, where she was interned for care of a nervous breakdown.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the case Silva
The general coordinator and Member of the United Left, Gaspar Llamazares, said today that it is the regional federation to take a decision on the case of the former advisor of Youth and Sport of the City of Seville, Francisco Manuel Silva, who resigned last week after being accused of treatment with his family.
"In these cases, I am very federalist, and this will be the Andalusian organisation which will have to assume its responsibilities," said Llamazares as regards the behaviour of the political party that it will adopt in the City Council in Seville.
However, the leader of the United Left has called for investigations show "transparency" for the irregularities that Silva could make: "The United Left has always defended cases of this kind to have a maximum degree of transparency".
He also stressed that the political party has "very strict ethical codes for all the officials'.
"Sangre de Mayo," the bet dared to Garci
Based on the accounts of Benito Pérez Galdós, José Luis Garci récrée the famous battle of Spaniards against the French in "Sangre de Mayo," which is the film the most ambitious its filmographie with nearly 15 million budget.
The film maker has tried to put in the many characters and illustrate the social analysis "he has always admired in the work of the famous novelist, he explained today during the presentation of the film, with Quim Gutiérrez and Paula Echevarría at the head of the long list of players.
The film a period of more than two and a half hours, "Sangre de Mayo" will make its way out to cinemas on Friday, which will become a TV series for Telemadrid of more than four hours.
Great admirer of literature of Galdós, José Luis Garci ensures to have done with this film "a dream of child 'through Esperanza Aguirre, who was in charge, three years ago to turn a commemorative film for the two hundred years of 2 May Madrid, something he has always accepted when the narrative stuck to the historical facts.
The 15 million provided by the Madrid Commune are for Garci a "unique opportunity" to replicate with the settings and clothing appropriate the atmosphere "a Spain who was out of leader in the fight, since the fight for independence has led people to rebellion under the rule of Ferdinand VII," he said.
But the film maker regret not having secured funding for films as "leader Alatriste" or "The ghosts of Goya" - more than double that achieved for "Sangre de Mayo ’ –, because it has not been able to turn a few scenes written in a script signed by Horacio Valcárcel, with whom he has worked in almost all his career.
The film maker of "Volver empezar" has influenced on its usual way to work on the staging of the players, with which he used to repeat before starting the film and that there is no role, since it seems "humiliating" and considers that "the role of the filmmaker is to go to the cinema, theatre and to be informed".
Many players in "Sangre de Mayo" repeated in front of the camera, as Miguel Rellán, Carlos Larrañaga or Fernando Guillén Cuervo.
Four times candidate for the Oscar (he has won a), Garci believe that the three films candidates representing Spain this year at the Academy of Hollywood, "Sangre de Mayo," "Sept French" ping pong tables and ultimately the winner, "The tournesols blind," are not representative of the young Spanish film, "which should be better known," he said.
With this film Garci does not expect a price.
"At the beginning you think you travailles for posterity, then you realise you travailles for prosperity, and now you happy to make a film in addition," explains Garci after more than 30 years of professional career.
Isabelle Bayón is in the skin of the dancer sévillane Tórtola Valencia
A dancer sévillane will pay tribute to a dancer also sévillane.
Carmen Tórtola Valencia, daughter of a father Catalan (Florenç Tórtola Ferrer) and mother Andalusian (Georgina Valencia Valenzuela), was born in the neighborhood of Triana and at the age of three years will go live in London with his family.
It was a young girl free dance and specialist of oriental dances.
It was an exciting life, a pioneer of the release of the woman, as Isadora Duncan, Virginia Woolf or Sarah Bernhardt.
It was Buddhist and végétarienne and plaida for the abolition of a corset that prevented the free movement of women.
The life of this woman who was the history of the dance in Europe in the interwar, has fascinated Isabelle Bayón.
"I wanted to work with Pepa Gamboa and the Commission has proposed to interpret the dancer sévillane Tórtola Valencia and I felt that incredible".
According to the dancer, "we are not trying to tell his life but to translate its way of thinking.
The titles of his dances are reminiscent of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco.
, "dancing and the butterfly" reminded me of a Cuban popular dance and "dance of the snake" to some tangos.
His dancing was sensuelle and they told me that my way of dance was identical to its own, "she says.
Staging has made thanks to two outstanding contributions: That of Miguel Poveda which chantera new Isabela in one of his performances, as he had done to "The Puerta abierta"; and that Professor Matilde Coral, who was exceptionally well liked to work with the one that was his pupil.
"Matilde Tórtola transformed into a mature figure.
I am pleased because it has agreed to play a role in my work and I honour ".
Staging is also thanks to music composition and guitares of Jesús Torres is Paco Arriaga, the popular song of Michel Ortega, el Pulga are Moi of Morón; the percussions of El Pájaro, and the breaches of Rafa El Viola and the cooperation of a player, Juanfra Juárez, "which plays the role of the eternal companion of this kind of artists who were considered divas".
This can also tell, in a way, the life of this woman who has exhibée in places so far, especially for the time, as in India, the United States, or Russia, but also throughout Europe, since it was usually in London.
"I wanted to the back because I think it is these women who have an enormous influence in their time and now no one knows and highlights his work," says Bayón.
The show begins at 8.30 p.m. at the scene Lope of Vega
The publication of "Journal of a poet recently married" concludes the Triennat
The presentation of the first edition illustrated the "Journal of a poet recently married" in the church of Saint Stephen' to New York, where Juan Ramón Jiménez is married with Zenobia in March 1916, is part of the activities by the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia to celebrate the "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" (2006-2008), organised to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the concession of the Nobel Prize for Literature and their deaths.
In this way, "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" comes to an end with a repeat of this work with Congress International held in New York, with the restoration of the Museum exhibition Prize and with the peripatetic "Juan Ramón Jiménez: This peuplier of light" which was inaugurated in May last year and who, having travelled in the various provinces Andalusian, will go to New York at the International Congress.
In the same way, the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia has bought eight hundred copies of "Journal of a poet recently married," published by Pedro Tabernero and illustrated by Jacobo Pérez-Enciso, to perpetuate the work of one of the most famous Andalusian poets.
America very fond least without Paul Newman
"God created the time of persons perfect
Paul Newman was part of that. "
This sentence is the actress Sally field, who has worked with him in 'absence of malice ", and illustrates the despair of American cinema, and America, faced with the idea striking that Newman is no longer in the world.
It was difficult to obtain an Oscar
There was more since 2007.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
It was a blow for everyone.
"Sometimes what one feels goes beyond any expression, and now I have lost a great friend," began crying Robert Redford, "my life and my country were better thanks to its existence.
No one was afraid to go to ridicule or to exaggerate.
One of the fathers of cinema and the homeland died during a particularly obscure, where terrorists and the stock markets are afraid, the feel of the American is low, desperately searching for reasons of dignity.
When times are tough and without reason to live, there are human beings that admiration and there is no need to be Luis Cernuda to love Paul Newman.
It embodied for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
It was the enemy of Richard Nixon and the defender lost causes and overcome, as the foundation for the fight drugs created in honour of his mother died following an overdose and the creation of its own brand of organic food.
It was a victory for a country that has taken the trouble to impose against a suicidal food culture.
Expansive this wave of admiration balayait Hollywood without either the nationalities or passports.
The latest James Bond, the English Daniel Craig, noted that no James Bond died before him.
Another English, whom Sam Mendes, said that work with Newman was the top of his career.
The bad boy arrived in Australia, Russell Crowe, dared appoint Newman as his greatest inspiration.
"He has set the bar high," said George Clooney, which is perhaps the only today who is trying to enter the screen like Paul Newman: By being very honnêt and privacy serious and a long way from the objectives.
This is not always easy or possible in the jungle media today.
But there is anyone who tries, and Paul Newman is an example.
After a divorce, he has been married 50 years to Joanne Woodward were, in which it was true even if the opportunities does not enough not to be.
"But why should I eat a hamburger out of the home, if I am a beef in my fridge?", he used to joke.
The sky, it is with pride at the meeting of his daughters with its fans on earth, something that is not as usual in America.
"Among all the major roles he has interpreted, it has never been so proud that the husband dedicated, loving father, grandfather attentionné and philanthropist," he said.
Madrid in the race for the 2016 Olympic Games
And yes, the dream of many of us is that Madrid to hold the Olympic Games, after the failure in 2012, this could be achieved by 2016.
But I wonder if we are ready.
If we take the example of the race yesterday: We are not!
They call the race perfect, but I think it was the worst race to which I have never been involved.
If they had taken into account all the mistakes that occurred during the race, it would be a note éliminatoire.
But look at all in detail and from the start.
The mistakes are starting with the withdrawal of dossards, which you have to go ahead.
This is not wrong but if they do you move that would be better if they give you any (including the electronic chip shop).
And no
They did you go there only to take the dossard (first mistake, travel only for it) and (after a long queue) surprise!, there was that size would S for the jersey (second mistake, because I need a size XL)
World in which we live?
Is it to cause of the crisis that they have decided to buy the shirts small with less fabric and suddenly cheaper?
Well, this is nothing compared to what happened the day of racing.
Apart from the fact that we must go very early to withdraw the chip, the queue is 15 minutes, and we must leave his bag to back to the entry.
Waiting lasted more than 35 minutes, it is incomprehensible since 11 000 people are expected to these races.
Since there was a long queue, competitions began and we had not yet been our bag to back to the entry, although once fact, the withdrawal has been worse.
Moreover, the rain has accompanied the expectations of more than 40 minutes during which took place rebellion and assault of Baraque.
I think about 500 people have pneumonia tomorrow, and some people like me, do not even figurerons in the classification with the exact time, because of the chip that they gave me who I think has not been properly the outset.
Of course, if they were asking me to mention a perfect example of race, I would certainly not to the idea.
And I believe that we can always dreamed of becoming the host city for the 2016 Olympic Games..
Microsoft is seeking a virtual (see)
Has the conference on the emerging technologies TIM Microsoft has been presented a new system of recognition of image and human interaction, a kind of artificial Intelligence with little intelligence but able to do some basic tasks, such as call a taxi (or in the case of Microsoft, a shuttle for travel in the campus of the company) in response to what it was asked during a conversation.
With a camera and a system of recognition of forms and faces, this "see" can know how many people in the place, which they are - including remember what they occupy positions - and listen and hear the keywords of their conversations.
But also the pool in groups of conversation
In video presentation, the see detects a third person, but it understands that it is not for the group who is speaking with her and she is not part of the company.
She asked if it is here to visit someone and it said that it will respond in a few moments.
All this without blue screen.
Impressive.
But of course this is the future.
Now the company has other things on which focus on, for example, the next version of its operating system, Windows.
This week was discussed in more than a change of strategy for Microsoft.
Windows 7 will be lighter and it will no longer have as many programmes involved.
Steve Ballmer has found that if the computers were sold with the necessary instead of applications unnecessary, they would go five times faster.
This represents a discovery since Microsoft, after version version, has not been added to the functions and "perks," to Windows.
The change of strategy is welcome.
Microsoft is right, its operational system is important but also its software.
When Google chrome happened on the network, I was one of those who joined the theory that Google chrome is the first step on the part of Google to compete with Windows.
Several people have rightly pointed out that an Internet browser is not an operational system.
The operational system will always be necessary because it is essential for the hardware and software to understand.
It occupies the same function that your wife or your husband when you have to say something to your mother-in-law.
That is true.
It will never be but we must see the "death" the operational system not as an absolute truth but as a truth.
This week, Ballmer has confirmed this idea.
People are less and less attention to the operational system but increasingly the Internet browser.
We switch on the computer only to turn Firefox, Explorer offer or chromium and every day people spend more time to surf the Internet that to go of the windows.
Has used half of the applications provided with the system?
Who can most can say the least.
And Windows 7 will contain less applications, much less than Vista.
Less cumbersome, crowded month, less complex.
For the moment, Microsoft is more interested in the launch of its own online services to become an alternative to Google.
They desperately need this, indeed, and I shows you an example.
The photo present in this article, was taken earlier this month in one of the rooms of rest reserved for employees to Microsoft's Redmond.
On the distributor of drinks, a poster their request to use their own research tool Mok, "research. Our future".
In 2006, a study concluded that 66% of employees of Microsoft used Google to seek information on the Internet.
Last week a delay has happened in the new version of Windows Mobile 7.
It will not at the beginning of 2009 but by late 2009 or see in 2010.
Microsoft will surely to launch at the same time Windows 7 and Windows Mobile 7.
The phone, after all, is increasingly a computer.
But the launch of Android being late and the iPhone is already on the market, it will cost them dear.
The awesome Marcel
Pablo Picasso the assumed on the Côte d'Azur, Leonardo Di Caprio bore a diamond in the blood of Edward Zwick, Al Pacino in "The godfather of Francis Ford Coppola and is part of the holding of the Association of gay heavy-handed.
And if we start to list all his appearances, it could also mention the strapping moustachu who raised the weight in a travelling circus.
This is not a mere of male body in cotton shirt, milling and without sleeves.
The English-called 's tank but the awesome Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the other.
Firstly, by his name flamboyant - although it is known as' Marcel, which has to do with the sport as it takes the name, according to legend, boxeur Marcel Cerdan, a lover of the singer Edith Piaf.
The Marcel 's differs from the other by his cotton excellent, by his thumb unisexe, with its distinctive logo and by the Belgian flag (barely recognisable) that the shirts of bodies have the most well-known in the neck.
But attention, because the Belgian brand does not only that the tank tops.
But it also produces Sweat-shirt, Boxer Rebellion old fashioned, cardigans in cashmere, trousers in cotton, the babies, the mini-shorts...
Clothes designed for the comfort of underwear.
Even if it is a shame to be just as underwear.
They have too many charm.
'I want to become a young mother; the candidate I am not worried "
Its huge resemblance to his sister has not prevented to develop its own personality.
Monica Cruz is small but full of vitality.
Currently the sisters Cruz take very seriously their new activity in the way.
In Monica, they are not that girls fine and famous who give their behalf.
It was present at the promotion that the brand Mango has done to Paris to its new headquarters but and the presentation of the Sakharov the most important of the way that the Spanish house sponsoring.
Monica is warm and timid.
Tells us what you do in Paris.
I came to present the new collection that sister Penélope and I even have created to Mango for the new season autumn-winter, but also to attend the presentation of the second edition of Mango Awards' and 'Fashion to the dinner Opera in honour of Valentino.
A day very intense but, at the same time, exciting, we expected.
Why your new collection created to Mango for the fourth season?
The cinema of the 1950s and 1960s we dazzles and we let much for our collections.
I very much like my trip in town and observe women to see how they are dressed, how they combine their clothes, I often do.
Dancer, actress and dessinatrice, you are a woman very versatile: Is it not?
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
Since I am very small clothes plaisaient me; I désirai go to my grandmother to look in the filing of my aunt, and to see his clothes.
It was great, almost better than to go to the amusement park.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was trying to take care of my way to pay.
The dancers like a lot of dress for the courts and the tests, to look in the mirror and feel good.
And in the role of actress, when you endosses clothing at this point, you really put in the skin of the man.
Suddenly, everything is linked.
You had not long ago 30 years: Has this been hard for you?
Not at all.
I feel better than ever, my 30 years am delighted.
I find that the woman is more mature, has more experience and are relishing life with fewer problems.
The biological clock am not afraid.
I have done all the things that I wanted to do for tiny and it gave me a lot of happiness.
Then, do you become mother?
Of course, I want to become mother because my body wonder, and I want to become a young mother; I do not want to lose it.
With regard to the candidate, I don't worry.
What I will do that is to give happiness in my son and raise with a lot of love.
The cinema, you expect the individual films that you have turned last year.
It is true, I look forward to leave.
I am a woman from the scene, I am very anxious and concerned, I would like to have everything now but of course it is not possible.
I look forward to ensure the films "The última hora and In busca of the tumba of Cristo.
Has see what you think...
A few days you started on the bridge with Naomi Campbell, is it not?
Do not say that.
I am not mounted on the bridge to the blow.
Simply, Naomi Campbell has called, I have known for some time, to invite me to participate in London a parade of charity for his involvement in favour of support for women and clothing that we exhibions - I have exhibited two clothes of our collection created for Mango - were sold at auction to collect money for the NGOs of Naomi.
People that Naomi is a person central aim.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
Moreover, if right side of Naomi fascinates me.
She asked me to go up for a cause if noble, but if it had asked to make the poirier, I would have done anyway.
The important it is to make life better for women in the developing world.
Repeat offenders of drink-driving will install the system 's alcolock
The interior minister wants the driver who had more than three administrative penalties for alcohol, has to install in his vehicle a system which prevents to start the vehicle drunken driving, or if he does not.
The initiative was already announced last June and it now appears in the report by the Minister of State in which this initiative is seen as a pilot project that will last a year.
Its aim is the reintegration of the driver in road re-education courses.
The Minister of State for road safety but also the Directorate General of the Road Safety Foundation and the technological Institute for Security of the car will participate in this initiative.
According to the statistics, between 30% and 75% of drivers arrested for having led more than once drunken driving, includes the car.
The alcolock would prevent this because it is a trendy system on the vehicle which measure the rate of alcohol in the suspense and prevents to start the car if the driver does not before; or when the rate of alcohol of the driver is higher than that allowed.
Its cost is higher than 1,000 euros and is the responsibility of the driver.
In this respect, a study in the US in 2007 showed that the vehicles equipped with this device cut up to 65% of offences during the first year of installation.
And Spain it is estimated that it could save the lives of 115 people each year.
This measure is that the administrative penalties for two reasons: Face these behaviors before they become criminal offences.
And facilitate its implementation, as the legal reform can be made by ordinary routes but, however, the reform made by criminal means requires a reform of the organic law.
The system is not yet available on the Spanish market trade in any form, although some vehicles industrial and office has already an experimental basis.
Precisely tomorrow, Congress of Deputies will vote an initiative of the Spanish Socialist Party, which proposes to settle in school buses this system as has been done in France.
Mexico 's peep-toes without
Has 5.40 p.m., official time, the plane of the Spanish air force in which the Princes of Asturias traveled landed in the warehouse president of the airport Benito Juárez of Mexico DF.
The sun was on the eve of their but its shelves obligeaient yet to put out by way of visière to see the royal couple get off the plane.
At the foot of the stairs, Ambassador Spanish and other authorities were present.
A few hours before I asked in the street, the taxi driver, if it was aware that the Spanish Princes were visiting the city to conclude their official trip.
- oh, well, we cannot go to the airport for customers to this time... Were you by or …?
No, not Mr, I am Spanish but I have lived here thinking two years.
- Ah, well...
But the Mexican press knows who are the Princes of Asturias and knows the importance of the journey.
They are several to wait in the warehouse at the airport near the red carpet and a military row of 27 marine soldiers.
Prince is smiling and dressed in blue sea, Princess, when it has the hair is dressed up in the wind, very quite soberly and is not its peep-toes' normal '; perhaps they had said that a storm threatened.
They are a brief break with the photographers before moving in the room where the official all awaits them.
Has the door of the hotel where they remain, one of the four major hotels of the city, a journalist rigolo Mexican television awaits them.
The price the most prestigious fashion
There is certainly no appropriate place in the world to present a way that Paris and there is certainly no living artist more extraordinary and good live that Valentino.
Mango has just presented the second edition of the Botón-Mango Fashion Awards, in order to strengthen international image of the new talent of the way.
The winner will be rewarded by a price of 300,000 euros.
Sandrina Fasoli yesterday, the Belgian exit winner of the first edition, watched its models in the window of Mango the 54 Boulevard Haussmann in Paris and it began crying almost of emotion.
Of course it is the second largest shop of the brand in Europe that has been opened with 1.335 square metres of surface.
The first shop in London.
The events, and the desire to thank the designer Valentino, chairman of the jury of the competition, have fact that we were in a luxurious dinner at the opera Garnier of Paris.
Nearby table with such as that of the extraordinary family Chagals, the presidential table prepared by Mango, seemed even more spectacular.
With big on the heart and bear it, because of the recent death of his brother, Nati has put a clothing and a couple of Mango parures of ELAH, which cut off the breath, below, arms and hands with his son Luis - a good man of almost two metres high – it has accompanied Valentino to his dinner prepared in his honour.
Andik, the owner of Mango galant, a man, and the Baron of Rotchil have finished the evening without jacket because they had lent to two women.
Monica Cruz, who has presented to the shop with a pair of trousers and a shirt — its own collection, and for the dinner was a roll up our sleeves in Little long sexy and black dress, has moved when during the night visit to the opera, accompanied by Goya Toledo, they have shown the Chamber of repetitions of ballet and bearing in mind the good old days, it has taken a bar and it made a gesture of a large is complied.
Inés Sastre has not been for the visit of dependence of the palace, but it has shown us before on his mobile phone photos of her son.
The next morning, we have had the pleasure of seeing Olivier Martínez – another fine man who drives a motorbike - and John Travolta, who arrived at the intercontinental Hotel in Paris, with its into, goats and asked in advance, that there are no smell in his bedroom.
Stars in the starry sky of Paris.
Oh there is life.
1001, the number antistress
It is not only 1,000 but 1001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of daily life.
And to top it all, they are all listed in a book which will bring the relax bookshops 30 September.
The wake up-morning we are sad when it sounds almost every morning at 7 a.m., but it is even worse when you think the pace of storm that we must present life.
The office is synonymous with tension and the computer of pain in the back.
Stress is evil of the twenty-first century.
But there is no one or two methods to combat fatigue daily and the problems linked to the world of work.
But 1001, or a more or less.
Apart from the positions of yoga, the classic massage or spa treatments, Susannah 's Marriott meeting in the pages of a book' s all a menu of methods suited to the taste and the time.
Work antistress is entitled '1001 ways to relax and will be among the booksellers directly from the publisher Pearson Alhambra and DA.
If someone believes that it is not possible to achieve peace in lieus as the work or through personal relations, this is crazy manual is such a belief.
Moreover, the manual offers other methods as contact with the nature or natural 100% of revenue which help to relax.
If the adrenalin does not put in your to restore the balance of your body and if the stress has become a problem, it is time to sit in the sofa, from its spirit and focus on the reading.
Speak in sleeping
A few children speak during the night.
I do not refer to those who woke up very awake by about something that happened the day before, but the children who speak during their sleep.
The first time this has happened that may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
It is a benign lack of sleep called somniloquie.
It is quite often, especially among children and adolescents.
It is sure that there are more than one who speaks during the night.
This phenomenon can be very sporadic (once in life, for example, associated with an episode of strong foot), or a more regular (every day, once a week, once a month...), the day after the child does not remember anything.
There is no single, which determines its appearance
They are often linked to other changes of sleep as the nightmares, the night terrors which were, the énurésies pipi to bed at night (be) or sleepwalking, but it is not always the case.
As we have said before, they can also be associated with very high fever, to situations of stress or become agitated.
In any case it is a phenomenon little studied.
The intensity with which it happens is also very different.
It may be that he speaks with a small, quiet voice, with words alone, murmurs or with cries of tears, long speeches...
In cases where the somniloquie is very common, it would be good to see the child and consult a specialist, to see if there is a problem which causes a lot of anxiety and in order to obtain an explanation for this problem.
We have said that this is a distortion benign, that is why there is no treatment, unless it is linked to a distortion of sleep that can be treated (for example, if it is linked to a apnée of sleep or of stress).
What we can do is take into account a number of very simple precautions such as:
Try not to arouse the child before to go to sleep.
Therefore seek games calm and avoid the programmes or television series that are more or less violent.
With children very nervous and who have difficulty relax, relaxation techniques can be used to help calm internally.
This will allow children to have a more peaceful sleep.
As soon as the somniloquies are trying to stay calm.
Remind you that they are harmless for the child and that the next day it will remember most of what happened.
Useful advice
Do not wake up.
It is unnecessary since it is unconscious and you réveilleriez.
Even if he speaks, he is sleeping and is therefore.
Remind you that if it is very anxious several times, it is advisable to consult a doctor or check what causes both of anxiety in children.
If you understand what he says (which is not usual), have not the temptation to the question to obtain information.
You will achieve nothing, because in sleeping, it is not aware to hold his thinking.
More, you will hear what he said, but you will not know what it is dreaming, suddenly made attention to the way in which you interpréterez information and the conclusions you draw from this.
Are ever to the child that you can ask for the night to know his secret.
Not inform.
This causes a lot of anxiety.
In conclusion, don't worry, it is nothing of bad, it is an episode that has lasted only a few minutes.
Illhaeusern finally...
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory on the ground after a long period of famine.
Without making a great match, the yellow and black have created the largest number of occasions and have managed to turn a profit of the match.
The pace was not very supported during this meeting where the attackers were difficult to speak.
After a first attempt by the captain visitor Kauffmann which frôlait the lucarne on an unrelenting far, Illhaeusern slightly would take precedence and in turn Fonderflick far, then with Hirn above, Roman the end of the foot or Diebold tickle had the defence of Dannemarie.
, it was bloc in the middle ground and it was just the moving Riahi at the forefront of the attack.
The start of the second half-time would be decisive with first two occasions signed Riahi and Temporale for Dannemarie, and immediately after the opening of the score for the Illhousiens by marshes, well positioned to use a ball rejected on a first attempt to Diebold (53rd is).
But the buteur Illhousiens will not be able to enjoy his happiness long and will be forced to return to the changing rooms a dozen minutes later and leaving its coéquipiers in digital inferiority.
But Dannemarie will not know benefit and will not cause major problems with an 11 illhousien who has just fallen slightly for "compacter" his defence, except in the last few seconds to play when, after a big way, the ball was very close to the transversal.
Sarkozy at the meeting of fishermen angry
Before off for the US, Nicolas Sarkozy will take a detour by the Kingdom.
With the show of strength of fishermen who have severely disrupted Monday the access of several ports in Brittany and Normandy, the President of the Republic has decided to go on Tuesday morning at the port of Guilvinec, in the Finisterre, to meet their representatives.
They have promised to welcome him "in a constructive spirit" and hope that it "will come with concrete proposals".
A presidential visit comes at the same time quune General Assembly committee of the "crisis" created by fishermen Breton for measures in the face of soaring oil prices, which reached a record of 1.14 euro per litre on average.
According to the spokesman for lElysée David Martinon, President "will discuss with them solutions that can be imagined to help their businesses to regain competitiveness and to secure the conditions of jobs and pay sailors'.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to the ground by fishermen.
Tuesday morning, they have conducted operations snails in the French and the Calvados, causing traffic jams of nearly 10 km.
The port of recreational craft of Quiberon was also blocked, but the connections to Sleeping-island not stopped.
Filtering a dam has been put in place on the peninsula of Quiberon.
The sailors have already shown on Monday their determination by burning, from the beginning, tyres and deposits of fuel pellets to the ports of Brest, and Lorient, while the demonstrations were to Concarneau or St Brieuc.
The movement has spread to other ports of the Atlantic coastline and the Channel, as the sands of Olonne, in the Vendée, where fish were idle, or at Le Havre, where two dozen vessels have blocked ship movements of trade.
Fishermen in The Turballe and Croisic, in the Loire-Atlantic, have stopped in the evening the blockade of the important refinery Total of Donges.
Those of Boulogne-sur-Mer have decided to wait for the holding of the meeting on Wednesday at the Ministry for deciding any actions.
The Guilvinec, the 'crisis' committee should decide on Tuesday of follow-up to the movement and its participation in lentrevue at the Ministry of Agriculture and Fisheries in Paris.
But some fishermen in Brittany do not want to be represented by leaders of the National Committee on Fisheries, which has not supported their movement.
"The strike will continue," because "the fishermen do not keep" and "do not want to travel to Paris', for example, has announced Liliane Cariou, the chairman of the Committee on Fisheries of Lorient.
Professional fishermen, who do not pay taxes on diesel, now pay about 50 cents per litre but they believe that the threshold of profitability of a boat is achieved with a diesel below 0.30 euro per litre.
Paul Newman the magnificent
The unforgettable interpreter of "Butch Cassidy and the Kid" died as a result of cancer at the age of 83 years, in his house of Connecticut.
Hillary and Bill Clinton, Nicolas Sarkozy, George Clooney, Julia Roberts, Robert Redford and Sam Mendes welcomed the legend of cinema and the actor, Paul Newman, died at the age of 83 years.
Embraer maintains its forecasts for delivery in 2008
The Brazilian aircraft manufacturer table on 215 had left this year despite the threat of recession that loom over the global economy.
The fourth world aircraft manufacturer, Embraer, maintains its forecast for 2008 with 215 aircraft deliveries left, reaffirmed Fredrico Fleury Curado, its chairman.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer 97 had delivered.
The Brazilian manufacturer very much hope of the Chinese market especially for its aircraft of the range from 30 to 120 seats.
So far, Embraer 41 appliances delivered to the Chinese customers in eight years.
AIG would consider giving more than 15% of its assets
The insurer American International Group, that the US monetary authorities have fixed, plans to give more than 15% of its assets to repay the $85 billion that have been put forward, according to the Financial Times reported on Sundays.
AIG is willing to study the sale of most of its activities beyond his life assurance to the international retirement and its activity in the US, the newspaper says that cited sources close to the matter.
The board of AIG met Sunday in the evening to examine possible, according to stop it said.
No confirmation came from AIG.
The assets which AIG plans to break understand its subsidiary of air leasing International lease Financial Corp., its participation of 59% in the reinsurer Transatlantic Holdings and its property portfolio and its investment in the private equity, it said.
No final decision has been taken on these stop, continuing the it said.
AIG must quickly achieve liquidity to repay the loan of 85 billion that he has made the Federal Reserve to the risk of the American authorities take 80% of its capital, diluted share due to the current shareholders.
Analysis Paris history of the sitting Morning Meeting historic Morning Meeting
The New York Stock Exchange has accused a record drop on Monday after the rejection by the House of Representatives of the Paulson plan to bail out banks: The Dow Jones has lost 6,98%, a loss ever seen approaching the 800 points, and the Nasdaq 9,14%.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) plunged of 777,68 points to 1O.365,45 points.
In terms of points, the biggest drop in its history (684,81 points) had previously been recorded on 17 September 2001, the day of the resumption of trade after the terrorist attacks of 11 September.
The technology-dominated Nasdaq index, has yielded 199,61 points to 1.983,73 index and the broader Standard & Poor's 500 8,81% (106,85 points), 1.106,55 points, according to the final figures.
Already depressed at the beginning of the sitting, Wall Street has wedged itself after the rejection unexpected by the House of Representatives of the rescue plan of banks that was supposed to be a bit of stability in the markets.
By 228 against and 205 for the representatives have refused to the Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson the means that he asked.
Almost two Republicans on three rejected his plan.
"It is a bad signal to the market, which Congress unable to adopt a plan," said Lindsey Piegza, FTN Financial.
"This shows how the market was on this plan", she added, fearing that a draft adopted in several days is "too late".
"If the project is moribund (...) then the relay will be quickly gone to the Fed (the US central bank, included) and other central banks to manage the crisis, which resserrerait more credit conditions, said Brian Bethune, chief economist at Global Insight.
And accentuating more sense of urgency, "every day that goes by the fall of a financial institution" in the US, said Mrs Piegza.
After the bankruptcy of Washington Mutual Friday, the authorities have held the purchase of banking activities of Wachovia by its rival Citigroup.
In Europe, the crisis has suddenly accelerated, pushing to emergency measures in favour of banks in the United Kingdom, the Benelux, Iceland and Germany, sign that the markets are facing "not only a US crisis, but a global crisis," added the analyst at FTN Financial.
The bond market has risen sharply.
The return of the good of the 10-year Treasury fell to 3,632%, against 3,827% on Friday evening, and to 30 years to 4,161%, against 4,357% the previous day.
Obama wins the points in the first televised duel
The first debate on Friday between the two candidates for the White House has followed another to know who John McCain or Barack Obama, has prevailed.
Not surprisingly, the Republican and Democratic campaign headquarters have declared their own victory in the televised duel which would have been followed by a third of American families.
The political analyst David Gergen believe that the provision of John McCain, although honourable, has not been sufficiently "brilliant" to allow it to halt the decline in the polls to five weeks of the presidential elections.
The Gallup Institute, an opinion poll published Saturday gives an advance of five points to Obama (49% to 44% to McCain), believes that it is the Democrat who has learned his own way.
Among the undecided voters, who are those who look, Obama has won for 39% of respondents, while 25% of them are giving the victory to McCain, according to a CBS poll.
Obama should be able to confirm its advance on Thursday with the proper provision expected of his colistier, Joseph Biden, in the first and only public debate with its rival, Sarah Palin.
"It would be a mistake to the underestimate.
It is has the right instincts, "has, however, warned Bill Clinton this weekend.
The septuagénaire McCain has repeatedly put forward its indisputable experience in foreign policy, while emphasising the "naive" of his opponent on these issues that were at the heart of this first contest.
"Senator Obama does not seem to understand that..." he accused has several occasions.
"I do not believe that Senator Obama has the experience and knowledge needed to be president," he also assured.
A line of attack stressed since yesterday in television commercials Republican.
Obama has said that it was the future.
Without dismantle, he was brief and precise.
He has put forward its ability to make the right decisions, and to restore America's image in the world.
"McCain has still not understood, while Obama, though," said, this weekend, a Republican to Democrat spot for not having grasped the impact of the crisis on the "American in the street.
"During the 90-minute debate, John McCain had a lot to say about me, but nothing on you, denounced Obama, yesterday, in 20 000 personnesrassemblées for an election rally in North Carolina in pouring rain.
It has not even used the words' middle class "or" workers'. "The rout financial advantage clearly Obama, who is regarded by the Americans as the most able to save the economy to the brink.
"Next week could be a turning point," said yesterday, the influential Democratic Senator Charles Schumer.
Democratic Representative Rahm Emanuel, a former of the Clinton administration, has compared the "good instincts Obama's economic" to those of Bill Clinton during the 1998 financial crisis.
For the Democratic candidate, the current débacle "is the final verdict of eight years of bad economic policy implementation by George Bush and supported by Senator McCain."
Reaffirming that it would manage to cut taxes for 95% of Americans despite the unpredictability of Wall Street, Senator from Illinois has also pointed out that the achievement of a possible energy independence of the country by the promotion of renewable energy was his first priority, with the establishment of a system of health insurance.
McCain, he wanted to build a fleet of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
Cautious, the two candidates have ducked questions concerning the financial rescue package of $700 billion (470 billion) adopted yesterday evening by Congress and extremely unpopular.
Has Minsk, "you have noticed that there was an election, you?"
Young and opponents were demonstrating Sunday evening in the main square in the capital of Belarus to reject in advance of the elections.
A few hundred Belarussians met Sunday evening at the polling stations closed on the central place in Minsk to protest against the fraudulent nature of the legislation.
While no result had not yet been announced, many young people were came to demonstrate against the power of President Alexander Lukashenko: "The dictator, resignation".
Admit some have not even voted: "What good, because they will do what they want my voice," said a young.
They do not believe that the regime which has been good to foreign observers in order to resume talks with the European Union is prepared to carry out a democratic watershed.
Sanctions, including a ban on visas for Belarusian 40 leaders and the freezing of some assets, could be lifted if these elections were considered own observers.
They have not been according to the opposition.
"We have been excluded electoral commission and our observers have not been able to participate in the count," regretted Yuri Potemkin, the spokesman of the Union of the Democratic Forces, a heterogeneous reunification of twelve parties.
"This is a cosmetic change, highlights Alexander Milinkevich, a former opposition candidate for the presidency in 2006 and leader of the pro-European movement, because the important thing is that the voice, and here is the executive.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament is that they have been appointed, not elected.
But their entry in parliament can mean of space on television, meetings in the regions and the draft laws. "
The opposition has therefore enter the political game because "we must begin a dialogue with the European Union.
Because if our economy, which is heavily indebted vis-à-vis Russia, between in crisis, and that we do not reform, we are in danger of becoming a protectorate of Russia.
But we want to be independent.
The opposition fears that the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe that followed the election process does not recognize the validity of the election.
It stresses that the figures of participation seem too high, and the generalisation of the vote in advance (26% of voters in Minsk) opened the voice to all the manipulation.
"You have noticed that there was an election, you? Question the Social Democrat leader Alexander Kazulin, one of the last two political prisoners released in August this year.
There was no one in the polling stations.
And there will be a maximum of five Members of the opposition in parliament, those who are best suited to power. "
The silence of the night falls on the place of October.
Has television, President Lukashenko and the members of the central electoral commission welcome their success.
The interview, Du blood become course
Héma-Quebec celebrated yesterday the 10th anniversary of its founding, and its chairman, the Dre Francine Décary, had reason to rejoice, because Héma-Quebec has become one of the largest providers of blood safety and effectiveness of the world.
And above all, it has regained the confidence of the public who had been badly shaken by the contaminated blood scandal in the 1980s and 1990s.
As we know, the national reserves of blood transfusion Service managed by the Red Cross Canadian have been infected with the acquired immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus during the 1980s.
To this tragedy and resentment of the public, the government of Canada has established in February 1994 a public inquiry, chaired by the judge giant Krever, inquiry to shed light on the circumstances that led to such a tragedy and to make recommendations for such a disaster again.
While the judge Krever tardait to submit his report, some provinces have set up a committee with the objective of planning a new system of management of blood in Canada.
In Quebec, the committee Gélineau has fulfilled this mandate.
Following the reports Gélineau and Krever, two suppliers have been created in Canada: Héma-Quebec to serve the Quebec and the Canadian company of blood to supply all other provinces and the two territories.
"In 1998, when Héma-Quebec began its activities, only 38% of people still had confidence in the system of blood in Quebec, recalls the Dre Décary.
The situation was discouraging.
To force efforts to improve the safety of blood products and work on the ground during the years that followed, we have returned public confidence, "said it before proudly say that at the beginning of 2008, nearly 94% of the population québécoise had now confidence in Héma-Quebec.
The Dre Décary however, in mind that "the trust is extremely fragile".
Since its creation, on 28 September 1998, Héma-Quebec has applied the precautionary principle.
At that time it was in Europe to the outbreak many cases of the human form of mad cow disease, a new variant of Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, tells the one that takes the strong since its founding in 1998.
"And we did not know whether the disease could be transmitted by the blood.
It is based on a key recommendations of the reports Krever and Gélineau that when we don't know and a serious disease can be, Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease which is characterised by a brain degeneration leading inevitably to death and introduced measures of exclusion.
In April 1999, it has refused the blood of people who had been more than a month in the UK since 1980.
But a few years ago, it has been proven beyond any doubt that the disease is transmitted by the blood.
This episode has shown that the precautionary principle that has been applied made sense. "
In 1999 has appeared on the market a technique much more sensitive HIV testing: The acid test nucléique (Tan) that can detect directly in the blood donors the presence of the virus itself and not that of antibodies against the virus, which were the tests used so far.
The Tan have allowed to shorten the period silent, which stretches between the time when the person has been infected and when the first virus can be found in blood by our technical, explains the specialist.
We were able to reduce this period to less than a week.
Has fallen substantially the risk that some donors are infected without the knowledge and that we can detect them.
These improvements have been significantly reduce the risk of contracting HIV by a blood transfusion.
Today, one in 12 million runs the risk of blood be infected with HIV.
"In other words, it means distribute 12 million blood products before someone is infected with HIV.
As Héma-Quebec distributes each year between 400 and 500 000 blood products, it will take more than 24 years before strikes a case of transmission of HIV by a blood products.
I believe that we can now feel comfortable to receive or to prescribe a blood transfusion to recover the health, "says the head of the direction of Héma-Quebec.
"Our challenge for the next decade is to maintain the safety of our products.
You never know what pathogenic will emerge in the system.
No later than last year became on the island of Réunion the virus chikungunya who, like the West Nile virus, is transmitted by an insect in the blood.
We must be constantly vigilant ", continuing the Dre Décary before stress that security of supply, Héma-Quebec must also provide an adequate supply.
"The needs are increasing because the population ages.
Being more aggressive anti-cancer treatments, patients are often need to recharge in red blood or plaquettes.
The ageing population also has implications for the network of blood donors which brings together on average than 3% of eligible Quebecois the blood donation. "
Anyone in health, aged 18 years and responding to the eligibility criteria can still give blood all 56 days, or six times a year.
On average, 14% of those who propose their blood are not accepted, because they are suffering from AIDS and malaria, for example, and if they have travelled in a country where there is malaria, they will be excluded for a period of one year.
"With these 3%, we manage to maintain an inventory that meets the needs of hospitals.
Shortages are very rare.
But we must renew the members of this network of donors as they get older and cannot give their blood.
But it is difficult to convince people to give their blood, but above all to retain and encourage them to become regular donor.
Life today is whether race, there is rarely the time to spend an hour to give blood, "laments Francine Décary.
With an annual budget of $297 million, Héma-Quebec not only provides blood products, but also of tissues, including greffons bone, heart valves, the Globes eye and skin that is almost exclusively used for the big burned.
These tissues are analysed, processed and frozen before being stored in Héma-Quebec which manages also the only public bank of umbilical cord blood in Quebec.
The umbilical cord who was once considered a biomedical waste is full of a rich blood stem cells that can be used to treat serious diseases, such as leukaemia.
"We celebrated, a few weeks ago, the bank of our thousandth sample of umbilical cord blood and are expected to take more than a thousand per year.
We should start to propose for transplants early next year, "says the Dre Décary which describes this programme of removal of umbilical cord blood as very popular.
"Several one who are disappointed not to be able to have access to it," because Héma-Quebec does not have the resources to propose this programme complex and expensive in all hospitals in Quebec.
Soccer - The Impact in the semi-finals
The impact of Montreal has qualified for the semi-final round series first heats of the first division of the USL, thanks to a 3-1 victory (4-3 in total of goals) at the expense of Seattle Sounders yesterday, at the second and decisive game of the series quarterfinals in total of goals, the stadium Saputo.
The middle ground Antonio Ribeiro marked the winning goal in the 90th minute to play.
After a first half without aim of both sides, the middle ground David Testo and Rocco Plancentino marked the other nets training montréalaise.
Roger Levesque was the only off Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
Remember that in the first match of the series return journey, on Friday, the Impact had suffered a defeat of 2-1 at Starfire Complex, in Tukwila, in a suburb of Seattle.
The impact will be measured in Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
Saturday night in Minnesota, the Thunder has filled a deficit of 3-1 in the match return to win 4-3, but the Whitecaps have acceded to the semi-final round 5-4 in total of goals.
The Impact should face the Whitecaps Friday and Sunday, but the details of the series will be confirmed today.
In short - But victorious of Kovalev
The trio number one of the Canadian is prepared to take the season.
The unit of Alex Kovalev, Tomas Plekanec and Andrei Kostitsyn enlivened the attack in a gain of 3-2 of the Canadian the rocket barrage with the panthers of Florida, yesterday evening, the Centre bell.
Kostitsyn, the first star of the meeting, marked a goal, Plekanec has amassed two aid, and Kovalev has reaped a happening in this gain, the fourth of the Tricolore in six preparatory matches.
Kovalev gave the victory with the sole purpose of the shooting.
"I am not ready, warned the Russian.
I must another match to feel comfortable. "
"He has tried to do enough in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
But I think it has appreciated the end of the match.
It was a nice ovation. "
Charest put on the North
The Prime Minister does not exclude to trigger the elections before the end of the year
Immediately after the General Council of the Liberal Party over, Jean Charest has made yesterday in Jean-Achilles, Quebec, where the new Minister of Health, Yves Bolduc (left), is trying to get elected on the occasion of the-election today.
'Push the limits of our last great northern border': This is the long-term ambition that Jean Charest presented with visual force while remaining in the guidelines, at the end of the General Council of the Liberal Party of Quebec, Lévis, yesterday.
Behind him, during his speech was thrown a kind of mills in pictures.
Go in circle, on three large screens, clichés spectacular hydroelectric generation, mining, Quebec seen by "Google Maps", maps, etc.
Of the main ways as at election time.
On the press, moreover, the Prime Minister has refused to rule out that it would unleash the elections this autumn, although he noted that it was very busy.
The 'Plan North "is the fourth part of a" vision "that Prime Minister claims to have to the Quebec, that of a" new "economic area, which includes an agreement on the workforce with France, an agreement between Canada and Europe and agreements with the Ontario.
Often mentioned in the words of Prime Minister recently, the opening of the north - the northern the 49th parallel - had never been the subject of a presentation.
Prime Minister, however, was restricted to explain why the North was "a jewel the huge potential", but has not given to date, investment figures, or priority in the future projects.
Avenue at most of what could be developed further, including hydro-electricity, the forest, but above all the mining sector, has boosted by growth in emerging countries and the reconstruction of the public infrastructure.
The North contains "nickel, zinc, copper, platine, however, money, iron, bow, and even diamonds", according to the list of Mr Charest.
This' territory twice great as France ',' home is in Quebec.
Not only that is, but it is with us, "he insisted, like to make it clear that he solicited a national myth.
The Quebec has many built in its relations with the North, he said: The gold rush in Abitibi, engineering québécoise, the Bay James.
"It is up to us, it is our future," he added, having made a dramatic break to the immense card behind him.
The North, 70% of the territory Quebecois, includes a portion Labrador that the Quebec has always claimed, said the prime minister at the point of press.
"It is a traditional position that all governments have reiterated.
There is a line of border on which there is no agreement for a very long time and, when the opportunity arises, I reiterate that position on behalf of the government, "he said.
The rest, "with climate change, we need to rethink our vision of the North," he said, referring to the passage of the north-west, which will open all year because of the melting of the ice.
In this new geopolitical context, the prime minister believes that occupy the territory is a duty.
And the inhabitants of the territory, the First United and the Inuits?
The Prime Minister said that the Government of Quebec would be very attentive to them and that the project would benefit them, particularly young people.
Two former ministers from two different parties, Pierre Corbeil and Michel Létourneau (former Member péquiste of Ungava), have already begun consultations with thirty communities.
A Committee chaired by Benedict Pelletier and Julie millstone (Transport and natural resources) has an important place has started work.
The Prime Minister does not preclude a large meeting, "not necessarily a summit", but a time when "there will be a common vision".
The development of the North would be in line with the principles of sustainable development.
Plan North will be "concerted, ordered and environmentally friendly, he promised.
Jean Charest has described it as "vision" continuity with the prime minister Liberals that preceded it.
"As liberals who preceded us, we thought otherwise to transform the challenges in new opportunities for growth and development."
This has been a recurring themes of the end of the week, who has started Friday by a large cocktail to highlight the 50th anniversary of the arrival of Jean Lesage at the head of the party.
One of the resolutions adopted proposes to rename the Central Beauharnois in dam Adélard-Godbout.
"Godbout, which has created Hydro-Quebec, Lesage who made the quiet Revolution and the nationalisation of hydro-electricity, Bourassa who made the Bay James, our party was able to forge the future," said Jean Charest.
On the press, he cited another reference, conservative, the programme 'Roads to the North "John Diefenbaker, Prime Minister of 1957 to 1963.
In addressing the draft hydro-electric dam Eastmain1a-Ruper, Mr Charest pointed out that its operation was scheduled for 2012.
"It remains us here, but I foresee be," he entrusted to its militants, bringing home of loud applause.
Indeed, the Prime Minister, who said in April that there would be no election in 2008 and probably not in 2009, has not ruled out the possibility of a ballot this autumn, what the law allows him.
It stresses that his schedule is fulfilled, including a mission of the board of the federation in China and a summit Quebec-New York.
The General Council of the end of the week has provided the Liberal leader a platform with the resolutions nationalists, including 'constitutional' aspirations which have gone as a letter to the post: The PLQ calls in particular the recognition "specificity of Quebec" in the Constitution.
It also hope that the Quebec called the members of the Council of radio and Canadian telecommunications and that they have a right of veto on the decisions taken in Quebec.
On the side of the opposition, it has welcomed the broad outlines of Plan north with scepticism.
The head péquiste, Pauline Marois, has emerged the common-of-Quebec that the government Landry was launched in 2001.
, the liberal government, in coming to power in 2003, has refused to implement it.
If he had done, "it would be more advanced today" commented on Mrs Marois alongside its candidate in Jean-Achilles (vote today), Françoise mercury.
The ADQ said support the adoption of a North Plan by the government.
"But what we want is that it is not just a spectacle," commented on the leader Sebastián Proulx, replacing Mario Dumont, which amounts of holiday today.
Letters - A country dishonoured
It was Mr Vic Toews, former Minister of Justice (ironically) in the cabinet Harper, who allowed the summer to say of Louise Arbour that it was a "disgrace" for Canada.
And cast aspersions on this woman who has been a constant struggle for justice and deserves our admiration says as much about the vicinity of the Prime Minister Stephen Harper on himself.
We are facing a government that is the only, of all the Western countries involved, not to have brought back its national trapped in the concentration camp at Guantánamo.
A government which takes no account of the fact that Omar Khadr was a young teenager at the time of the charges against him are.
The only government that, despite the fact that Canada signed the Geneva Convention, denies its word and leaves languish in inhuman conditions a child soldier.
The only one who relies on a travesty of justice to assess the guilt of the accused.
Recall, for the record, UNICEF, amnesty and the International Bar Association, the Canadian advocate the repatriation of Omar Khadr so that it has a fair trial in Canada.
It is the same government that condone torture: Little it is important that a young adult is now psychologically destroyed, probably forever after so many years of violence.
You would not yet account, but at the moment we are seeing an insidious erosion of our rights, freedom and democracy, the word that Harper continues to brandish and whom if hollow in his mouth.
Now is the time when no moral no longer exists: Abuse, torture, arbitrarily detain a Canadian citizen at the whim of a head of government minority so far (what will happen after 14 October...).
Number of voters believe that they will find salvation in a which extols the Virtue, the Law and the: They do not see that this government has given up on what was the reputation and the dignity of our country.
Shame, Mr Toews, it is, in this instance, and not elsewhere.
Free speech opinion Orwellian of Barrick Gold
In his edition of the 17 September, The duty published a letter from Mr Patrick J. Garver, vice-chairman of the Canadian mining Barrick Gold.
Pursuing an Orwellian logic, it says that the biggest airline aurifère of the world has brought a defamation suit of six million against three authors and a small publishing house penniless in order to launch a "public debate transparent".
If it is true that the judges are independent and impartial, this is not the truth they deem, especially in the case of prosecution in libel, but the law.
Not surprisingly, this fundamental difference is completely obscured by Mr Garver.
Because, for Barrick Gold, the best way to conduct a public debate would lead to ruin anyone who dares to support a position contrary to his?
Regardless of the outcome of the trial, the authors and the editor of the Book black Canada will have to spend considerable sums to prepare their defence and weapons to fight, very unequal, against an army of lawyers supported by the pockets almost without substance of the mining.
The tactics, in these fights unequal, is often ruining the defendants to impose an amicable solution which bâillonnera the opposition in addition to scare anyone who dares to look again at the issue.
If Barrick Gold really wanted to a public debate is to the public that it should have presented his vision of the facts.
Contrary to what is being done in several countries where works Barrick Gold, the debates in Canada are normally by the exchange of ideas and not with clubs.
It was sufficient to the mining to open its books, its files and establish a real debate, through the newspapers, the media publications and funding of research teams independent that could shed light on the issue.
But Barrick Gold seems not to trust the public and rejected out of hand the petitions and letters of support for the authors of black Canada.
Perhaps Mr Garver please explain how it can ask a debate "public" while disregard for the views of the public?
In the world of Vice-President, it seems that it is only lawyers highly paid and not all Canadians; this is a rather narrow view of the concept.
In a democracy, even critics have the right to speak.
What does not understand - or does not understand - Barrick Gold is that the public who supports the authors and publishers of black Canada is primarily because it rejects the brutal manner of the mining.
The public is prepared to hear Barrick and to judge, but on the basis of civilised trade arguments, and not in the context of what many see as a continuation-muzzle (pursuing the "public debate," Barrick Gold has also submit a formal notice to the place of the authors of black Canada told to stop the use of the term...).
Beyond the speech by Mr Garver surréel, the pursuit of Barrick Gold is a direct attack on freedom of research university and the quest for truth, essential to a democratic society.
It denies, en bloc, the right to the quotation credible sources and the debate on the facts and interpretations, who represent the basis of the intellectual work.
If it is impossible to study and to discuss issues that do not like the rich companies in the world in a country such as Canada, repeated charges, which can do so?
If Barrick Gold really wanted to a public debate and transparent, it could do so in accordance with the scientific standards used by the authors of black Canada.
It has a right of reply.
The academic world, to which we belong, has long been known manage the debates and the disagreements and resolve conflicts.
The continuation of proportion of Barrick Gold clearly shows that, contrary to what it claims, it has no desire to a debate transparent.
This is a loss for the academic world, as in the public debate in Canada, and it is time that governments are in place arrangements restricting this kind of prosecution abusive.
Rescue operation of Wall Street - Democrats and Republicans are
The Bush administration and the leaders of Congress, both Republicans and Democrats, are finally reached an agreement yesterday on the greatest economic recovery plan since the Great Depression of the 1930s.
The new version of the $700 billion plan to curb the financial crisis affecting Wall Street for months has yet to be approved by both chambers of Congress.
It provides for: Better control by the elected representatives of its implementation, new mechanisms to ensure the reimbursement of public money, new provisions to contain the number of houses seized in default, and a right to scrutinise the salaries paid to executives of companies rescued.
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, the chairman of the House of Representatives, Nancy Pelosi, and the Republican representative to the negotiating table, Senator Judd Gregg, have announced the good news for a few minutes after midnight, yesterday, after a marathon negotiations in two days.
"We have made great progress towards an agreement that will be effective in the markets," said the representative of the Bush administration, Henry Paulson.
"Everything has been done to put out the real economy and the ordinary Americans of the ongoing crisis on Wall Street," said the democrat.
"This is the fundamental point: If we do not do this, the trauma, chaos and the disruption on the daily lives of Americans will be immense," said the Republican Judd Gregg.
The talks had turned into a sprint in the last few hours for fear of the fact that would cause another failure on investor sentiment.
The time limit that we had given was the opening of markets this morning.
Associated with late in the negotiations, the two candidates in the US presidential election were rather in favour of understanding, without fail, however, to express their dissatisfaction that you need to get this far.
Democratic Senator Barack Obama is awarded the addition of certain provisions to understanding, including the proposal to allow homeowners to keep their homes and on executive pay companies rescapées by the state.
"When you ask the taxpayers to take extraordinary measures as a result of the irresponsibility of some, it is not enough to congratulate itself.
But these measures are necessary, "he commented on American television.
Asked about another channel whether he would vote for the proposed plan, his Republican opponent, John McCain, said: "I would like to see the details, but I hope so."
"The guidelines that I have read [are] that this is something that we will all have to digest and with which we can move forward.
The option of doing nothing is simply not acceptable, "he said.
The 700 billion plan to buy up with taxpayers' money the bad debts, active to risks and unsaleable of the US financial institutions.
It comes after 14 months of a crisis triggered by the bursting of the housing bubble, which has led to the collapse of sub-prime mortgages (subprime) before spreading to other forms more widespread credit securities (PCAA) and lead to a freezing of liquidity and on the exodus of banks and financial institutions.
It is a group of elected Republicans that wrecked the first draft agreement last week.
Is believed to be out of this impasse since Democrats have accepted that some "toxic" assets of companies in difficulty are only insured by the government, rather than bought.
To cut corners to everyone in Congress, it has also added a provision that if the government were to take losses for five years with this programme, it could put in place new taxes to help recover its implementation.
The new plan provides for the payment of a first tranche of 250 billion to which will add another 100 billion if President the judge necessary.
The payment of 350 other billion should be ratified by another vote in Congress.
In exchange for help, Washington will shares in companies rescued which will be worth of dividends in case of profit and that it will sell when the storm will be passed.
The federal government will have the opportunity to delay the procedures of foreclosures on housing tied to mortgages affected by this plan, and to set limits on the pay and allowances of departure paid to executives of companies affected.
The architects of the plan would like to see put to the vote in the House of Representatives from today, and the Senate on Wednesday.
Despite all their efforts, it is still not sure that their plan will the green light.
Of votes have continued to rise yesterday against this project, both in the Republican side that democrat.
"Obviously, Washington does not intend to you," said to his constituents the Republican Scott Garrett, a member of the Finance Committee of the House.
"Yes, we have a serious problem.
Yes, there are solutions.
But not to take advantage of the taxpayers'.
Promoter of a small group in Congress known as "the caucus of doubters," the Democratic representative Brad Sherman present things differently, but come to the same conclusion.
'Four hundred prominent professors economy, including three Nobel Prize, we have written to tell us: We request to Congress not to press and carefully examine the way to take, "he said yesterday.
At the same time, in Europe, we had a further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
After an emergency meeting, the three Benelux countries have announced the partial nationalisation of the banking group Fortis to 11.2 billion (16,3 billion US).
The intervention of governments of Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg had been made necessary after the French bank BNP Paribas said she renounced acquire its competitor in trouble since she has lost 2 billion (2.9 billion US) in the mortgage crisis in the United States.
Fortis employs 85 000 people and is part of the 20 largest European banks and the 10 largest insurers.
"This is not wasted money, said yesterday, the Dutch Finance Minister Wouter Bos.
In exchange, it is recovering a right to vote in the bank and influence.
That is something that savers and households are now that the time they are uncertain. "
Meanwhile, on the other side of the Channel, the British government seemed to nationalize another bank rocked by the financial crisis.
In the English press, the government would take on board the whole loans under way in the bank Bradford and Bringley, with more than 41 billion (75,5 billion US) of mortgages.
The Spanish bank Santander said yesterday that it would buy the branches and the customers of the British bank accounts.
The Bradford and Bringley would be the second bank, after the Northern Rock, the British Government should nationalize since the beginning of this financial crisis.
Paul Newman (1925-2008) - Death of an icon committed
Its beauty in the eyes of blue background was long their card asset, some would say its weakness.
He was released from the mirror narcissique, the American player to smile charmer?
Yes and no.
His modesty, his sensitivity and a talent who was sinking of source have also away from the register of power that actually giving rise to the real monsters sacrosanct.
But what great athlete of substance.
Paul Newman, disappeared Friday, 83 years, died of lung cancer in his Crawford of Connecticut, remains one of the last icônes of American cinema of the good years.
Less monumental that Brando, in which it was like and he was long a kind of rival on the screen, more cautious in its stake, certainly more fragile, but apostle also freedom and the collapse of dramatic conventions.
Blood mixed are often children beautiful.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, a German Jew father and mother of Hungarian origin.
Of these European roots will generate a glorious faces of the American dream.
Without egos ultimate amount of quality.
Because he is projeta a whole country enamored of the self-made man, the Pacific War, wounded in battle, which in the early 1950s étudia dramatic art at Yale then fréquenta Actor' if the Studio of New York, before triumph of the theatre, cinema, television soon.
The same man who milita for civil rights was also the car pilot who classa second to the Mans 24 hours in 1979, doubled of a sex symbol, albeit a member of a couple model formed since 1958 with the actress Joanne Woodward were.
Also disappear with him the grey areas of this secret star, quiet, committed, allergic to shards of show business, which we will not quite pit the puzzle.
An honest man, in the widest sense of the term.
The disappearance of Paul Newman has been staggering to the cinema goers the end of this week, while collide its major roles on the screen black memories.
More than half a century of a seventh American art has ever-changing through him.
Back compete in memory the cowboy charm of Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969), the young man sensuelle rejecting his wife (Elizabeth Taylor) in The chatte on a roof burning adapted of Tennessee Williams in 1958.
Closer to us (1990), to its sensitive Mr Bridge, troubled in his old age by a marriage that did not fulfil all its promises.
So many other Paul Newman have gone to history.
This boxeur Rocky Graziano, offender, tormented, violent, unforgettable in Somebody Up there Likes Dr (marked by hatred), Robert Wise, a role for James Dean, resumed after his death, which launched really Newman in 1956.
This malfrat appealing in the scam brillantissime The Sting (L), Oscar for best film in 1973.
Ping pong player bitter and retaliatory in the magnificent The Hustler of Robert Rossen (1961), it will resume the man on the return in The Color of Money of Martin Scorsese, which won him in 1987 her only Oscar on nine nominations.
This face through the ages, it was him.
Still him.
The times jostling through its path.
Young people know him mainly through the cultissime Slap shot of George Roy Hill (1977), Reggie Dunlop, coach of a team Hockey unorthodox.
Its fans have found in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy of the Coen brothers.
With a final role of godfather of the Irish Mafia in Road to distress of Sam Mendes in 2003, the circle was completed.
Against several legends film, which lâchèrent early enough the job, Newman will be remained a long time in the saddle, while denouncing Hollywood, its TARP has good, and its concessions.
The French film-maker Bertrand Tavernier the considered, not without humour, "as a challenge living in the" underplaying "judging its benefits too supported.
The profession has not always been kind to the beautiful Paul Newman to which the roles fell just cooked long in the tooth.
But he played less often young people first that the marginal: Névrosés, alcoholics, swines or desperate, including its features perfect reflétèrent the excesses and the revolt.
As director, Newman revealed of ill-known aspects of its real sensitivity pudique.
His Rachel, Rachel, in 1968 (according to the saga of the Canadian Margaret Laurence), with his wife Joanne Woodward were leading role in the end, traçait a female portrait of melancholy.
Who lost his son Scott by overdose dédia him his film Harry and Son in 1984, for modesty and sadness.
Among the rain of tributes which déferlait yesterday on Newman, a great friend and former colleague of weapons Robert Redford (they had played together in The Sting and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid) said, very saddened: "His presence has made my life and this country better."
Generosity, love of life are vibrants features of the actor disappeared.
Beyond his career to legend, to be replaced as a major civil rights campaigner, ecology, independent cinema, a excesses of Hollywood.
We have seen many its binette allowed to grace the vinaigrette pots, sauces, biscuits and other foods, judging the process of poor taste, albeit joke at the outset.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for childhood in difficulty.
Newman, rather than sitting on a myth, has committed to the end.
He has left his five girls a letter containing these words: "Always and until the end, your father was incredibly grateful.
It was a privilege to be here. "
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of an American artist if lucid and if generous.
Model citizen, and above.
That could well make Zuschlag & amp; United in their factory in bills?
Soon, on 8 October, will start the hearings relating to the ongoing criminal proceedings against János Zuschlag and his accomplices.
The politician and his accomplices are accused of fraud, in the form of criminal organisation, permanently and regular damage, having led especially important. Other charges have been used against them, for example, false and use of false.
According to the public prosecutor, money from subsidies, was spent for personal use, while the benefits were justified by false invoices.
State money and municipalities, approximately 65 million HUF in total, was a part in the coffers of the movement Fiatal Baloldal and on the other hand, in the pockets of some people.
Their method, made public by the authorities in charge of the investigation, was to receive the money subsidies obtained by issuing fresh bills, behind which no real provision was given and thus, the associations never had no respect their commitments.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
For them, they are books - bills the market to Józsefváros, while fabriquaient stamps to Kiskunhalas.
For the names of companies that would be on the bills, it was decided, among others, during the touring province north of Lake Balaton, carried out by István Lados, at the request of János Zuschlag.
According to the testimony of the latter, it was to identify pensions and restaurants.
For his personal consumption, he called for a bill, on the model of which imparting other bills that they would introduce, among other things, to the Ministry of Youth and Sport, the Ministry of Social Affairs and Labour, and the City of the Capital for access to subsidies.
The majority of invoices was created by István Lados and his accomplice András O˝ri, which according to our information, was involved in drafting the files needed to obtain subsidies.
In a "circuit," a survey of choice of Lados was a bistro.
According to the two bills from the Zuschlag in 2003, this place has assured the restoration of a group of 90 people, members of the association Biztos Bridge Egyesület.
However, according to what the manager, it would have been impossible that so many people in this place, at the same time.
Similarly, in the summer of 2002, the bill on behalf of the foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért, which later will bear the name of Együtt has Harmadik Évezredért, grouillait of mistakes of form and substance.
A pension, based in Badacsonytomaj, did in fact that three houses, and maximum 10 people could spend the night, but the bill was one hundred and thirty customers.
Issuers of bills to the outrageous have also fallen in excess, when they mentioned the company Pigal Kft, belonging to the hotel and catering sector. In their accounts, or the name of Jobb Jövo˝ért, or that of the Hoppá indication, according to the information to the public prosecutor's office.
Gyo˝zo˝ Farkas the manager of society, said the site hvg.hu that when the public prosecutor has convened and he has shown the bills, it has been able, immediately, it was false documents.
"The name of our society and our number of tax were placed in a stamp on the wrong place."
It he: "Beyond the form, the fact that the bill, a hundred people have housed there, not very truthful headline either, since the establishment only eleven Chambers, who do not have the same place.
Moreover, the bill also mentions meals, and our restaurant is closed for a long time. "
Issuers of zealous bills were not informed on travel agents of Budapest, part of their choice, but only organising trips abroad. Thus, naively, they have indicated stays in Hungary on bills to settle in cash, which also goes against the accounting practices of the agency.
Also, as it emerged during the investigation, they also ajoutèrent VAT on these documents, while the benefits on the activities of travel, which is outside the European Union, are paid for without VAT.
Similarly, the VAT rate of four bills established on behalf of the Hotel Révfülöp the order of Jobb Jövo˝ért was incorrect, since the benefits of society do not pay VAT of 25% as mentioned, but a VAT to 15%. In addition, the employees of the hotel bills are printed, while the false were drafted in hand.
's investigation reveals that the Public Prosecutor 'issuers' have also made mistakes by mentioning as provision the transport of goods by road, that the company emitter bills could not exercise, given that its profile was the council in investment.
Moreover, it is also for the sins of forms, as the types of bills inadequate and false pills, that the bills issued the order of Együtt has Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, 21st. Századi Kulturális Egyesület and Biztos Bridge have proved false.
As in the case of society Ravenna Bt. or the course of Kunfehértó sport, which both deny be the authors of invoices in their name.
Forgers did not paying attention to the fact that the company HIB Kft., based in Nyíregyháza, was in liquidation when (2001) the group of Fiatal Városért Egyesület was supposed to take a meal at home. According to our information, it is for this reason that the liquidateur of the company denies having made this bill.
Bills set deliberately
A group of other issuers of bills is composed of those who were well aware that they were asked to pass bills.
The foundation Esély Budapestért Alapítvány, at the request of the grouping of Fiatal Baloldal - Ifjú Szocialisták, has established a bill on the order of the Foundation has Harmadik Együtt Évezredért, for a total of four million HUF.
According to the indictment, the manager of society Collab Kft. was forced to make false invoices by one of the defendants, Ludovic Györfi.
Similarly, has cooperated with the Zuschlags, society Biogate Kft., who is now in liquidation and in 2003, has made the bills the order of the Foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért Alapítvány, the association Atlasz Egyesület and the association Vörösfenyo˝ Egyesület, for a total of about five million HUF, but behind which no provision has actually been provided.
No financial movement has taken place, either, since the invoices were cancelled later, but that the bodies have avoided mentioned in their accounts.
Following the category of issuers of bills company is directly related to the accused.
The administrative officer of the Director-General of society Delta Trió Kft., caring of trade of fuel and cars, whose headquarters was in Budapest, but where there was nowhere to be found, was Iván Kubatov.
In October, November and December 2005, the company issued several bills on the sale of computer equipment, for a total of about 18 million HUF.
According to the survey, the equipment would have been bought by the company to operate Investment Kft. of Kiskunhalas, who was in liquidation since 14 September 2005.
The director of the company was a man from Romania, who Iván Kubatov would also have sent documents society, between 2002 and 2005.
As we know, Kubatov acknowledged during the investigation that it has issued bills to the order of business Atlasz, Hoppá and Együtt has Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, and he has pocketed their counter-value.
It is precisely at the request of Iván Kubatov that the Romanian builders have created the companies Fa-Bani Jos Faipari Kft. and Jos-Investment Bt.
In fact, none of these companies worked, what the accused explained by the fact that they did not receive work.
He served when even of these companies, because at the request of Maître Zsolt Szente, coaccusé and editor of the acts of foundation of companies, it has established bills to their names, the order of associations with Zuschlag, as the associations Atlasz and Y-Generáció.
Kubatov gave bodies, 15 bills in total, issued by companies operate Investment, Delta Trió, Fa-Bani Jos, Jos Investment and Linaxtrade, for a value of 14,2 million HUF.
The public prosecutor believed that 10% of are listed on the bills and VAT went into the pockets of Kubatov.
Man has even used the company Szi-Beri Bt. to establish fictitious bills that have been used in the context of the application of Biztos Bridge.
In January 2006, the Association Y-Generáció and Szövetség has Modern Magyarországért have applied for a grant from the body of public utility of the Socialist Party, Táncsics Mihály Alapítvány (MRI).
They have achieved this subsidy of EUR twice 500 000 HUF, but these have not been used to the objectives indicated in demand.
To ensure that it does not know, five bills fictitious received of society Works Team Kft. have been presented to the MRI.
Moreover, it is these bills that have been found in the raid on the office of Árpád Kemecsei, the Ministry of Education.
During the hearing, part of the defendants writing the manufacturing method of invoices, as it had already done before the public prosecutor earlier.
What could be really interesting is that the accused, János Zuschlag itself, decides to lift the veil on history.
Until now, its admissions are not very detailed, and although he promised on several occasions to tell the last detail, it has not yet done so.
The question is whether it is in their interest, or, possibly, the Socialists have reached an agreement that in exchange for the return of a large part of the 50 million HUF, Zusi would only the hat.
Today, it is probably insulted, since the requests for its investment under house arrest, on the basis of a reduction of his detention conditions, continually fall on deaf ears.
While those who have caused damage much more important, and the authors of economic crimes not repairable, roam freely or at least expect to their own home the end of the procedure. He has not that possibility.
The psychology of one-upmanship: Why are spending more money?
At auctions, buyers tend to spend more, and to overestimate the commodity.
Researchers in neurology and economy of the University of New York have managed to update the neurological basis of this behaviour and economic known and apparently irrational.
According to the study published in the journal Science, humans do not want to be dependent on this type of competition, such as an auction on eBay, and that is why they prefer even pay too high a price.
These research has tried to draw up a neural pattern of this kind of 'game' to the aid of experimental auction.
A voluntary groups was playing the lottery, while the other group took part in an auction playful, while with the help of a process of functional magnetic resonance (FMRI), the researchers studied the brain areas assets trial subjects.
In the two games, participants could earn money, but during the auction including an essential element is the surfeit of a third, all under the waistline brain, called striatum, was being movement of intensive way at the loss of the game.
This part of the brain, along with several other functions, plays a role in the mechanism of "self-promotion" of the nervous system.
That is why, according to the researchers, the rise in prices is with the brain to the violent reaction of the striatum.
Has the support of their theories economists, the members of this group of researchers have pursued analyses of financial supervision.
At them, three groups surenchérissaient with a partner, in different circumstances.
They were simply informed the control of the real value of the product in question, and they have made their way.
Has another group, they promised that if they went to win the game, then they would receive additional $15, as a reward.
While the third group has received these $15 before the auction, but the members of the group also lose money if they lose the auction.
The difference between these two groups is in fact that the emphasis was placed in a on the victory, while in the other, on failure.
In demonstrating the assumption of neurologues, the members of the team players' against failure "were prepared to put higher than those made by the group and the control group" for victory. "
"These results cannot be demonstrated by any existing economic theory.
Indeed, each of them explained the phenomena found at auctions by the pleasure of winning and the parade before the risk.
Only the neural imaging methods have helped to remove the contradiction between the two theories in leading now on a third explanation. "- said Andrew Schotter, Professor of the ability of economics at the University of New York.
Hepatitis: When do we need to consult a doctor?
In the world, around half a billion people suffer from chronic hepatitis B or C, while in Hungary, the chronic disease of the liver is mentioned among the main causes of death.
An estimated 100 miles patients infected with hepatitis in Hungary, but only seven miles are following treatment. This is the fact that often patients do not know that they are infected.
The name hepatitis is a generic name given to infections in the liver and caused by various virus.
There is a lot of similarities between their symptoms. The inflammation of the liver and jaunisse are characteristic, but pathogens and diseases caused differ.
The virus of hepatitis, according to the genes pathogens, spread mainly in two forms: The hepatitis A and E through the digestive tract (for example: Food or water contaminated), the hepatitis B, C, D and other viruses by blood and organic liquids (sperm, vaginal secretion, salive).
For travellers, it is advisable to be vaccinated against the virus A and B. It is no vaccine against the C.
The symptoms of hepatitis A appear two to three weeks after the consumption of food contaminated, in general, accompanied by a bad state general, of weakness, upset stomach and nausea.
Then develops on the skin and eye on the White from a visible jaunisse, the selles become clearer and the urine takes a colour more foncée. Cure can take two to three weeks.
Across the world, every year, a million people die of the most serious form of the disease, such as cancer or the cirrhosis of the liver damage from hepatitis B.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one in ten patients receiving medical treatment.
Hepatitis C may also have serious consequences: If it is not dealt with, it can lead to cirrhosis of the liver or cancer.
Most patients do not know of the virus, because the gene pathogenic destroyed a sly the liver cells. In many cases, the first symptoms do not appear that after 20 to 30 years.
Therefore, an early prevention is very important, as well as regular screening tests.
The contamination is much higher than the average among a population of three groups: Those who have suffered a blood transfusion before 1991, consumers of drugs and tatoués.
Currently, we figure to 200 million patients with chronic hepatitis C-type in the world.
Since the disease can be detected by a routine examination in the laboratory, it is advisable to consult a doctor treating from the observation of symptoms of unknown origin.
The disease can be cured, if it is detected in time. The virus can be eradicated of the body, the way the risk of infection disappears and the development of cancer has warned.
30 September is the World Day of hepatitis, organised for the first time in 2004 by the bodies representing patients around the world.
Its aim is to draw attention to the chronic cirrhosis of the liver, caused by the virus, on the causes of its development and on the importance of early diagnosis of the disease.
Anyone who is growing in God he feels less pain?
According to the results of a recent research, the religious belief would work as a kind of painkiller, which would have helped to make more bearable death martyrs Catholics.
The British newspaper Telegraph published an article that researchers at the University of Oxford have done an interesting experience in analysing where the belief in God could influence tolerance to the pain of human beings.
In the context of this experience to a bizarre 12 believers Catholics and as atheists have been subjected to shock, while each of them was a painting representing the Virgin Mary.
According to the results, believers Catholics have been able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
Thanks to a technique of palpation of the human brain, it could also find that Catholics have been able to activate the part of the brain responsible for the regulation of pain.
This analysis is the first of a series of experience, which the academics, the scientists, philosophers and theologians part from various sectors of the university.
More specifically, the experience is as follows: An instrument issuing sparks and broadcasting the shock is set on the left hand of the experimental subject.
Researchers have asked the participants from the experience of watching a sustained two paintings, one being the Virgin Mary painted by Sassoferrato the 17ème century and the other, the Lady to the hermine painted by Leonardo da Vinci the highly publicized 15th century.
Researchers at the root of this experience hoped that the sight of the Virgin Mary refers to a kind of state of faith among the believers, while the choice of the painting of Da Vinci, not very different from the first, was on his calming effect.
The trial subjects have spent half an hour in an MRI scan, meanwhile, have received 20 shock in four part to post, while watching the paint religious issue, is the one to issue more general.
Catholics have said that in view of the Virgin Mary, they felt like "safe", as someone who are "takes care 'and they are" be quiet, and peace has invaded ".
Has the view of the painting of religious issue, they have realised 12% of pain in less than when they watched the work of Leonard.
The psychologist Miguel Farias, who has taken part in the experience, believe that we can achieve the same effects with any other strong image, atheists, provided to find the appropriate photo.
"We should find a picture with which they react very positively, such as a mother or father," said the psychologist.
Tom Wright, Anglican bishop, welcomed the results of this research.
"The practice of faith should change and in many cases, actually change our personality," said Wright.
After the excellent results, there is the question of what would be the impact on the regulation of the pain of subjects if it shows the believers Madone a painted by Leonard or by a painter the same arms?
Is the Virgin Mary for a better result in better results?
You are what you divulgues subject to tone
Has the opportunity to its tenth anniversary, Google says that we can find at the bottom of the pockets of the people in the same way that the sky above their heads. He knows where they spent their holiday, which experts they should consult and what are their interests.
But it is still not enough, according to Eric Schmidt, which is one of the influential people in society.
While for the sceptics establishing a parallel with the vision of horror of Orwell, they do not see the bulk of the Web 2.0.
Eric Schmidt said, recently, the Financial Times that the main ambition of Google is to gather more information on its users. This is necessary for the founders of Google can respect their original purpose which was as follows: "Set out in a system all the information in the world!".
According to the head of Google questioned, after ten years of work of global chamboulement, they are still at the beginning of their aims to deal with all the information.
Has the question: What is there in five years? Schmidt said he would like Google can respond to questions such as, "What can I do tomorrow?" Or "What is the work that I would be the better? '. However, software cannot respond to this kind of issue, simple at first sight, the day when they know enough about users.
It is not entirely clear to all Internet users that the words used in research on the Internet, the IP address of the computer which launches research and the pages consulted then by the interested parties are listed.
Through the programme Personalized Search launched two years ago, users can, for example, store their own history of research and can see what they have sought, what they have cliqué. Thanks to this, in the long term, recommendations, based on the same logic, will be able to give answers much more personalised, and we will submit products and services on the basis of our previous statements and preferences registered.
What happens if someone uses my data against me, if we look at what is my work? Require users, who worry about seeing the monopoly of information to Google.
In most cases, this is the power potential represented by the company that can generate fear, and this is no compunction, fear of the punishment, the desire for freedom or possibly the revolt against the power that can generate in Internet users a counter-reaction.
It is, however, a fact confirmed that the terms sought are not only made, but in justified cases, they are sent to a third, and in this type of case law, nothing protects the personal rights of Internet users.
The most resounding these days is probably the coordinated action against paedophiles Brazil, during which Google has sent to the Brazilian Government the information that he had collected on page of the public called Orkut, allowing an identification.
Internet users mindful of human rights have been able to breathe a sigh of relief in May, when Google, arms into confusion with the body of electronic legal protection EFF, has proved its right to court to the FBI. According to the ruling, in the future, Google will still not be bound by any of the points of the constitution to disclose information on the request of the FBI, secret of any kind.
(At the same time, the federal government has been successfully some 50,000 web addresses and 1,000 terms of research that he had won in relation to the strengthening of the law on the protection of the child, voted several years ago, but in the end, it fails to get the lists of research private users, or the whole list of Internet sites and the key words of these two months.)
The judgment of Google is therefore somewhat contradictory: It is severely criticised by those who fear the transmission of their personal data, because they believe that their inner world and their private sector suffer when they begin to use Google services. Therefore, they address them in the spirit of revolt that it is against the multinational companies proud of their image conservative.
Meanwhile, culture and its American geek "sauvageons" between the passionate, the activists and users enthusiastic of the computer that appear in many countries are in Google the next generation of big business, "trendy" corporation, as opposed to his rival, Microsoft, classified as invader of the world because of Windows, even if all the two are fighting for the same purpose.
This can be explained by the fact that Google, unlike Microsoft, does not ask its users of identification code, is not asking for money for its applications. The code documentary and the package of programmes, continually cooler, has a much more accessible, younger and more page, faced with the practice of official of the software giant.
The reason may be that the geeks see exactly the problematic relationship between the rights of the individual and Internet, and what the Web 2.0, the key word as proclaimed in recent years, derives precisely behind him.
Indeed, the Web 2.0 is not something else that cooperation, that the fact that we are intentionally traces behind us, and that we use of communication channels available to us, and while the size of these changes one by one, the essential remains the same: It is exposed.
A young, in general, can take a profile on several pages, of Facebook to Xanga, and it can connect them to other benefits, such as to Twinter, or last.fm, listant its musical habits, and then it can connect them to a system of further, as FriendFeed or Blip.fm. these young people can also take blogs, in which are automatically their most recent photo galleries that they store on Flickr or Picasa.
While we can hear many examples, such as the sweetheart which includes easily to view photos of the morning, taken by the circle of friends common, with which his friend infidel has spent the evening, or that of the company that has dismissed one of its employees, for the opinions sincere that he wrote on his blog about the top management, we can be on one thing: The end of privacy is totally to reconsider these days.
Those who live a life online, consists of what it shows itself, and that is how we can define the principle behind the behaviour of young people today.
That wants to hide something, or at least, to try to circumvent the monopoly of Google, can do it (starting with, for example, Scroogle, using the system of research Google, but, at the same time, leaving intentionally no trace).
The number of people who deliberately, does not have on public pages for that it is not possible to locate them, is not insignificant. The services of Google online, via the treatment of text the treatment of image, reading of information can be replaced by alternative versions, which are not linked to enormous servers parks and assemble not our best profile, which have existed to date.
The public expects, without really is in hiding, when Google will reveal its true nature.
Society, with its present value of 156 billion dollars, is more that IBM (140 billion dollars), Intel (124 billion dollars) or Coca-Cola (110 billion dollars). The AdWords / AdSense advertising areas threaten the turnover of advertising agencies, while the benefits introduced at a speed increasingly important cause severe headaches not only to Microsoft, but to many other creators of computer programs.
However, observers criticisms are, in addition to all this, the contradictions that concern: For example, the top management of society has refused, in its entirety, the protests of employees, after it has doubled the price of the mother of enterprise and after that the company has found it too expensive restaurants daily multiple, taken any day. It pales next to the fact that already in 2006, Google agreed to the Chinese government and according to the terms of the agreement, the company detects all the results that injure good taste, and the interests of the Chinese regime.
According to an internal rules of society, the new services are not announced that when they can be used, which is about is that in the coming months and years, they are going to move the world on new points. While some believe that the draft scan and filing of books and magazines dimensions of Google is so important that the company will soon face the Supreme Court of the United States, other tremble before its system Health, because in it, we can build a comprehensive medical benefit from our results of previous studies, our doctors and our problems.
The fact that Google is a genetic data can give a good raw material for the next generation of science-fiction. The novel Cory Doctorow of the famous, writing with half-tone orwelliens, described the future in which a man could be approached so outrageous only through data from Google.
Two minors have helped to remove the footsteps of the double homicide of Ózd
"The police convened two minors to interrogate them in the case of the double homicide of Ózd. According to suspicions based, they have helped to remove the footsteps of crime.," said the spokesman for the Department of Borsod station.
Young people have recognised the facts that they are accused. For the moment, they are accused of complicity.
The two minors, which, according to the information to make (agency MTI Hungarian) are girls, defend themselves free.
The complicity of murder is causing a detention of up to five years.
The suspect in the double homicide of Ózd, a young man the corner 23-year-old, was remanded in custody, on Sunday.
Charges brought against him are multiple murder, assault with intent and committed by interest.
During the investigation, it was revealed that the 23-year-old man was a lot of money to a man of 53 years.
The suspect was not willing to settle its debt and it is for this reason that he drew a creditor, last Wednesday, in a site of Ózd where he was killed, and the girl of this man, aged 9 years.
According to the information of MTI, the young man was premeditated her crime. The weapon with which he was going to commit their crimes hidden on the scene of the crime.
The police examines the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
The stock market values of Warsaw has proposed two hundred million, about five billion kronor Czech, for the purchase of 100% of the package of actions of the stock market values of Prague.
Ludwik Sobolewski, the chairman of the stock market values of Warsaw, confirmed this proposal that the Polish have made despite that, before, the Czechs have ruled out the stock exchange of Warsaw the circle of potential new owners of the stock market in Prague.
The cause of this exclusion is that the stock exchange of Warsaw is owned by the state.
99% of the shares are in the hands of the Polish state who wants to secede from more than 60% of its actions in a few months of activities.
According to the Czech business daily E15, the Polish proposal represents the most high that has been made to date for the purchase of the stock market in Prague.
Czech according to the press, the stock exchange of Vienna, the transatlantic exchange, the Nasdaq Stock Exchange of New York, the stock exchange in London and Deutsche Börse have made an offer to date.
Petr Koblic, the director of the stock market in Prague, said last week that among those involved, the stock exchange of Warsaw would be the new owner the less good, and has not ruled out the fact that this could lead to the disappearance of the stock market in Prague in the future.
The value of the stock exchange of Prague is estimated between 5 to 10 billion kronor Czech by specialists in the market.
On the basis of an agreement between shareholders, some 90% of the papers would be sold.
The largest owner of the stock exchange of Prague is the investment bank Patria Finance, with about 25% of holdings, followed by the 14.7 percent of the bank Ceská Sporitelna and the Tiger Holding Four S. a.r.l. with 13.5 percent.
The financial crisis from the point of view of the European press
In their comments Tuesday on the international financial crisis, culmination of the day, newspapers leaders of the European press evoke already a "second 11 September.
"The overall financial disaster, we must the US president," is the daily lives of Rome, La Repubblica. "The president has not even been able to block with his own party behind a bill, improvised in a hurry, to help a desperate situation..."
Instead of a new Pearl Harbour, as the billionaire Warren Buffett, it is more appropriate to speak with a second 11 September.
Part of the press Madrid is also the scapegoat in Washington.
According to the vision of the newspaper El Mundo, it is the failings of the political direction of there who led the global economy to the brink of collapse.
The danger of the collapse of the US financial system are also on every day, and subsequently, the world will pay a high price.
The Bush plan was far from perfect, but according to the vote in Congress, a real danger threat that Washington is not proposing to political tool to deal with the crisis.
The global economy is in a vacuum, just when the history of capitalism, one of the biggest changes.
We cannot ignore the threat longer - highlights the day-Anzeiger in Geneva.
Some Member can still be a lifeline to their financial institutions titubants, and thanks to their own taxpayers' money, they can save them from bankruptcy.
Of course, if even more banks collapse like dominoes, then neither financial resources, or new improvisations will not be enough.
Has long term, we need the Member of the European Union are few cases of their national egoism, and they centralises control over financial markets divided.
Nothing but on Monday, financial institutions weakened have received more than 100 billion - recalled the Viennese newspaper, Der Standard, which adds that fears that European taxpayers also will have to delve into their pockets, very deep, in a similar way to the US in order to resolve the crisis, are becoming more realistic.
So far, the EU has not really busy of the crisis, which, as a tsunami, crosses, hand in hand, the old continent.
The 'rescue teams' should not use immediately 100 billion, though this would be good if they notaient in which case it would be reasonable to touch the taxpayers' money, with the aim of preventing biggest damage.
The intelligent car theft of bourdon emulating
What method would be better to develop technologies able to avoid an obstacle, if not imitation of an existing obstacles in nature?
For example, the bees.
In the draft presented at the surprising CEATEC, taking place in Japan, bees bourdonnantes have given the strategic idea of the engineers from Nissan, for the draw on how they must devise the next generation of detectors of obstacles.
In cooperation with the University of Tokyo, Nissan has built a mini car robot, a system to command self-robotisé bio-inspired, type BR23C, he has equipped qualities of bees, the ultimate goal is to encourage the development of a system able to avoid obstacles.
In its flights, each bee is its own area, oval form, which in fact, is very similar to our hull secure protection - has explained, during the exposure, Kazuhhiro Doi, the director of the department research and development and technological public relations of the brand.
The eye to aspects of the bee plays an important role, since it is able to see in all directions, in a 300 degrees.
To imitate the functions of the eye to facets, engineers have raised the idea of télémètre to laser.
It identifies the obstacles in the way of 180 degrees and a distance of 2 feet before the BR23C, it assesses the distances and sends a signal to the microchip of board, who turns on avoidance maneuver.
The perception of the obstacle is taking place in a split second, and then the mini self robot, imitating the movement of bees, immediate changes the direction of its wheels in the turning point of a light enough to avoid a collision.
Unlike any existing system currently, the avoidance maneuver is entirely a knee-jerk.
"If we fail to do so, the mini self robot could not respond quickly enough to avoid the obstacle," explains Toshiyuki Andoh, the director of the laboratory and mobility of the project car robotisée.
It must react instinctive instant and, since this technology is the most vulnerable and most of the envelope, a layer of protection for the moment when the collision is considered inevitable.
This whole process must reflect what the bee done to avoid the other bees.
The process must be held in a heartbeat.
Has the opposite of bees, the difference cannot move towards the top downwards or diagonal, it cannot be that of two dimensions, and only in the direction in which the way can turn.
In this way, instead of infinite combinations of bees to avoid the other bees, in our case, we could use that the movement rotatif, the acceleration and the slowdown as plots available to the mini self robot
The BR23C uses lithium batteries polymère which are more light and whose focused of energy is bigger, which makes their long-life version that in the lithium-ion.
From Andoh is the intelligent knee-jerk reaction which is essential, not the treatment of data, and even less the capacity to store.
This mechanism must deal with that some signals entrants per second, and respond to them.
It is not necessary to the store and react with the logic intuitive based on data from previous games. In this way, it uses only a few dozen kilo extend of memory in continues.
We don't need to remember a capacity of gigabits, or even of mega-extend.
This is the first step towards the concept of a technology for the instant avoidance. According to estimates by Nissan, this system will make its entry in cars manufactured in series in the next ten years.
Another application could be its incorporation into the GPS satellite navigation system, so that he can guide the driver to its destination by avoiding the obstacles are on the way.
There has even been given a name to the baby unaffordable
The written version of the economic recovery plan to $700 billion to buy the appropriations dubious banks, and to use in several times, is ready.
In the first round, half of this amount will be spent.
Reuters announcement that during debates are extending until after midnight on Saturday, local time on the east coast, the leaders of Congress agreed on the controversy that exists for days on end, around the rescue plan for a total of $700 billion.
"We have taken a major step forward," said Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic chairman of the US House of Representatives, according to which all that remains is to put the agreements on paper.
The compromise, born from the plan, is supported by both candidates for the presidency, Barack Obama and John McCain.
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, said in commenting on the results of the compromise that the programme will work and will be effective, however other measures must be implemented. According to Pelosi, there is no question here of the rescue of Wall Street, but the wheels of the economy in the other direction.
The written version of the plan was made public before the opening of the Asian markets, on Sunday evening at 20h, local time of Washington (i.e. Monday at 2 a.m., according to the local time of Central), but has not caused spectacular rise in the stock exchanges.
Monday, the House of Representatives will be the first to vote on the bill responding on behalf of Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008, and then his fate will be in the hands of the Senate.
Saturday night, President George W. Bush spoke to Pelosi, then, the White House has also welcomed the news of the agreement.
"We are pleased with the progress achieved this night, and we greatly appreciate the efforts of both parties to stabilize our financial markets and to protect our economy," said Tony Fratto, the spokesman for the White House.
Moreover, the programme differs from the original proposal made by the Bush administration, which she stated that the $700 billion should be spent only once, to buy securities on the appropriations dubious.
Now, most half of the $700 billion can be spent. The first 250 billion will be issued immediately after the adoption of the law by Congress, probably on Monday. This first amount will the Treasury Secretary to buy bad debts of banks, while the use of additional $100 billion will be left to the discretion of the President.
The programme will be overseen by an independent body, in which the chairman of the Federal Reserve will take part.
The spending of the second half of the $700 billion depends on a new decree of Congress.
Under the law, the secretariat the Treasury will put in place a combined strategy: It can, at the same time, buy bad debts, securities on mortgages and bad mortgages and other types of debt "toxic".
The good people of the Ministry said that bailouts can take place in the context of an auction, but also directly.
The rule allows companies concerned, to take part in a programme of assurance, where the secretariat the Treasury ensures the tools at the root of the concerns, for which the companies have paid a premium equivalent to the damage predictable.
Henry Paulson said that the law provides the necessary tools to spend $700 billion for the urgent needs of the financial system, the vast takeover of dubious claims, their insurance, or to avoid the risk of the system triggers the collapse of one or the other important financial institution.
"We will take the necessary steps to be prepared to the application of the law, as soon as it is signed," he said.
However, the leaders of the banks are in bad stance and the meantime the help of the state can expect their redundancy payments, called simply golden parachute Atlantic, will be capped by the government.
The cap wage is not mentioned in the specific case, the limitations depend on how the secretariat the Treasury suggests its aid to the company.
The principle of capping means that if the secretariat the Treasury is buying up in an auction, they prélèveront a surplus of tax on the golden parachute, unless the President of discredited bank based in retirement.
Immediately after the takeover of bad debts, the government will be aggressive way to ensure that the amount paid to the leaders should not be exaggerated.
For the image is complete, it must add that the existing golden parachutes are not changed. The cap is that the new contracts, this to motivate and participation in the plan.
This is the first time in the history of the United States that the legal ceilings will be in force on the allowances of the directors-general, has commented on the chairman of the committee responsible for financial services of the Chamber of Deputies, the democrat Barney Frank.
Moreover, the state provides a right to buy shares in the banks taking part in the plan. In this way, the risk of taxpayers, since they can even be win in the case as soon as the economy and with it the banks saved will rebound on their legs.
The draft law states that in the next five years, the President must introduce to Congress, a proposal that will rule on how the losses will be returned to the taxpayers, from the financial sector.
On both sides, there were, of course, those who have expressed their doubts about the plan.
It is not what the American people have mandated, this does not protect the taxpayer dollars - said the Member Republican of California, Darrell Issa.
His fellow Democrat Ohio, Mary Kaptur believe that these are the same people who are taking action, that those responsible for the collapse of Wall Street.
Industrial prices have continued to increase
In August 2008, domestic non-sale prices rose by 0.1 percent compared with the previous month, and 12.9% in August 2007 - communicates the Central Office of Statistique of Hungary.
The sale price manufacturers to export rose by 1.1 percent compared to those of July 2008, as compared to those of a year ago, they fell by 3.9 percent.
As a result of domestic price fluctuations and for export, the prices of industrial production rose by 0.7% compared with the previous month, and 3.2 percent compared with the previous year.
Domestic non-sale prices have risen to a lesser extent, 0.1 percent, compared with the previous month.
The sale price domestic sectors of the processing industry has suffered only a small increase of 0.1 percent in July.
In August 2008, the rise of the most significant price has been observed in the manufacturing sector leather articles and shoes (2.8 percent), with first, the manufacture of bags and belts with a monthly rise of 4.6 percent, then the production of shoes with 2.5 percent of monthly rise.
The level of higher prices of raw materials plastic and chemical has led to a considerable monthly rise in the price of manufacture products and chemical materials (1.6 percent).
Deflation has resulted in the sectors of the transformation of oil (1.4 percent), the manufacture of machines and electrical equipment (0.9 percent), and a minimum increase in the processing sector of wood (0.1 percent).
The price of the production of paper, the activities of the print edition and have not changed.
The other sectors of the processing industry have increased between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
In the sectors of the supply of electricity, gas, steam and water, representing a significant weight in the industrial exploitation, prices have suffered an increase of 0.3 percent in August, mainly because of the effect of rising gas prices set up by the authorities since 1 July.
In a comparison of 12 months, taking into account the domestic sales of processing sectors, it is the price of oil processing sector which have been rising the most significant (32.4 percent).
In the manufacture of metallurgical products, we have seen an increase in the price of 13.2 percent, while in the important area of food production, drinks and tobacco, prices rose 11 percent.
Price reductions have taken place in the sectors of production of textiles and textile products (2.5 percent), as well as in the manufacture of machinery and electrical appliances (0.3 percent).
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices has developed between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
In the whole of the processing industry, prices have risen by 10.2 percent during the past year.
The price of sectors of supply of electricity, gas, water and steam have exceeded of 18,7 percent the previous year.
Among the groups of internal trade and in the allocation of sectors, in August, the initiators of profit on investment which showed a rise of monthly price the most significant (0.7 percent).
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, prices rose by 0.3 percent, while those sectors producers of energy and raw aimed at a subsequent transformation did not change compared with the previous month.
In August 2008, compared to the same month last year, we have seen the biggest increase in production sectors of energy and raw aimed at a subsequent transformation (16.8 percent).
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, it was measured inflation of 6.8 percent, while the initiators of profit, a reduction of 1.4 percent.
The sale price for export of the industrial sector, HUF, rose by 1.1 percent in August compared with the previous month, while they have suffered a fall of 3.9 percent on 12 months.
In a month, our national currency has weakened by 1.7 per cent against the euro, and 7.1 percent against the dollar. Compared to August 2007, it has strengthened of 7.5 percent against the euro and 15,9 percent against the dollar.
Next year, there will need a visa to go to the United States?
Kinga Göncz think there is a good chance that the 12 January, the Hungarian-US visa waiver to enter into force, which is what the foreign minister said in Chicago, before the leaders of the Hungarian community.
From it, "now, everything is more than the moment when the systems of entry and electronic control of the Atlantic will be put into service".
All times, it drew attention to the fact that in the new system, there will be no entry visa, but tourists must be registered before the start.
The leader of the Hungarian diplomacy is in negotiations from today in Washington.
He meets the Foreign Minister, Condoleezza Rice, to which it will decoration of the Red of Commendatore with the single of the merit of the Republic of Hungary, and will be an interview with the foreign policies of the presidential candidates, Democrat Barack Obama and Republican John McCain.
Barack Obama and McCain support both the rescue plan of banks
Sunday, Barack Obama and John McCain, the candidates for the presidency of the two major parties in America, to support the rescue plan of the government's $700 billion, but there are politicians who are demanding the resignation of the US Treasury Secretary.
After the negotiations marathons who have gone on for days on end, the representatives in Congress and the Administration have finally announced Sunday at the beginning, they have concluded agreements in principle on the rescue plan banks.
This financing plan for thaw of the crisis on Wall Street and the credit market paralyzed, has become the central issue in the presidential campaign.
Obama and McCain are, as more capable than the other, to lead the country out of the economic crisis.
According to the most recent polls, with highlighting the economic issues, Obama has once again managed to get a bit ahead. Advance of McCain, achieved with the appointment of Sarah Palin as colistière just after the Republican convention, has melted away.
During a campaign rally in Detroit, on Sunday, Obama has expressed his hope that Congress vote soon on the 700 billion rescue package.
He stressed that the proposal contains the passages of consumer protection that he also supports.
"Now is the time to act responsibly (...) threat your job, your savings, the entire industries and the stability of the whole economy," he said before a crowd of 35 people.
It has not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain of outdated.
In an interview given to the ABC chain, McCain said: "We will all have difficulty in the stomach (...) but doing nothing is not an option."
The Republican senator said that in the proposal, are mentioned the creation of a committee of control of the Treasury and the cap of redundancy payments senior leaders, and that he was personally very attached to these points.
Obama said in the CBS that McCain has not had any role on the substance in the negotiations, while he was in daily contact with the Treasury Secretary.
Nancy Pelosi, chairman of the House of Representatives, said Sunday that there are serious hopes that the House vote on the bill as early as Monday.
The press cuttings German language of the territory
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only at the heart of the party that voters have become more aware - as mentioned Der Spiegel, the low score of the Bavarian CSU in the country.
Haider is prepared to govern Austria, to prevent the coalition of red and black.
Der Spiegel (spiegel.de)
In the online edition of the journal of information on the left German, Franz Walter analysis of the causes of the dramatic defeat of the CSU in his article entitled "The revolution in Bavaria eats up its founding fathers'.
According to the political scientist recognised, the erosion of the CSU began well before the sad duo Beckstein-Huber takes office.
The Socialists Christians have transformed Bavaria for decades and now, these are the same people who their modern are turning their backs.
This epochal change is also the problem of any Christian Democracy, and therefore also that of Angela Merker.
For the CSU, the failure was not quite a surprise, but on Sunday, came to end a process that was likely it is that, just ten years: The undisputed hegemony of the national party ended.
10 years ago, in 1998, the CSU is ramassait with 47.7 percent, for the first time since the 1950s, with a score below the level of 50 percent.
This has said there are three years in the elections of the Bundestag of 2005, i.e. at the time of the much-discussed Stoiber.
The cause can be attributed to the modernisation "devouring his parents', put in place in the region in a consistent with the CSU.
For 40 years, sociologists announce that they have been misled about the pace, but secularization, the results of education and the establishment of German of the North and in the region of Bavaria, could not remain without consequences on the loyalty of voters CSU.
A modernisation goes hand in hand with the increase opportunities, and the consequences of such a policy are also visible.
The right-wing camp is intact, only party that voters have become more aware, more critical and more stubborn.
It is astonishing that in recent weeks, this is precisely the classic groups of citizens who are rather far away from CSU, such as the self-employed, artisans, holders of the box and graduates of studies higher.
In these groups, support the CSU has fallen below 40 percent.
The Press (diepresse.com)
In his article entitled "Who?? The party chairman of the reserve with the issues of the coalition," the Austrian newspaper conservative deals with the situation of internal policy confused which has gone after the Austrian elections.
The Austrian Socialists the SPÖ want to discuss with the Conservatives of the ÖVP.
The ÖVP prohibits the SPÖ of meddling in its internal affairs.
The party populist BZÖ is open to negotiations. The Greens are not yet to agree on the coalition.
The elections were held now everything revolves around the coalition, during the debates on public television, the party leaders have barely suggesting their cards.
Werner Faymann, the chairman of the SPÖ, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with the ÖVP.
The SPÖ wants to show that the cooperation of both parties is indeed possible - that is what already exists in certain regions and in the Socialist partnership.
The question that he would envision a coalition with Wilhelm Molter, the current president of the ÖVP, as Vice-Chancellor, is open from Faymann.
As he said, the orientation Schüssel-Molter was, in any case, rejected.
A replica of this combination is out of the question.
Molter reacted cautiously to the proposals of the red.
As he has already said, a collaboration will surely be unsuccessful if Faymann is trying to interfere in the internal affairs of the ÖVP.
In his party, the choice of the opposition or entry into the coalition is temporarily an open question. These points should be debated in the ÖVP.
Jörg Haider, the President of BZÖ, is again open to all proposals.
"To avoid the coalition of red and black, we are ready to take responsibility of government," said Haider.
Járóka said: We need to break the vicious cycle of poverty and segregation
Today, began in Paris, the European summit for the Equal Opportunities, including the guest is France, as representative of the current presidency of the European Union.
In his message speech before the plenary, as one of the spokesmen main consultation of experts, Lívia Járóka, MEP Fidesz European People's Party, has drawn attention to the segregation in education, because it is a violation of the law affecting the Roma children, and one of the main obstacles to their success in life.
On behalf of the French Presidency, this high-level conference was opened on the one hand, by French Minister Xavier Bertrand, Labor and Affairs, Exchange and on the other hand, by Vladimir Spidla, European Commissioner for the work, Social Affairs and equal opportunities.
Among those invited to take part in the consultation is the European social partners, as well as the most prominent representatives of the legal protection and civilian agencies of Europe, in the field of equal opportunities.
According to the press office of the Group of the Member Fidesz People's Party, Járóka warned that alongside distinctions found in the recruitment, Roma disappear from the labour market, in the first place, following their low qualifications.
"An overwhelming majority of young Roma have no qualifications of secondary, and as a result of a poor quality elementary education, only a tiny fraction has the opportunity to obtain a diploma."
Moreover, Járóka has insisted that education as fundamental right of human beings plays a key role when we must make the other fundamental rights.
Investment in early education of Roma children means a strengthening of the economy of the Member States of the European Union.
According to the MEP, it is necessary to raise awareness of these reports in a circle the widest possible, also among the Roma and non-Roma.
Indeed, earlier Roma children start school, it increases the chances of becoming a productive member of the labour market; by the taxes paid from his income and consumption, part of the state budget.
"By their nationality of the European Union, the Roma must be assured of their right to quality education, and be protected from a low-quality education and sectarian said." - Lívia Járóka.
According to the Member, a collaboration of the European Union geared towards a goal and an action is necessary for an acceleration of the process of desegregation schools. This respect for existing anti-discrimination directives and preparation is of paramount importance.
"We need to break the vicious circle of poverty, segregation and the unemployed to give the opportunities provided by democracy to the Roma children, so that they can participate as citizens of right to the future of Europe," demanded Járóka.
On behalf of the 'European Year of Equal Opportunities "guaranteed for all, the objective of the summit for equal opportunities in Europe held every year since the summit in Berlin last year, is to ensure a single platform to support the measures taken in favour of equal opportunities and the fight against discrimination, targeted at European level and at the level of the Member States.
CSU: Thanks for a period of transition
It is in October that will be taken the decision on the fate of the duo Huber-Beckstein toppled
Despite this pitiful electoral defeat, heads are not yet fallen, and the debate on the personal questions to the heights of the Bavarian CSU was postponed.
The chairman of the party, Erwin Hube and the head of the regional government, Günther Beckstein, can still retain their place. The question is how long will the pardon?
The fate of the tandem, having suffered a catastrophic loss of voice of 17 percent, will be on the agenda of the party congress exceptional, held the last weekend of October.
Members of this pair very criticised have, in any case, felt that they were not particularly in their seats.
Thanks to this, they have sought to calm angry members of the group and the basis that one day after the Bavarian "tsunami" demanded of personal consequences for the loss of an absolute majority.
Ago for five years, it is true, even under the direction of Edmund Stoiber, at the top of his career - the socio-Christian union had 60.7%, while today, a year after the coup against Stoiber, there are only 43.4 percent of their strength.
For 46 years, the CSU was the single "sovereign" of Bavaria giving 18% of GDP.
But the Conservatives have always strongly in this region south of key importance for the Hungarian economy. In the future, they will be forced to the coalition.
As one of the first signs of an internal review of the party, the Vice-President and the Federal Minister of Agriculture, Horst Seehofer, presented as a possible successor to Huber, has also received a place in this small group of recognition, which initiating discussions to tâtons with liberal FDP, and with the Universities Electeurs, trained along the values of the right, about a possible coalition of the government in Munich.
A mockery strange the fate has been using the list of Electeurs Universities, between in the legislation Gabriele Pauli, to measure against Stroiber was the possibility of coup by the duo Huber-Beckstein, and then treat bluntly the very ambitious local politician.
Now, the leaders of the CSU put all their energy to stabilize, one way or another, Beckstein.
In this transition, Stoiber, which until now was the shots behind the scenes, also receive an active role. The former head of the regional government and former president of the CSU, has appointed on 28 September as the most bitter of his political career.
Monday, Huber has launched a scathing remarks to the CDU. According to him, they would have been much more support from the sister party.
Other politicians CSU have interpreted the defeat as a warning to the CDU and also for Angela Merkel.
Following the Bundestag elections, which will take place in September 2009, Merkel will again be Chancellor that if they call up in one way or another, with a joint force, the CSU, having played an important role in the success of 2005.
According to Merkel, concealing difficult to his disappointment caused by the fiasco, the loss of ground of the CSU does not influence of the grand coalition of Berlin.
Which is on because it will not be easier to manage the CSU injured, and the crisis of the social democrats lasts forever.
Since 1946, the SPD has reached its worst results with 18.6 percent in Bavaria.
Lukasenko - his rivals: 110 - 0
No member of the opposition has seen the Belarusian parliament after the elections on Sunday.
According to the Russian observers, this is due to a country ruled by Alexander Lukashenko, which ensures prosperity and stability, while according to the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE), this is because illegalities are made in the counting of votes.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not recognise the elections.
Although the legislature composed of 110 people in this country of 10 million is happening very much opposition for many decades before the elections yesterday, the opposition between its forces under the name of Forces Démocratiques Nations (ODSZ) was seriously that Lukashenko, renewing his term as President for the fourth time in dubious elections, in the footsteps of the amendments to the constitution in 2006, "would" this time the presence of a few Members of the opposition in parliament.
In this way, the ODSZ has abandoned its is boycotting originally planned.
The fact that Belarus, economically dependent increasingly Russia, would improve relations with the EU, where because of the political order of Belarus described as undemocratic, Lukashenko and several senior politicians do not receive entry visa, was one of the expectations of the opposition, Belarus has taken credit for the reduction of Russian natural gas imports more expensive, and helped the passage of society Beltransgaz, owner of gas driven across the country, is spent in the hands of the Russian.
The fact that the OSCE, during the evaluation of the campaign, has highlighted the positive changes rather than on shortcomings, such as the ban to run for a third of the candidates for the opposition, referred to a prior appeasement.
However, the OSCE reported Monday already challenging the campaign, in which most of the candidates for the opposition could not appear in the media, and particularly the fact that the opposition could not be present at the counting of votes.
Despite all this, the opposition is still a palpable improvement in the political system: The political detainees have found freedom, and Minsk is prepared to small confrontation with Moscow, still refusing to recognise the South Ossetia and the Abazzia separated from Georgia and Russia with which Belarus form a confederation on paper, consider the two territories Independents for a month.
"We have made two steps forward and one step back, but the most important thing is that the dialogue has been initiated between Belarus and the EU," said Alexander Milinkevich to our newspaper.
According to the candidate for the opposition presidential elections in 2006, it is desirable that it remains so, despite that "the power has been afraid in this Parliament which has no weight, to bring even one opponent".
The opposition does not provide for actions of protests in view of the results. It is trying rather to get his message on the need for economic reforms to the voters.
"Of course, we have a lot of concern for this: We have to give our newspapers opponents in Russia, local authorities we put a spanner in the works for the dissemination, but I can see that they are increasingly to support the elections, even in the circle of elderly," said Milinkevich, referring to the fact that in the current regime of Lukashenko, which considers social security as its main result, the layer of pensioners the most sustained officially really no longer regard it as appropriate.
"Because of the debt of the country and the rise of the trade deficit, the collapse of social security," referring to the silence of a graveyard, is no longer just a matter of time "- believes Milinkevich.
Unlike the opposition politician, the Russian observers have described the democratic elections.
Sergei Lebedev, leader of the Commonwealth of Independent States, told the Russian news agency Ria Novosti: "People do not believe in words, but in deeds." In this way, the absence of the opposition is proof of the maturity of the Belarussian voters.
Brunetta: "As of today, breakfast before the work".
Never in the history of the Palais Chigi, not had been rotating doors for the entry and exit of employees.
But as of today, is in force this new measure against hypocrites, against which tip and then goes to drink coffee in the bar during working hours.
The novelty anti loafers was presented today by the Minister of the public administration, Renato Brunetta, and by the Secretary-General of the Council Presidency, Mauro Masi.
"The doors tournantes- tells Brunetta- are an instrument for work better, with more productivity, attendance more and more services" says the minister.
Now begins a new season of accountability and transparency.
"This is the 'reformism also emphasises Brunetta.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is complete with the Palais Chigi.
In Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important to a symbolic point of view.
No resistance on the part of employees has been recorded, ensures the Secretary-General: "It is a process shared by employees, and we had the cooperation of all".
In short, over breakfast during working hours; more of coffee or increasing.
Promise of Brunetta, which suggests in smiling, "a good cappuccino to 7h in the morning is an excellent and healthy resolution".
At a conference in the upper School of Public Administration
Of Rome, the minister communicates that "in three months, the absence of disease public employees were reduced by 50%, 60milles workers in a year.
And he adds that it is essential to make it more efficient, the public administration.
Italian, "whose dynamic salariales- explains the ministre- these 8-10 years have doubled compared to the private sector, and well above the rate of inflation.
At the same time, thousands of employees public, are united to contest the standards of the decree Brunetta making use of the Codacons.
'"While the Ministry of Public Administration remains today data on the reduction of absenteeism in the workplace to cause of maladie- writing the association of the people" consommateurs- loafers assets "continues to rise.
Indeed, Italy, thousands of employees of the public administration correct and productive, met to declare war on illegitimate standards contained in the decree.
In particular, the tar, we doubt the exclusion of additional benefits in the event of injury to cause of service hours; the extension of hours of continuous domiciliaire worker ill, during which are carried out inspections and other items from the new provisions sought by the minister.
Accidents in the workplace, Napolitano: "Crucial" prevention
Every day, Italy, there are 2500 accidents at work, 3 killed and 27 people who are disabled permanently.
In 2007, the data Inail confirm that the dead white were approximately 1 200.
Figures which show the gravity of the phenomenon which remains one of the main causes of death, and almost twice as many deaths as homicides.
For the attention of the institutions, the social forces and means of information on this dramatic, the famous Anmil today, in all the Italian provinces, the 58ème National Day of the victims of accidents on the work, institutionalised the second Sunday in October.
"Worrying data provided by the Anmil, and the tragic events of recent days, confirm the importance of the issue of prevention in the workplace," says the President of the Republic, Giorgio Napolitano, in a message to the president of the National Association of Anmil, mutilated and disabled of work, Pietro Mercandelli.
The head of state expresses its "sincere appreciation for the ongoing effort associations in favour of prevention in the workplace, the protection of workers victims, assistance to the victims' families and awareness of public opinion"
Outraged "of course, everyone has struck down to put an end to such tragedies which, by their size, are the rest of the media and the participation of the public, even if the daily reality we are dramatic cases, even repetitive in their dynamism.
Napolitano does not hide "there is certainly a problem of resources: It is essential to invest in training and information"
The many initiatives promoted in the education sector, have a particular importance for a more direct awareness on the part of young people who enter the world of work.
It is our duty, maintain attention to this phenomenon, not in assessing the alarm on the gravity social, and improve the legislation.
For its part, the Speaker Gianfranco Fini has pointed out that "this phenomenon of the dead white is an absolute social emergency, who insult the conscience of each of us, and requires all the institutions, to make a real effort to stop it quickly".
The data of victims on the work seem to point out a small positive trend, but this does not mean that the number of dead white is impressive "said later the President of the Anmil Pietro Mercandelli.
"We do not want this watered-down" trend will result in fact, in a minor attention, because it is precisely when attention is acquittal that is the tragedy.
"We believe that, in general, it is not enough to block the phenomenon of accidents and the contrast can be done through numerous actions."
"In nous- stressed Mercandelli- more controls and inspections are needed, as well as greater intervention on the training of workers, and this, at school."
- It has ajouté- "we must make a further effort on the communication and awareness of public opinion.
"But above all, a greater sense of responsibility of employers with a phenomenon which represents a social emergency."
"Mercandelli then denounced" the gradual deterioration of the conditions of safeguarding of compensation for the victims of work "and the" drift of assistance to which the system is moving in recent years ".
"The aim therefore, is to restore the worker the guarantee of assurance – he ajouté- so that the fate of those who has an accident, must not depend on the spontanéisme or enlargement of the legislator"
MP3 player finger, they put at risk the hearing.
Ecouter of music at full volume for a prolonged period using mobile music devices like MP3 players, can cause permanent damage to the hearing.
That announcement the European Commission, which, in a statement distributed in Brussels, quote the opinion of the Scientific Committee, on the health risks unexpected and recently identified (Csrseri) of the EU, published today.
"Scientifique- read this report we in the note- it appears that 5-10% of those who, during a period of at least 5 years, listen to music at full volume using mobile music devices, for over an hour a day and a week, risk a permanent hearing loss capacity."
"I am concerned that such a huge number of young people who use frequently portable music devices and mobile phones at full volume, can damage unconsciously their hearing in irreparable" says Meglena Kuneva.
'"According to data scientifiques- continues a responsible UE- it is a clear risk and we must react quickly.
What matters most consumer awareness and make this information to public domain.
We need to review the existing control systems in the scientific opinion, so that they are fully effective and can follow the new technologies "
Brussels has asked the Scientific independent, to examine the problem, given the intensive use of mobile music devices and the increase in the number of young people exposed to noise that they generate.
"The scientists-concluded the executive UE- confirm that there are good reasons to worry, and that the European Commission will now with the Member States and other interested parties, what could possibly be taken to better protect children and adolescents, against exposure to noise from mobile music devices and similar devices.
There is already a European standard of safety which limits the noise level of portable music devices to 100Db, but the concern is growing about the hearing damage that may result of excessive exposure to such sources of noise.
It is possible to limit these data making use of solutions such as the reduction of the level and duration of exposure to noise.
The Scientific EU pointed out that users of mobile music devices, who are listening to music at full volume (more than 89 decibels) for five hours per week, are currently in force on the level of noise maximum made in the workplace.
Those who are listening to music in such conditions for prolonged periods, risk a permanent hearing loss of capacity after five years.
It is 5-10% of users of these devices, and their numbers can be quantified around 2.5 and 10 million people in the EU
Refer Rome, gave the order to leave the Commission for the future of the capital.
Today we are starting in March we end, in June we learn the sums.
That is the timetable set by the Capitol for the work of the Commission for the future of Rome "Capital, which took place this morning, the new headquarters, behind the baths of Caracalla.
In six months, the president Antonio Marzano and 49 other components of the Commission will put up the directives to Rome.
In March when they have completed, the Committee and the City Council will evaluate the analyses and projects, in order to present in June, the strategic plan for Rome with the "official" stamp of the Capitol and its mayor Gianni refer.
'"The Committee is absolutely independent; all the political, social and cultural ideas are représentées- wishes to emphasise Alemanno- it will offer ideas of development of Rome which can use policymakers policies, which remain the Committee and the City Council.
Any combination of roles, but only the desire for a corner where a great project for Rome.
In March, she completes its tasks and then disappear, because this experience must have a specific time period.
In June-announcement the maire- we present the strategic plan from the work of the Commission for the future of Rome Capital. "
For those who accuse the Commission to be useless, given that his views will not be binding, refer reply: "Everything depends on the work that the Commission will be able to do, and the quality of its proposals.
If the quality is, as in France with the Commission Attali, as in Rome, I am on, its contribution will be crucial.
Too often the policy is frustrated by the management of the newspaper and emergencies that occur from time to time.
, on the contrary, we want to see progress, and further, to a prospective deepest, working seriously the development of Rome and its future. "
In addition, the mayor of Rome is keen to stress that "the Commission is not an unnecessary bureaucratic body or a whole: It is absolutely free, and will not cost a euro the Roman city dwellers, and will serve to study and get the best minds that express the Capital.
To refer, indeed, "we need a sketch of strategic reference, or firm or stand still, to allow our city, to improve, which it has absolutely necessary, while thinking about its future now a spirit of unity,".
A future, says that the mayor of Rome, "will not be limited to the usual local border, but which will further" not only in the context of the future metropolitan city and its legal status of Capital, but also in relation to the role that Rome can and should be, as Capital of Europe and the Mediterranean '.
Obama? The first president anti-American. This is why.
A famous American politician who wants to be independent, wrote: "Barack Obama will be the second anti-American president.
The first was Jimmy Carter, who, from its decisions, Saudi US economy and were reports (as it has always today, as a private citizen) with the enemy Islam. "
Attacks on Obama are rising while the date of the elections are approaching.
A lady of Miami wrote on a website: "This person is full of ambition".
Obama is really rich: He believes he wins the highest office of a nation that account in all, two governors and five senators blacks! "
In fact, it is attacks that do not say much; they are obviously attacks of racial nature, and do not respond to the question of all voters: Will it be a good president? We also the polls, who say all that Obama wins and with a good advantage.
In this case, it is still of someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
A newspaper of the Mississippi River, in the southern sandpits the US, wrote an article: Once in the voting booth, we know that the American patriot will give his vote.
That is that one aspect of the American mindset kept secret until the end.
"Say what you want, we will see ourselves to the cross, on Obama or McCain.
There is even people who swear: If Obama wins, we leave the United States.
Things never revealed until now, so much so that the success of the black candidate seems almost certain.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the map winner for democrats is George Bush.
We asked 1 500 people: What were the mistakes made by Bush during his mandate? 89% replied: Iraq.
America changes.
Vietnam, this nation has lost 50 miles soldiers and was sent back home to the fesses.
In Iraq, 500 soldiers have been killed, and the Americans have not been forced to make the suitcases.
Despite this, Iraq has been, for the most part, the weakness of Bush.
Who will take the place of George W will be a huge stain to do.
US, the economic turmoil is felt even among journalists: In the press, it is the deletions., and many blame the Internet, this' murders "the paper newspaper.
Five hundred American journalists have been arrested by the Pew Research Center about the status of their profession and mental control for the future.
Well, almost all journalists are pessimistic about their future.
However, they have not said openly the value of information, feel less worried about the credibility.
They do not feel isolated as in the past.
The problem of American journalists, the money, the money.
The crisis of 2008 for these journalists is a crisis of economic model destroyed.
In addition, the deletions made in the newsroom, in the room where the authors are working to the assembly of newspapers, are a major problem.
This is a problem that must be resolved, according to reporters interviewed, if we want the traditional journalism as the general public, will be reduced substantially.
A clear but complex pessimism invades the American journalism.
Six in ten senior executives of printing newspapers and journalists are convinced that journalism at national level is pursuing a bad way.
Locally, the group executive is to 65%.
Publication printed against broadcast.
Journalists are not hard to see where will the web.
The larger houses éditrices work their way to the Internet, seen by many as the "murderer" the paper newspaper.
The "economic pressure" that feel journalists is increased up to 79%.
The 500 reporters interviewed admitted to technology hoping that it "to do something good" for their journalism.
Today, the agreements, the largest in American journalism lies between who run the newsrooms- i.e. directeurs- and reporters who work for them.
56% of directors at national level, are convinced that reporters shares their values, while at the local level, this percentage drops to 23%.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
The directors who lose their jobs in the space of three years, are 47% at national level.
With regard to journalists, we are going to 30%.
The 'safe' work at the level staff (our editors, ndr) in America is still on the agenda.
Only 13% of journalists are working under contract.
In a nation huge as the US, with 300 million inhabitants and thousands of journalists, reviewed, radio, TV and the Internet, employers often provide what they want, and it is fast becoming a matter of take it or leave it.
The directors are almost always of wages, while the Editor can win 10mille dollars a month, in addition to retirement and the payment of insurance.
About the holiday, the logic is complicated: X days after the first year, x days after the third, up to 15 days in all, past a number of years.
But, according to their revelations, the American journalists are often "sick" during the year.
It is the fault of the climate.
UNIPOL: Court ROME, DANILO COPPOLA remains A GROTTAFERRATA.
The President of the second section of the criminal court in Rome, Carmelo Rinaudo, decided to reject the body of the estate agent, Danilo Coppola, who had asked to leave his city, Grottaferrata, for a house in Rome.
. Coppola is investigated for bankruptcy in the framework of the investigation on the escalation Unipol-Bnl.
At the trial against him, last week it had secured the release domiciliaire transformed into a house with Grottaferrata.
His lawyers, Michele Gentiloni and Gaetano Pecorella, asked that the estate agent can go the way of the city of province to a home in the capital.
According to the court, such movements (that the entry was not granted) would allow him to influence its society and to have access to evidence that the blame.
The elites in danger.
The phenomenon has already shown a few days ago, with the vote in the House of Representatives, contrary to the rescue plan of $700 billion approved by the White House: A good significant number of American was, and still is, more interested in punishing Wall Street to save the US economy.
And this is the New York Times yesterday that we can confirm that the current crisis divides the Republican Party, even more divided between its eve soul East Coast, moderate, in favour of the federal institutions and the business community, and its new soul, on the contrary, conservative, hostile to "those of Washington 'and the world of finance, powerful especially in the Member of the Centre and the South.
The soul, precisely, who has made to feel a despotic with the vote which I mentioned earlier.
But what has just been mentioned is just one example of the changes, the big changes that the earthquake ongoing economic pre-announcement or leaves already run: Not only in the US, but throughout the West, and can be not only here.
The US as in Europe, the crisis appears to speed up the phenomena couvés for some time, so much so that, in the new climate, they solidifient and are.
The first of these phenomena is the updating, the extraordinary revival of the double category Etat- sovereign, compared to a kind of renationalisation of the economy.
The crisis, indeed, is a crisis-bank financial institutions that have, of course, to close relations with abroad, but, above all, are involved in a large scale, the balance sheets of individuals and families who live in one country, in one state.
This creates an immediate political problem for which the rules: That is to say as respond to the difficulties and the protests of individuals and families who is also an electorate.
In short, the global economic crisis appears but politically, it is almost that here.
The internationalization policy seems really out of the game or, had little to say: The evidence is provided by the European Union, which shared as usual, between the various interests and between the various national strategies, is to decide no common policy.
And thus, it is the government of each state that all expect the speeches, plans to rescue and recovery, the new rules, and especially the affection of appropriations: When one is going through a difficult period, there is that the Member with the economic resources, the mass of financial resources able to try to put things in place.
They also have the necessary resources and the legitimacy to use resources: Two invaluable, things which no market or international organisation can never have similar way.
This new emphasis of the nation-crisis is in perfect harmony with the importance always major economic developments most recent of the economy tend to give a factor quite linked to this: The territoriality.
. Ironically, indeed, while we were convinced to be now entered the kingdom of the network, technology, not always more sophisticated equipment, convinced that the global finance is now intended to dominate the world, we went into account a shot of a single, that our future will have to settle scores more with things somewhat material such as water, harvests, oil.
Things that can certainly be transported to a place to another of the land, but which are linked to definitively to a limited area, a territory.
As well, which is sovereign, has certainly more of cards that is not, i.e., whoever has the misfortune to live in a place without harvest, without oil and without water.
I now come to the second new feature, which provides a fracture.
Who said territory, state government policy, inevitably said, and therefore Leadership.
In this respect, the economic crisis seems to produce two phenomena convergent.
One hand, the conscience of the objective need of authoritarian leadership, the search for a person who will take control of the situation.
On the other hand, a wave of reputation for the existing leaderships economic species that have proven to be inadequate and full of grey area.
And furthermore, something even more profound, in a sense, even worrying: A reputation, suffering, an image of inadequacy, a sense of isolation which tends to involve the entire class of directors in a growing number of the West.
And increases even more convinced of the various classes, before the actions are the same ideas of social elites until now at their peak, their way to listen and to be, their culture in the complex acceptance of the term, to have the same time, and to be more foreign to the views of majorities.
In short, the request of leadership, feeds below, a powerful and more ramified délégitimassions movement of the ruling classes and traditional political orders, in the 'uprisings electoral "improvised or, in the changes of collective mood of recent just days, from the conservative rise in Austria Bavaria, in the fall of Labour in Britain, the US Congressmen rebellion against Bush (and it may well be that the victory of the Right in Italy is not arrival by chance).
One has the impression that the traditional elites, their parties, their programmes, but also their observance, their newspapers, their accredited intellectuals, their format, someone would have more difficulty, which is not new, to understand and therefore to represent the layers deep Western societies, and that the economic crisis strengthens, increases and wave potentially too much.
Has the view of all this talk of a rebellion of the masses "present" on the agenda, seems quite frankly excessive.
But it is said, keep our eyes wide open, it is not without reason.
The supercolle to walk on the walls.
Defeat the laws of gravity thanks to a super glue and, in the future, walk on the walls as Spiderman.
That is the objective of various American research centres, and today, a team of four institutions are almost succeeds.
With a removed was barely 2.5 square centimetres, researchers have managed to maintain put up a corps of 100 kilograms on a vertical wall.
The ETUDE- The US journal Science published the discoveries of some researchers from the University of Dayton, of Akron, the Georgia Institute of Technology and the Air Force Research Laboratory.
The material, invented by the team of researchers, is a development of those that we are using a special structure of carbon, called nano tubes of carbon.
"The principle of the glue can be imagined as a series of tubes prepared as a pile of spaghetti." Explains Zhong Lin Wang of the Georgia Institute of Technology in Atlanta.
Scientists have inspired the legs of geckos, overlaid hair microscopic who can assure the animal, a perfect adhérente.
The testing of various materials, such as the glass, the téflon, and paper of glass, have shown that the new removed is ten times more powerful than the legs of these reptiles, and at the same time, he "stands out easily of the walls" explains Liming Dai, researcher engineering faculty of the University of Dayton.
Walk on LES walls? – "this material may be used as a temporary removed" adds Liming Dai.
Can be to walk on the walls as Spiderman? Maybe so, but researchers think of a use much less compelling as the connection between the electronic devices, given that the nano tubes of carbon drivers are heat and electricity.
Other applications could affect the aerospace engineering.
For now, not super heroes.
The other RECHERCHE- The University of California, Berkeley, and it also, in the search for a new removed.
In a US magazine article of the American Chemical Society, researchers have presented a Californian removed formed of microfibres as hair, who washing of dust in the movement on an area to ensure a constant perfect and grip.
Drugs: Never with of fruit juices.
Attention to the fungus orange juice, and bone.
These drinks, consumed especially the summer because désaltérantes and rich in vitamins, if associated with some vital medicines, to alter the popular absorbement or reducing in the case, their effectiveness, with the same serious consequences for health.
David Nailey, a professor at the University of Western Ontario in London, recalls the risks of fruit juices that they are, or, if sounding costs associated with the ingestion of certain drugs; during the 236ème national meeting of the American Chemical Society underway in Philadelphia, it is launching a new warning: A glass of orange juice, fungus and apples, to reduce the absorbement of some vital medicines, cancelling their benefits and putting at risk the health of patients.
The juice fungus has already been heavily criticised for held accountable to increase the effects of certain drugs, antibiotics, anti arythmiques tranquillizers, anti staminales and neurological, until the toxic levels.
MEDICAMENTS A risque- It is the Italian Agency of the medicine itself, which gave the new in a letter dated two years, alerting doctors and patients not to assess the drift in danger of this mix and to pay attention to what we drink, taking medication for example, the Diazépam or the methadone.
That FEBRUARY PAMPLEMOUSSE- According to the experts, even the orange juice and apple contains substances that inhibit the medicines.
Is a long list of active principles inhibés by the fungus and other juice.
, the appeal of Michele Carruba, director of the Department of pharmaceuticals of the public University of Milan: "These findings are generally, immediately reported to the various national and international agencies of medicines to the need to change the notes informative of medicines.
It is always to read the papers illustratifs medicines that we take, and, if something is not clear, not to be impressed, but speak clearly the doctor or pharmacist "stressed the expert at the agency Ansa.
The Prize for the economy to Paul Krugman.
The Nobel Prize for the economy has been attributed to the American Paul Krugman for his research on the models of trade and the location of business.
Krugman, 55, is a neo-Keynesian who teaches at the University of Princeton and it is also a famous writer of the New York Times.
Krugman is one of the largest criticism solutions in economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
A few months after the attacks of September 2001, during the days of the collapse of Enron, Krugman wrote in an article published on the New York Times, that the second event would have been more important than the first, in terms of impact on US history.
A forecast that unleashed a lot of controversy, and who was a danger to the economist for years, but now has proved correct.
"I am surprised and even a little shocked the speed with which the memory of scandals such as the collapse of Enron and WorldCom, have disappeared from public attention" said Krugman at the end of 2002.
In Lorenzo Bini Smaghi, the executive committee of the European Central Bank economist, Krugman is a "high-value", but also a divulgateur the style "very aggressive, particularly critical of the excesses of liberalism of the Bush administration.
Open Office, this is the third edition of the package "anti-Microsoft"
It is the day of the dissemination of OpenOffice.org.3.0, the open source of personal productivity which aims to reach always and even more users, the home office, professionals in the public administration, proposing a free alternative to the most famous Microsoft Office.
Following a work of almost a year ago, carried out by developers volunteers, monitored by Sun Microsystem, the new package Open Office is the public with various innovations: Of the screen to welcome, and the interface reviewed and become less dry, to other more important, as the compatibility born to the system opératif Apple Mac os X, and support for the new format ODF (Open document format) 1.2, the latest version ISO standard.
Open Office has been particularly attention to the interaction with the result Office 2007, and it is possible to open the documents with the new extension of Microsoft (.docx, .xlsx, .pptx.)
Also interesting, some functions specific modules, as anyone who can reduce the dimensions PowerPoint presentations, useful for example, to send them by email or to import queue PDF in the module of drafting graph, retaining the original aspect of the page.
Still on this front, it is possible to create PDF documents "hybrid" between the graph typical of the format Adobe the elements of a calculation map or a producer of text.
Cooperation between several people is something that has been improvements in the various applications: In the Road calculation, various users can intervene, avoiding conflicts on the changes in the drafting of texts, because every employee is a colour of comments for greater recognition in the process of revision.
Some companies are working to bring some functions of OpenOffice on the Web (the Cloud, on the cloud), and in the next few weeks, they should make the final outcome.
The Italian version is déchargeable at http: / / it.openoffice.org / download / 3.0.0 / download300.htmlet and added to the English version that stood in the Mirror since Friday.
Addition to Windows and Mac os, the result is as usual available in addition to the system opératif Linux.
On demand, the CD of installation can be shipped at home or at work.
And if the subject of free can be a way for the broadcast in homes, it is precisely in the business, that Open Office the result is the great challenge, which can already count on various projects in the public administration and schools.
Not to mention the realities which provide a service training, consultation and assistance, ideal for small and medium-sized enterprises, which could also be open to the prospects of business.
Open Office is made up of five main: Writer modules for video writing equivalent of Word; Calc, is the Road calculation which aims to replace spreadsheet; Impress, for the rival of PowerPoint presentations; Dbase, such as the famous Access, is the programme which allows us to work on the databases; finally Drwa is the module graph.
Target for 2008, reach 5 million download, and given that today there are nearly 3 million and 600 miles, it is likely that with the exit of the new version, we can even exceed the figure planned
Kohl, too, is positive, this is the fourth cases of doping.
New cases of positivité the last Tour de France: It is the Austrian team Gerolsteiner, Bernhard Kohl, qualified third, and winner of the jersey the best climber.
This is the site of the newspaper The Equipe who reported the news.
Has 26ans, Kohl is the fourth cyclist positive for EPO Cera, the third generation, after the Italian Riccardo Riccò and Leonardo Piepoli, and German Stefan Schumacher, also of Gerolsteiner.
Blood tests carried out on test tubes Kohl are part of those made in recent weeks by the Lausanne and Chatenay-Malabry.
If the against studies confirm the positivité the Cera, the Austrian will lose its third place in the Tower and will always expect two years of disposal.
The news of the positivité Kohl to the EPO of third generation, was confirmed by the head of the French anti-doping agency, Pierre Bordry, which has communicated to the Associated Press, be notified the positivité the Austrian authorities.
The Austrian 26ans has placed on the podium behind the Spaniard Carlos Sastre and the American Cadel Evans, raflant to the shirt and peas the best climber.
IMMIGRES: New YORK Times SE request SI Italy TSEs racist?
Italy "as the immigrant has recently become a destination for immigrants' met with resistance.
It would make it the Nice country in a nation of racist? This is what if intéroge the New York Times who has dedicated a long, discussing the issue of racism in Italy, working on the case of young Abdul William Guibre, a native of Burkina Faso, killed last month in Milan, for stealing a sounding biscuits.
This case highlights what the New York Times defines as the "paradox of the North": The northern regions are both those where "more integration and more work," but also "an anti-immigrant the height of the country and the most important support for the Northern League"
To confirm the rising tension between Italy and immigrants, the NYT has also refers to episodes of intolerance of Milan, Parma, Rome, Ciampino and Castel Volturno.
Not only.
Even the new term sought by the Lega to curb immigration and facilitate the return of illegal immigrants, is cited as evidence of climate change in Italy.
Trend underlined by the Pope and by the President of the Republic, Giorgio Napolitano at its meeting with Benedict XVI on Quirinal, asked what the state and the church work together to defeat racism. "
Etudiants victims of the rent ladies, up to EUR 900 for a chamber.
The market for students try does not know of crisis
According to the latest survey of Sunia, the union of tenants, rent a room simple can cost a student, up to 900 euro in Milan, 700 in Florence, 650 in Naples, 600 in Rome.
"The phenomenon has now reached the very serious to exclude whole categories of young people, the right to the study because of the overall costs very high that the families of origin must soutenir- explains the responsible for the office of studies of Sunia, Laura Mariani- in these cities, the strong demand from the students has distorted the market that a process of widespread increase has amorcémême for residents.
In most cases, the offers rental are also a number of violations: Contracts free, not registered, without limit of rent, in-kind of letting.
For the Sunia, exceptional measures through the revision of taxation, are necessary to calm down prices.
Read in detail the investigation, we see that in Milan, for a bed in the area Brianza, it is approximately EUR 450; for a simple, we are going to 650 least EUR Gaza Strip (area Nere), an average of 800 (area, Udine Lambiate, and fiera) to a maximum of EUR 900 (area Vittoria)
In Florence, a bed costs on average, 350 / 400 euros, a chamber around EUR 700.
Has Bologna, where students are concentrated in areas close to the University, 250 / 280 euros for a bed in a double, and 370 to 500 for a simple.
Has Rome, in areas close to the central universities (San Lorenzo, Piazza Bologna), around 600 euros for a simple, 450 for a bed in a double.
Values slightly lower (550 euro for a simple) for areas close to the other universities (Ostiense and Cinecittà).
We cannot save that if people living in the peripheral areas: 300 euro for a bed, and 450 for a simple in the area Predestina, Centocelle or similar.
Has Naples, for a bed it is 300-400 euros, for a simple, it spends 400 to 600 euros, with prices higher in the areas Policlinico, Vomero, and Colli Aminei.
Has Bari to read, we must count 250 / EUR 350, at least 350 for a simple.
In smaller cities, prices are lower in absolute terms, but they have a major importance in the economy in towns and cities.
Finally, the cities such as Perugia, in which the kind of letting are often taken by students from outside the European Union, there is a further anomaly: The rent asked foreign students is an increase of 25-30% compared to that applied to Italy.
Goodbye old cinema Paradiso, cities éliment historical rooms.
The historical cinemas are closing in favour of Multiplex.
"A city without cinemas is a city blind, it is as a face and eyes"
The image provided by the director, Giuseppe Tornatore illustrates what is happening in major cities Italian, but also in the cities of province,
The process of marginalization of cinemas, with the birth on the outskirts of big multisalles, and the death of consomption of the single rooms in central areas of cities, is a major events which is inevitable and no doubt; it has all the hallmarks of a genuine cultural crime.
Has disappear, it is often the historic places and charged with memory, "it is as if a friend of mine was broken, someone that we know, with which we have shared a way and both emotional" observed the director of the movie Nuovo Paradiso film, which offers Tornatore 20 years ago, the first Oscar and the Grand Prix jurée of the Cannes, and telling the poetry of a room of province, and nostalgia a way to live the cinema, lost can be forever.
The figures provided by Anec, the association main traders, want to say: The last five years, 316 cinemas traditional to have closed, and it is the rooms of the main cities that have especially paid the price: 10 less in Florence, 9 in Milan, Naples, Bologna and Rome, 6 and less in Turin, 5 in Palermo.
Among the most affected by the closure, Emily Romaine is at the top with 82 cinemas single rooms lost, followed by the Tuscany (44) and Lombardy (41).
Proof that confirms t that the first responsible for their disappearance is the advent of the multiplex, because it is the three Italian regions that have made the most of new cinemas multisalles: 195 screens in Lombardy in the last five years, 81 in Tuscany as Emily-Romagne.
"The Italian exploitation has developed an irrational" observed Paolo Protti, chairman of the Anec, "it is useful to build new structures, but we need to ensure the survival of those that already exist, because when a firm in a city, these fréquenteurs are not necessarily all prepared to go to the multiplex.
Not to mention the missed deliberation of credit for traders: Debt antécédente of the state is around 10 million.
It is a shame that, having and moral, the government does not respect the existing laws.
To support the sector, it should be between 16 and 18 million per year.
Note the case of Bologna, the first Italian city, which concerned about these closures, has decided to resolve the situation with the signing of a protocol between the Mutuelle and Anec, the first of its kind in Italy, to defend and promote cinemas single rooms historic centres and periphery.
Among the prescriptive planned, there are measures of tax facilities in favour of managers and benefits to the public in terms of mobility: Viewers will be able to enter the area to movement limited, and have special tariffs for the parking spaces and in some parks.
"It is an initiative that am very fond" observed Giuseppe Tornatore 'and I hope that other cities will follow the example of Bologna putting in place other measures.
However, it is clear that, to block the super power of the multiplex cinemas, the traditional must also improve the quality of its and the image, because the public today is more demand.
The defence of the traditional film is a subject that for me, has always been important: The closure of Supercinema of Bagheria, the place of my childhood and adolescence, was the spark that has convinced me to do "New cinema Paradiso" which I thought already since 10ans.
I live in Rome for 25 years, and when I turn to the Rialto, or Quirinal of Via Nazionale, now closed, where I have both lived emotions shared, I turn to the other side not to see the banners noircis by the dust.
Links between politics and “ ndrangheta, arrested mayor of Gioia Tauro.
"The mayor of Gioia Tauro was prepared to standardise the choice of the Mutuelle the interests of the clan Piromalli."
Serious accusations are launched by the judges of the Directorate of the anti-Mafia Calabria, with the mayor and Vice Mayor of Gioia Tauro, Giorgio Dal Torrione and Rosario Schiavione, and the mayor of Rosarno Carlo Martelli's Liberal Socialists, arrested this morning for external assistance for a mafia association.
The manettes also for Gioacchino Piromalli, the former mediator between the clan and public administrations, and his small sons lawyer, namesake of the boss, already condemned for a criminal association of mafia-style, and to pay 10 million.
"An affront to the prescriptive legal and moral, and especially in the right direction" write prosecutors, the two local authorities had expressed a willingness to pay consultations to Maître Piromalli.
"It would have been given to the clan -écrivent the juges- to enter officially in the halls facilitating the possibilities, already considerable, control and orientement of the public administration"
The chairman of the committee regional calabrais Agazio Loiero, cannot deny that "collusions between local councils and organised crime, there are more than a" in its region: "There are places where the mafia intensity is stronger than in others, where the collusion is almost inevitable.
But there are also many politicians who resist pressure from the ndrangheta, heroes who are honest "
The arrests of this morning follow those of July, following which the police announced have décapitée the clan Piromalli.
At the end of April, the City Council of Gioia Tauro was dissolved; already in 1991, and always because of alleged packs between organised crime and local government, local politicians had been released from their function to administer the City.
Giorgio Dal Torrione, mayor of the UDC at the time of the collapse, was appointed head of a center-right coalition, after a run-off in May 2006.
He shouted the scandal when the Prefecture ordered the dissolution of the City Council.
It accusa Vice Minister of Interior at the time, Marco Minniti, accusing it of having engineered the very for a political issue, but given the request of incarceration signed this morning, the judges explain that the clan Piromalli was even manages to ask the variation of the draft the A3.
Therefore ordered interceptions against Dal Torrione, the entry write, is émergée 'willingness to marry the requirements of a businessman, representing a group known, close to the Piromalli, unifying the choice of the public administration to the interests of the clan.
When energy is born waves, now the big moves.
This is a disproportionate source with more than 70% of the surface area of the planet and now the major global energy companies are beginning to discover.
Waves, tidal currents, is the new renewable sources on which the behemoths like Chevron asked me, and now trying to get their hands.
The possibility of obtaining energy from the movement of the sea is considered for now hundred years, and in the 1970s, in competition with the first oil crisis, the research intensified.
When the price of oil, declined to 1980, the idea of using the marine energy was set aside, but now the bodies environmentalists and the further increase oil give a strong growth in the sector
The World Energy Council (WEC) of London estimated in 2007, only 15% of the world needs electricity could be covered by the operating systems of the choppy seas of the seas.
This amount would be twice that produce nuclear power plants.
And in addition, there is the currents and the tides.
Behemoths in the attack.
The first company to focus on marine energy has been the Enersis, who in 2005, has siglé an agreement to build a plant in the north of Portugal.
When the agreement was announced, a true not revolutionary.
Two years ago, more candidates among these companies doomed always been to the traditional energy rely on marine energy.
"Chevron is currently studying the technology on energy océanique- said the spokesman of a parent company the colossus American oil tanker, the business daily Wall Street Journal- and assess the potential to cooperate with us."
Cooperation in question, is a permit discussed by the Committee for energy, needed to give rise to a marine energy in Alaska.
This is a very interesting, especially if we consider that in Alaska, the US continues to extract oil, and recently President Bush has set up a project for new excavations
Addition to Chevron, Verdant Power Inc. In New York and Ocean Power of New Jersey, who travel the road of energy from the sea, and the sums invested until today, although their details are known, indicate that the observers, a growing interest.
Tecnologie to point.
The experts say a technology still in its infancy, from the fact that the marine energy dispelling fears about the environmental impact.
Today, the systems such as those in Portugal, or some in Scotland, are small size, and do not seem to create major problem in the ecosystem.
To produce energy on a large scale, however, we must use of technology with a higher environmental impact.
"And the choices are different: Ocean Power, for example, uses a system of buoys linked together.
The waves, which moves the sludge to the top and bottom, is converted into water pressure of the pistons and cylindres within the cork.
The pressure spin a turbine which in turn, leads a generator.
Energy is sent to the side through the cables under sailors.
For the moment, we have four systems of this kind in phase of the project, pending a single federal approval and part of energy could be used to a military installation.
Verdant Power, on the contrary, is already producing energy for a commercial center and a car park using six turbines Marine in the East River in New York.
The movement of water in the tides, runs the pales turbines, creating a rotational movement that sustains a generator.
Verdant announced have a long list of clients in expectation of authorisations necessary to draw of energy.
After the waves, the tides.
Particular interest, they say the Institute for research of electricity, deserves at the moment, the potential tides.
Although this is an intermittent phenomenon, the tide is more predictable of the wind, solar, or waves, and therefore more reliable as a source of energy.
And it is precisely on energy tides that states such as New York, Maine and Alaska, with others, are looking at the coast, have invested $7 million in 2008 and provides investment up to 35 million in 2009.
